re 0.96% of the population. 
There were 668 households, out of which 34.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 47.2% were married couples living together, 12.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 36.4% were non-families. 31.3% of all households were made up of individuals, and 16.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.41 and the average family size was 3.03. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 27.4% under the age of 18, 8.0% from 18 to 24, 26.4% from 25 to 44, 19.7% from 45 to 64, and 18.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 89.7 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 83.4 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $29,659, and the median income for a family was $35,750. Males had a median income of $29,375 versus $20,938 for females. The per capita income for the town was $13,842. About 9.2% of families and 11.0% of the population were below the poverty line, including 10.4% of those under age 18 and 17.2% of those age 65 or over. 
Luraphaenops gionoi is a species of beetle in the family Carabidae, the only species in the genus Luraphaenops. 
Aalto Media Lab is a transdisciplinary laboratory focusing on digital design and its impact to culture and society. The Lab is part of the Department of Media at the School of Arts, Design and Architecture, Aalto University in Finland. 
Media Lab is a base for MA and Doctoral studies, and for research on design and production of digital culture, digital media, interaction design, games, new media art and sound and the effect they have on society.  
The current MA programs and majors of the Aalto Media Lab are MA in New Media, Sound in New Media and Game Design. The Lab is a coordinator and a partner in number of international research, design and development projects focusing on digital technology, art, design, media and culture. 
Media Lab was founded in 1993. The first MA program was started in 1994 and the first research group assembled in 1996. The roots of the Media Lab are in the early Scandinavian media art, demoscene, game design, hacker culture, and participatory design communities. Since its formation the Media Lab has been part of a relatively active digital culture scene in Helsinki and its surroundings. 
Since 1995 Media Lab has collaborated in, generated and coordinated research and development projects funded by the European Commission, Tekes (the Finnish Funding Agency for Technology and Innovation), Nordic Council, UNESCO and a number of industrial partners, including Nokia, Elisa, TeliaSonera, Sanoma, YLE and MTV3. 
In 1998 the lab became an official department at the university. In January 2000 the Media Centre Lume, the National Research and Development Center of audiovisual media was officially opened. Lume was located in the same premises as the Media Lab and offered its resources for study and research projects carried out in the Lab. The Lume was closed in 2016 as part of the new Aalto University's reorganisation. 
In 2001, the Ministry of Education Finland chose Media Lab as one of the national top educational units. 
In 2006 Media Lab was invited to the Ars Electronica. The Beta Lounge, Campus Exhibition presented over 20 works by Media Lab's MA, DA and alumni students and its four research groups of that time. Since then Media Lab researchers, designers and artist have collaborated in with the Ars Electronica Center in various projects. 
2008 saw the beginnings of Aalto University, a new university. Aalto is the fusion of the University of Art and Design Helsinki where Media Lab is located, Helsinki School of Economics and Helsinki University of Technology. 
In 2010, as part of Aalto reorganisation, the Media Lab joined forces with Photography and Graphic Design, formerly of the Visual Culture department, to create the Department of Media. 
Media Lab provides platform for Master of Arts and Doctor of Arts (equivalent to PhD) studies in three areas: New Media Design and Production, Sound in New Media and Game Design and Production. The doctoral students often  work within the thematic research groups. Teaching is in English and about 40% of students are non-Finns. 
The workshops of the School of Arts, Design and Architecture are in the downstairs of the Lab providing tools for building physical, digital and interactive prototypes. In the workshops students and researchers can use various kind of tools, from computer controlled looms and sewing machines to woodworking machines, 3D printers, water jet and laser cutting and milling machines. There are also studios for ceramics, photography and mechatronics. 
As a  transdisciplinary laboratory, Aalto Media Lab is open for experiments in all areas and aspects of new media and digital design. The MA and doctoral studies can do independent research within the facilities and the community. Within the Lab there are three research groups. 
The Learning Environments research group (LeGroup) is involved in research, design and development of New Media tools, as well as their use and application, in the field of learning. Besides academic research papers the outcomes of the group are often software systems, software prototypes, applications and scenarios. The group's works are based on the social constructivist theory that sees learning as a participation in social processes of knowledge construction. 
The Systems of Representation group conducts research into representation, culture, and knowledge in the digital dimension. The group works on research and design projects, educational activities, and publishes frequently on topics such as cultural heritage, design research, new media, synthetic reality and simulation. 
Sound and Physical Interaction (SOPI), a relatively new research group focusses on sound and its emerging role in designing new ways of interactions between humans through digital environments. The group's mission is to investigate and integrate innovative research activities in sound design and physical interaction practices on various levels to advance their roles and impact in the future of media and interactive art. 
In the thematic research groups, researchers and doctoral students often do art and design experiments related to interaction design, video game design, sonic interaction design, information visualization, digital visual art and sonic art. 
Toufik Mansour is an Israeli mathematician working in algebraic combinatorics. He is a member of the Druze community and is the first Israeli Druze to become a professional mathematician. 
Mansour obtained his Ph.D. in mathematics from the University of Haifa in 2001 under Alek Vainshtein. As of 2007, he is a professor of mathematics at the University of Haifa.  He served as chair of the department from 2015 to 2017. He has previously been a faculty member of the Center for Combinatorics at Nankai University from 2004 to 2007, and at The John Knopfmacher Center for Applicable Analysis and Number Theory at the University of the Witwatersrand. 
Mansour is an expert on Discrete Mathematics and its applications. In particular, he is interested in permutation patterns, colored permutations, set partitions, combinatorics on words, and compositions. He has written more than 260 research papers, which means that he publishes a paper roughly every 20 days, or that he produces one publication page roughly every day. 
Vader Immortal: A Star Wars VR Series is a series of three virtual reality adventure games originally released on May 21, September 25, and November 21, 2019, respectively, for the Oculus Quest and Rift systems. A Playstation VR version was later released on August 24, 2020. 
The story, split up into three chapters, follows a Force-sensitive smuggler taken captive by Darth Vader, who requires the smuggler to find an ancient artifact. 
The game is composed of three chapters, with each one focusing on the usage of different abilities. Each episode includes a dojo which allows players to practice against waves of enemies using a lightsaber and Force powers. 
The player follows a linear path through the game, able to use the Force to do various things as necessary to move forward to the next area.  
All three chapters were written by writer David S. Goyer and directed by special effects artist Ben Snow. According to Snow, the premise of searching for an ancient artifact was inspired by the movie Raiders of the Lost Ark. 
Vader Immortal received "Mixed or average reviews" according to Metacritic. Critics praised the game's story, but criticized the gameplay as not being mechanically deep. 
Melanie Yazzie is a Navajo sculptor, painter, printmaker, and professor. She teaches at the University of Colorado at Boulder. 
She first studied art at the Westtown School in Pennsylvania. Yazzie earned a BA in Studio Art with a minor in Spanish from Arizona State University in 1990 and an MFA in printmaking from the University of Colorado at Boulder in 1993. 
Melanie Yazzie works a wide range of media that include printmaking, painting, sculpting, and ceramics, as well as installation art. Her art is accessible to the public on many levels and the main focus is on connecting with people and educating people about the contemporary status of one indigenous woman and hoping that people can learn from her experience. 
A recurring motif in some of Yazzie's work has been Blue Bird flour sacks, which provided clothing material to many people during their childhoods. The flour sacks are also known to be used for table cloths, food protection, curtains in hogan homes. The Blue Bird flour sacks are an essential icon from Yazzie's childhood. They serve as a connection to her grandparents and also a connection to memories of butchering sheep, a time honored event with her family while growing up. 
She is a Professor and Head of Printmaking at the University of Colorado at Boulder. She teaches printmaking courses and travels extensively to indigenous communities within the United States and abroad. She can always be found through the University of Colorado Art and Art History Department. 
In addition to teaching at the Institute of American Indian Arts, the College of Santa Fe (now Santa Fe University of Art and Design), Boise State University, and the University of Arizona, Yazzie has taught at the Pont Aven School of Contemporary Art in France. 
Some of the projects are held in the Artist Printmaker Research Collection at Texas Tech University in Lubbock, TX. It is an excellent resource for researching many artists in the contemporary printmaking scene. Other projects can be seen by visiting the University of Colorado at Boulder Special Collections located in the university library. 
In 2012, the Denver Art Museum welcomed Yazzie as artist-in-residence, making her the first in the Native Arts department. 
A selection of major exhibitions from the 1990s to present include "Between Two Worlds" (2008) at Arizona State University,  "Traveling" at the Heard West Museum (2006), "About Face: Self-Portraits by Native American, First Nations, and Inuit Artists" at the Wheelwright Museum (2005), "Making Connections" (2002) in Bulova, Russia, "Navajo in Gisborne" (1999) in Gisborne, New Zealand and "Watchful Eyes" (1994) at the Heard Museum. 
On September 2013 she co-curated the exhibition "Heart Lines: Expressions of Native North American Art" in Colorado University Art Museum, partially based on her private collection and including her work "Pollen Girl". 
In February 2014 she opened the largest retrospective of her work in 20 years at the University of New Mexico Art Museum titled Geographies of Memory curated by Lisa Tamiris Becker, Director of the UNM Art Museum. The exhibit ran through May 2014. A beautiful catalogue was published for the exhibition. 
She is included in books by Zena Pearlstone (About Face), Lucy Lippard (The Lure of the Local) and Jackson Rushing (Native American Art in the Twentieth Century). 
Barkers, like other department stores, had its share of competition, including Nichols Discount City, Bradlees, King's Department Stores and Caldor. 
Under Franklin, Barker's began a period of 19 years in business. Between 1961 and 1970, Barker's would open over 11 more stores. From 1970 to 1975, Barker's would become one of the nations fastest growing retail chains in the United States, opening almost 20 stores alone in New York State. In 1976, Barkers would open up several former W.T. Grant store locations in central New York.  Irving Barker remained with Franklin Stores until 1963. 
Why He Gave Up is a 1911 American short silent comedy film starring Fred Mace and Mabel Normand. The film was co-directed by Mack Sennett and Henry Lehrman and shot in Huntington, Long Island. 
Vejle Boldklub Kolding (Vejle Kolding or VB Kolding) was a short lived professional Danish football club. The club played two seasons in the Danish 1st Division before being dissolved in 2013. 
Aurora, or Aurora-on-Cayuga, is a village and college town in the town of Ledyard, Cayuga County, New York, United States, on the shore of Cayuga Lake. The village had a population of 724 at the 2010 census. 
Wells College, an institution of higher education for women founded by Henry Wells in 1868, is located in Aurora. It became coeducational in 2005, and since then enrollment has risen. 
In 1980, its Aurora Village-Wells College Historic District, with more than 50 contributing properties, was listed on the National Register of Historic Places. From 2001 to 2007, redevelopment of historic properties in the village by entrepreneur Pleasant Rowland and the Aurora Foundation earned compliments, as well as provoking citizen concern, a lawsuit joined by state and national preservation organizations, and national media attention. 
Also listed on the National Register of Historic Places are the Aurora Steam Grist Mill (1976) and Mosher Farmstead (2003). 
In 2000, the board of Wells College endorsed a master plan that proposed two new buildings, demolition of some existing modern buildings and moving some historic brick buildings. They also voted to close the historic Aurora Inn on Main Street and look for a private developer to redevelop and manage it. The college's proposed changes raised concerns, especially as some of the properties and master plan were within the historic district. 
In 2001, entrepreneur Pleasant Rowland together with Wells College founded the Aurora Foundation and teamed up to renovate the Aurora Inn. They acquired additional properties to renovate, including the E. B. Morgan House. In press accounts, Rowland expressed her vision of enhancing the historic character and attractiveness of the community, and of improving the local economy.  Founder of the enormously successful "American Girl" dolls, she was a 1962 alumna of Wells College. 
Rowland's and the Aurora Foundation's projects have drawn some criticism and concern. Because the village is so small, its fate and governance are already intertwined with Wells College, which owns half the land in the village. Critics felt that the foundation was too quick to renovate some historic structures and did not follow necessary review procedures, including that required by the State Environmental Quality Review Act (SEQRA). 
Critics were concerned about Rowland's not being a native to the area, despite her time there while attending Wells College from 1958 to 1962. They complained that she had not been accessible for consultation with the community. There was an underlying concern that Rowland's wealth allowed her to impose a vision on the community. 
The State Supreme Court ruled against the Aurora Coalition and allowed the renovation of the Aurora Inn to proceed. The Appeals Court allowed the lower court's decision to stand. 
Continuing economic problems in central New York and residents' differing ideas about the village kept the controversy alive. The issues served as inspiration for the satirical novel Happyland, by author J. Robert Lennon. It began running in serial form in Harper's Magazine in July 2006. 
In May 2007, Rowland ended her association with Wells College and shut down the Aurora Foundation. Spokespeople said redevelopment of the village was substantially completed. Although Rowland put the local home decor firm Mackenzie-Childs up for sale, she also purchased an additional building in the village and set up a new limited liability corporation to operate her properties. 
In October 2013, Rowland took personal ownership of all the properties that she renovated for Wells College and purchased several other properties to the degree that she currently owns the entire village business district along with other commercial properties. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 720 people, 181 households, and 106 families residing in the village. The population density was 750.4 people per square mile (289.6/km2). There were 225 housing units at an average density of 234.5 per square mile (90.5/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 659 White, 13 African American, 2 Native American, 22 Asian, 10 from other races, and 14 from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 14 of the population. 
There were 181 households, out of which 52 had children under the age of 18 living with them, 91 were married couples living together, 13 had a female householder with no husband present, and 75 were non-families. 63 of all households were made up of individuals, and 33 had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.33 and the average family size was 3.10. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 13.2% under the age of 18, 46.1% from 18 to 24, 14.6% from 25 to 44, 15.1% from 45 to 64, and 11.0% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 22 years. 
The population was 62.3% female, and 37.7% male, due to the college which has mostly female students. 
The median income for a household in the village was $57,222, and the median income for a family was $64,583. Males had a median income of $31,667 versus $32,250 for females. The per capita income for the village was $17,526. About 1.8% of families and 4.8% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.5% of those under age 18 and 5.4% of those age 65 or over. 
The 1999 Big East Conference Baseball Tournament was held at Mercer County Waterfront Park in Trenton, NJ. This was the fifteenth annual Big East Conference Baseball Tournament, and first to be held outside the state of Connecticut. The Providence Friars won the tournament championship and claimed the Big East Conference's automatic bid to the 1999 NCAA Division I Baseball Tournament. 
The Big East baseball tournament was a 6 team double elimination tournament in 1999. The top six regular season finishers were seeded one through six based on conference winning percentage only. 
Marc DesRoches was the winner of the 1999 Jack Kaiser Award. DesRoches was a senior pitcher for Providence. 
Rodney Strachan (born October 16, 1955) is an American former competition swimmer and Olympic champion.  He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics in Montreal, Quebec, where he received a gold medal in the 400-meter individual medley event.  He received a silver medal in the same event at the 1973 World Aquatics Championships in Belgrade. 
Strachan held the long course world record in the 400-meter individual medley (4:23.68) from July 1976 to August 1978. 
This article about a swimming Olympic medalist of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Bryson Crichton-Stuart, 8th Marquess of Bute (born 21 December 1989), styled Lord Mount Stuart between 1989 and 1993 and Earl of Dumfries between 1993 and 2021, is a Scottish peer. He has gone by the name Jack Dumfries in recent years. The family home is Mount Stuart House on the Isle of Bute, while the Marquess presently resides in London. 
Lord Bute was born into one of Scotland's most prominent aristocratic families. He is the son of Carolyn Waddell and John Colum Crichton-Stuart, 7th Marquess of Bute, and the descendant of British Prime Minister John Stuart, 3rd Earl of Bute. Lord Bute is heir to a large fortune, and in 2019 on the Sunday Times Rich List his father was ranked at 825th richest person in the United Kingdom. 
Drug of Choice is a novel written by Michael Crichton, as his eighth published novel, and the sixth to feature his pseudonym John Lange. It was originally published in 1970. Hard Case Crime republished the novel under Crichton's name in November 2013. 
Film rights were optioned in 1970 by the actor Robert Forster and his agent David de Silva, to produce a film starring Forster called High Synch. John Neufeld was hired to write a screenplay. "Unlike the book, our script will not have a happy ending", said Forster. "We think the movie ought to serve as a warning." However, the film was never made. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
This geographical article about a location in Amasya Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Amarapur is a village in Belgaum district in the southern state of Karnataka, India. Amarapur is in Bailhongal Taluka, which is sometimes known as Sampgaon Taluka. 
This article related to a location in Belagavi district, Karnataka, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Armoricaine or Armorican is an endangered French breed of domestic cattle. It originated in Brittany in the nineteenth century. It has a red coat with white markings, and has short horns. 
The coat is red, with some white markings. The horns are short. Cows weigh about 650 kg, and stand about 138 cm at the withers. 
The Armoricaine is a dual-purpose breed, and may be raised both for meat and for milk. Cows produce some 4500 L of milk in a lactation of about 305 days. The young grow quickly, and mature animals fatten quickly. 
Lava is purported to have founded Lavapuri  (the modern day city of Lahore), which is named after him. 
During an Ashvamedha Yagya held by Rama, Sage Valmiki along with Lava and Kusha, attended with Sita in disguise. 
Lava and Kusha chanted the Ramayana in the presence of Rama and a vast audience. When Lava and Kusha recited about Sita's exile, Rama became grief-stricken and Valmiki produced Sita. Sita, struck with embarrassment and grief, called upon the earth, her mother (Bhumi), to receive her and as the ground opened, she vanished into it. Rama then learnt that Lava and Kusha were his children. 
In some versions, Lava and Kusha capture the horse of the sacrifice and went to defeat Rama's brothers (Lakshmana, Bharata and Shatrughna) and their armies. When Rama came to fight with them, Sita intervened and unites father and sons. 
Lava and Kusha became rulers after their father Rama founded the cities of Lavapuri (current day Lahore) and Kasur, respectively. The king of Kosala, Raghava Rama installed his son Lava at Shravasti and Kusha at Kushavati. 
From 2011 to 2013, she was Chair of the Permanent Forum on Indigenous Issues with the United Nations (UN). 
In 2014, she advised the President of the United Nations General Assembly for the Conference of Indigenous Peoples of the UN. 
She is currently President of the Permanent Forum on Indigenous Issues with the UN, and Board Member with Women's Rights and Development (AWID). For the Tropical Agricultural Research and the Center for Higher Education she works on the projects to fight hunger and famine and supports a trust fund for Indigenous Peoples. Myrna Cunningham is also the first Vice President of the board of directors of the fund for the development of indigenous peoples of Latin America and the Caribbean. 
In 2010, the National Autonomous University of Mexico (UNAM), awarded Cunningham an honorary doctorate. She was the first indigenous woman to receive an honorary degree from UNAM. 
Cunningham was a member of the Board of Directors of the Global Fund for Women and also advised the Alliance of Indigenous Women of Mexico and Central America, the Continental Network of Indigenous Women and the International Indigenous Women's Forum. 
Dinny O'Bryan is an Australian former rugby league footballer who played in the 1960s. He played for the St. George, North Sydney and Cronulla-Sutherland in the New South Wales Rugby League (NSWRL) competition. 
O'Bryan made his first grade debut for St. George in 1962.  O'Bryan made 16 appearances for the club as they won the minor premiership.  O'Bryan did not play in the club's grand final victory over Western Suburbs. 
In 1963, O'Bryan joined North Sydney.  The following season, Norths finished in fourth place on the table and reached the finals for the first time in many years.  O'Bryan played in the club's semi final loss against Balmain.  In 1965, Norths had one of their best seasons on the field finishing second.  O'Bryan however missed both of the club's finals matches through injury. 
XHBY-FM is a radio station on 96.7 FM in Tuxpan, Veracruz. It is owned by Radiorama and operated by Grupo VG Comunicaciones, and is known as Radio Lobo with a grupera format. 
O'Dell was the son of William B. and Sara Francis O'Dell and was born in Ware Shoals, South Carolina. O'Dell earned a bachelor's degree from The Citadel in 1960. He and his wife Aedra Gayle Tisdale are the parents of two children, William B. O'Dell and Patricia Michelle Foster. Prior to being elected to the South Carolina State Senate, O'Dell served as vice-chairman of the Ware Shoals School District 51 board, and later as director of the South Carolina Chamber of Commerce. 
O'Dell was first elected to the South Carolina Senate in 1988. O'Dell was the chairman of the General committee. He also served on the Banking and Insurance, Finance, Interstate Cooperation and Labor, Commerce and Industry committees. O'Dell died in his sleep of a heart attack on January 7, 2016. 
The men's 1500 metre freestyle competition at the 1999 Pan Pacific Swimming Championships took place on August 28-29 at the Sydney International Aquatic Centre.  The last champion was Grant Hackett of Australia. 
Flamenco zapateado notation or Flamenco zapateado (foot-stomping) notation is a type of dance notation. It is the graphic representation of the sonorous and motor aspects of the particular movements of flamenco dancing that are produced by the action of zapateado or foot-stomping. 
In general, the notation of flamenco zapateado always uses five symbols for feet movements. Depending on the author, the name may vary, but it generally coincides with the movement. Some include additional symbols for the most specific movements. 
Vadgaon Budruk also known as Vadgaon in the local area is one of the many upcoming suburbs of Pune, Maharashtra, India. It is located on Sinhgad Road. 
Vadgaon Budruk saw lot of change after 2005, with significant increase in population of Pune. The change from village to suburb took toll on environment. Major part of the forest, fertile lands were converted to apartment complexes of concrete and tar. Most of the land in Vadgaon Budruk is now occupied by housing complexes. This is one of the important bases of Pune middle-class people. 
In this area, most of the population is Maharashtrian. And it is easily accessible area for people from Satara, Sangli & Kolhapur district. 
Vadgaon Budruk has excellent connectivity to Pune city via PMPML, buses, auto etc. There are frequent buses from Swargate to Dhayari. The city is very close to Pune-Bangalore highway and has good connectivity at both sides. Uber and Ola cabs are also available in this area. 
Harpurhey is recorded in 1320 as "Harpourhey", meaning "hedged enclosure by a man called Harpour", who owned the area in the 14th century. 
This small township, at one time called Harpurhey with Gotherswick, lies on both sides of the road from Manchester to Middleton, extending westward to the Irk. In 1830 it was described as abounding in pleasant views. It has long been a suburb of Manchester. 
Harpurhey was included in the Parliamentary borough of Manchester from its creation but was not taken into the municipal borough until 1885. It ceased to be a township in 1896, becoming part of the new township of North Manchester. Harpurhey is one of the most economically deprived areas within the Greater Manchester area. 
Harpurhey is within the Blackley and Broughton constituency, which has been represented in the House of Commons by Labour MP Graham Stringer who was first elected to the old Manchester Blackley constituency in 1997. Prior to his election to Parliament he was a councillor for Harpurhey from 1982, and leader of Manchester City Council from 1984. 
The ward is represented on Manchester City Council by three Labour Party councillors: Pat Karney (Lab), Joanne Green (Lab) and Sandra Collins (Lab). 
The Edwardian swimming baths on Rochdale Road was built between 1909-10 by Henry Price, Manchester's first City Architect. Listed grade II in 1994, the baths closed to the public in 2001 after serious defects were discovered. The women's pool hall and laundry have now been replaced by the MANCAT sixth form college and community library. 
The World Famous Embassy Club on Rochdale Road was bought by Bernard Manning in 1959, before which it had been Harpurhey Temperance Billiard Hall. 
Queen's Park was one of Britains first municipal parks in 1846; designed and laid out by Joshua Major in 1845, the park was originally arranged around Hendham Hall, home of the Houghton family, which was demolished in 1884. The park incorporated a labyrinth, sheds and greenhouses, but by 1930 these had been removed. Today the park has a children's play area, rose gardens and hosts a variety of community events. 
Harpurhey is served by a number of bus services on the main Rochdale Road (A664) corridor, as well as non-radial services to and from Salford Shopping Precinct  and Oldham. Services include First Greater Manchester 17, 18, 52, 53, 64, 162 and 163, and Stagecoach Manchester 112 and 118. 
Manchester Metrolink light rail tram system has two stations close to Harpurhey, at Monsall and Central Park (North Manchester Business Park), which also borders Newton Heath. 
There are a number churches in the district, including the Church of England Christ Church, built in 1838. St Stephen's was founded in 1899 and closed in 1985, where is merged with Harpurhey United Church which became Harpurhey Community Church. 
Harpurhey is in the Roman Catholic Diocese of Salford, and the Church of England Diocese of Manchester. 
Two schools in the area cater for children aged between 3-11: Manchester Communication Primary Academy and Oasis Academy Harper Mount, 
Manchester Communication Academy is at the junction of Queens Road and Rochdale Road in Harpurhey. It is run in conjunction with BT, Manchester City Council and The Manchester College catering for 11-18-year-olds. 
North City Family and Fitness Centre is a centre combining leisure facilities with a Sure Start Centre, just off Rochdale Road next to the North City Shopping Centre and Market. The centre includes a 25-metre, five lane swimming pool with a movable pool floor designed to help young, elderly and disabled people. There is a health suite which includes spa pool, sauna and steam rooms, and a gymnasium. The centre also offers an exercise studio with a programme of fitness classes and martial arts. 
Barry Creyton (born 1939, Brisbane, Queensland) is an Australian actor and playwright. Creyton began his professional career in radio and revue in Melbourne, Australia and became well known in Sydney starring in and writing popular comedy-melodramas at the Music Hall theatre-restaurant in Neutral Bay. 
Creyton also spent time in the United Kingdom, where he appeared in British comedy television series including Doctor in the House. Following his return to Australia, he appeared in television series such as The Sullivans and Carson's Law.    
Creyton has been a theatre performer since 1957 and stage work has included theatrical versions of Don's Party and The Naked Vicar Show. Creyton now works in the United States. 
In 1987, he directed the musical Nunsense which broke box office records all over Australia, and employed two companies playing simultaneously. With the author's permission he revised the dialogue for Australian audiences, an exercise he repeated for Irish audiences in the Dublin production which he directed in June 1988. 
In 1988, Creyton was honoured with the Norman Kessel Memorial Award for his contributions to Australian theatre as actor, playwright and director. 
Since 1989, he has worked almost exclusively in the United States where he has written movies-of-the-week for TV.  He wrote all the sketch material for the off Broadway revue Secrets Every Smart Traveler Should Know which ran for two and a half years in New York. 
His novels, The Dogs of Pompeii and Nero Goes to Rome, co-authored with American writer Vaughan Edwards, are published by Random House. 
The William Thompson Jr. House, at 10 W. 400 North in Beaver, Utah, was built around 1880 by Scottish-born local stonemason Thomas Frazer.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1982. 
It was built as a one-story black rock cottage with two rooms, and a symmetric window-door-window front facade..  It has endwall chimneys.  It displays three of Frazer's characteristic elements: use of ashlar stonework on the front facade, use of beaded white mortar joints, and use of a Greek Revival-style cornice. 
The property includes a small wood frame building, probably built around 1890, which was a saloon in downtown Beaver.  It was moved to this property before 1912 by William Thompson, Jr. 
The property also has a root cellar, with a dirt roof, that could appear to be historical, but the owner in 1979 said he had built that recently. 
This article about a property in Utah on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In Single Player, a player who performs well may receive a special Dai Battle in which they face a much stronger team made up of characters. 
The Andorra national under-16 basketball team is a national basketball team of Andorra, administered by the Andorran Basketball Federation. It represents the country in international under-16 basketball competitions. 
Valentine de Laborde was born on 1 January 1806. Her grandfather, Marquis Jean-Joseph de Laborde, was a famous financier, and her father, Count Alexandre de Laborde, was a director of the National Archives. On 1 June 1824, she married the banker Gabriel Delessert. He was a prefect of Seine police from 1836 to 1848. 
Under July Monarchy, de Laborde held a famous salon in her hotel in Passy that attracted main figures of the romantic generation: Francois-Rene de Chateaubriand, Adolphe Thiers, Eugene Delacroix, Prosper Merimee, Maxime du Camp, Emile de Girardin, Alfred de Musset, Charles de Montalembert, Minghetti, the future Empress of France, Eugenie de Montijo, and the Countess de Castiglione. She was also known as private art collector. 
Under the Second French Empire, de Laborde became a part of the entourage of the Empress Eugenie and held an eminent social position until her death. 
The gardens are the northern gardens of the former residential Euston Square, the southern gardens were renamed Endsleigh Gardens. 
The gardens are enclosed by railings and covered with grass and London plane trees. The two lodges at the gardens date from 1870 and were once the entrance to Euston station. They are inscribed with the names of the London and North Western Railway. 
A worksite for High Speed 2 and the proposed Euston St Pancras railway station is situated at the gardens. This is to construct an underground pedestrian link between Euston railway station and Euston Square tube station. 
It was revealed in January 2021 that protesters had built a 100ft tunnel under the gardens as part of protests against the planned High Speed 2 railway. Nine activists occupied the tunnels starting 27 January as part of the protest. The first protester left the tunnel on February 5thA second protester left on the 6th. A third left on the 15th and a fourth on the 17th. A 5th was evicted on the 23rd and a further 3 left on the 25th.The final protester left on the 26th. 
The encroaching boundaries of Euston railway station to the gardens are visible on this 1953 Ordnance Survey map 
She won a silver medal in the Women's fours at the 1994 Commonwealth Games in Victoria with Elizabeth Bure, Linda Ahmat and Wena Piande.  
Sixteen years later she competed in the pairs event at the 2010 Commonwealth Games. Monalua has also won a gold medal in the triples at the Asia Pacific Bowls Championships. 
This Papua New Guinean biographical article relating to sport is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to lawn or indoor bowls is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Royal Studios is a recording studio located in Memphis, Tennessee, United States.  Established in 1956, it is one of the oldest continuously operated music recording studios in the world. 
It is widely known for producer, recording artist and owner, Willie Mitchell, and notable productions of Al Green, Chuck Berry, John Mayer, Buddy Guy, My Morning Jacket, Robert Cray, De La Soul, Otis Rush, Keith Richards, Solomon Burke, The Bo-Keys, Bobby Blue Bland, Ann Peebles, Ike & Tina Turner, Tom Jones, Anthony Hamilton, Rod Stewart, Paul Rodgers, Cody Chesnutt, Sam Moore as well as the Barnyard and Soul Men soundtracks. 
The studio is operated by the family of Willie Mitchell with son Lawrence "Boo" Mitchell serving as manager/engineer, son Archie Mitchell serving as an engineer and daughter Oona Mitchell serving as administrator. 
The original structure was used as a movie theatre, with Shamrock Theatre opening at the location in 1915.  Early theatres of this type showed silent movies and were called nickelodeon theatres because of their nickel admission.  The Rex Theatre, a previously open-air theatre, took over the location and replaced the Shamrock Theatre.  It was converted to sound in the early 1920s and renamed as Royal Theatre. 
In the early 1960s, Hi Records hired Willie Mitchell as a recording artist and producer. His involvement with Royal Studios steadily evolved over the 1960s. 
Hi Records founding president, Joe Cuoghi, died in 1970 and the Hi Records label had to restructure.  Attorney Nick Pesce became President and Willie Mitchell was promoted to Vice President.  The Royal Studios facility came under the direction of Willie Mitchell and was renamed Mitchell's Royal Sound Studio. 
Other notable artists with albums produced at Royal Studios during this time include Bobby Blue Bland, Chuck Berry, Ike & Tina Turner, Otis Clay, Ann Peebles, Rod Stewart, and Syl Johnson. 
Reaching its commercial peak in the early to mid-1970s, Hi Records declined during the late 70s as a result of soul music being replaced by disco.  Despite the decline of Hi Records, Royal Studios remained continuously in production of consistent hits from the 1957s through the present. 
Royal Studios is in operation at the original location under the management of Lawrence "Boo" Mitchell, one of the sons of Willie Mitchell.  His credit roster includes independent artists and notable acts such as Anthony Hamilton, Rod Stewart, Al Green, Cody Chesnutt and 8 Ball. Royal Studios features two vintage MCI recording consoles along with other rare equipment including two original Pultec EQs, Universal Audio LA2As and LA3As. 
Royal Studios remains in possession of one of the widest collections of studio grade vintage reel-to-reel tape machines.  Several of the tape machines are unique and customized.  The collection includes a uniquely modified 8-channel Ampex 351 with tube circuits replacing the entire transistor circuitry, a standard Ampex 351, Studer B 67, Sony APR-5000, MCI JH24 and MCI JH16. 
Royal Studios has served a variety of artists during its operation.  The list below is of notable albums which feature recordings from Royal Studios.  These albums went Platinum, Gold or won a Grammy or other significant recognition. 
Nasrin Tariq is a Pakistani politician who has been a member of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab since August 2018. 
She was elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab as a candidate of Pakistan Tehreek-e-Insaf (PTI) on a reserved seat for women in 2018 Pakistani general election. 
This article about a Member of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alan Marshall Storke (September 27, 1884 - March 18, 1910) was a professional baseball infielder in Major League Baseball from 1906 through 1909. He played for the St. Louis Cardinals and Pittsburgh Pirates. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball infielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Best PC Ecuador is an Ecuadorian cycling team established in 2019. In its first season at UCI Continental level in 2020, the team took two stage victories at the Vuelta a Guatemala, and three stage victories at the Vuelta al Ecuador. 
"Bring Flowers of the Rarest" (also known as the Fairest) is a Marian hymn written by Mary E. Walsh.  It was published as the "Crowning Hymn" in the Wreath of Mary 1871/1883 and later in St. Basil's Hymnal (1889). The hymn is frequently sung during a May Crowning service, one of several May devotions to the Blessed Virgin Mary. 
He made his Russian Football National League debut for FC Khimki on 7 April 2001 in a game against FC Shinnik Yaroslavl. He played 3 seasons in the FNL for Khimki and FC Amkar Perm. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football midfielder born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Mogilev Governorate (Mogilevskaya Gubernya) or Government of Mogilev was a governorate (guberniya) of the Russian Empire in the territory of the present day Belarus. Its capital was in Mogilev, referred to as Mogilev-on-the-Dnieper, or Mogilev Gubernskiy. 
The One and Only Buddy Goode is the second studio album by Michael Carr's comedy character Buddy Goode. It was officially released both digitally and on CD in store on 11 August 2011. 
The album was nominated for an ARIA Award in the category of Best Comedy Release at the 2011 ceremony, however was beaten by Australian comedy duo Hamish & Andy's compilation album Celebrating 50 Glorious Years. 
On 18 January 2013, the album was re-released into select stores as a double pack with Goode's debut album, It's All Goode. 
Kirk was elected Conservative MP for Carrickfergus at the 1835 general election and held the seat until 1847, when he stepped down. 
This article about a Conservative Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom born in the 1800s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom, for a constituency in Ireland between 1801 and 1922 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
West Creek Lake is a lake located south of Hoffmeister, New York. Fish species present in the lake are brook trout, and sunfish. There is a trail access to the lake. 
Christopher Ken Cooley (born July 11, 1982) is a former American football tight end who played for the Washington Redskins of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football for Utah State University, and was drafted by the Redskins in the third round of the 2004 NFL draft. 
Cooley finished his college football career at Utah State University with 95 receptions for 1,255 yards (13.2 yards per reception).  He was part of a talented receiving unit with teammate Kevin Curtis. 
In 2006, Cooley got off to a slow start under the play-calling of the Washington Redskins' new offensive coordinator, Al Saunders. With only three receptions in the first two weeks of the season, Cooley appeared to not have a place in the new offensive scheme, but in the weeks following, became a growing part of the Redskins offense. He ended the season with numbers slightly less than his sophomore outing, but was still one of the top tight ends in the game. 
Cooley broke his ankle in a Monday Night Football matchup against the Philadelphia Eagles on October 26, 2009. It was initially speculated that Cooley would miss the remainder of the 2009 season. On October 27, 2009, Cooley commented via Twitter that the break may not have been as bad as originally thought and that he could possibly return in as little as four weeks. His longest play of the year was a 66-yard touchdown. On November 30, 2009, Cooley was placed on injured reserve. 
Cooley played in all sixteen games of the 2010 season, but had arthroscopic surgery on his left knee after the season on January 3, 2011. 
During the preseason, it was reported that Cooley's knee was completely healed from the surgery and that he even lost 20 pounds to prepare for the 2012 season. However, Cooley was released by the Redskins on August 28, 2012. It had been hinted by general manager Bruce Allen that Cooley could return to the Redskins. 
On October 21, 2012, Cooley agreed to re-sign with the Redskins after Fred Davis tore his Achilles tendon and was done for the season. 
On July 16, 2013, The Washington Post reported that Cooley was retiring from the NFL. The Post further reported that Cooley would join the Washington Redskins' radio broadcast team as an analyst. 
Cooley also co-hosted "Cooley & Kevin", a morning drive time sports show on ESPN 980 in D. C., with Kevin Sheehan. The show was cancelled in 2018. Cooley now hosts his own podcast, The Chris Cooley Show, in which he discusses Redskins and NFL news and breaks down each week's game film. He also produces weekly film review segments on the Redskins' official website. 
On August 11, 2015, it was reported that Cooley expressed interest into returning to the NFL after working out at the Redskins facility during the off season. Cooley never officially retired from the NFL after not being re-signed by the Redskins in 2013. After playing only with the Redskins throughout his entire career, he was afraid to tarnish his legacy by joining another team. The following month, Cooley attended a workout for the New York Giants but was not signed. 
Cooley, frequently referred to by his nickname "Captain Chaos," is known for his eccentric hair styles, affinity for heavy metal music, and what one reporter has called an "Animal House persona". This nickname was created when teammates bet him he would not go out to the opening coin toss and introduce himself to the opposing team captains as "Captain Chaos". Cooley did so and the nickname stuck. 
Cooley is executive producer of the independent film Ghosts Don't Exist, which began production in May 2009. He was featured in an episode of Jake and Amir for the comedy website CollegeHumor. 
Cooley made several appearances in TV commercials for Easterns Automotive Group, a local car dealership group on the DC and Baltimore areas, alongside Clinton Portis, Antwaan Randle El, Sean Taylor and Jason Campbell. 
Martin Weisz (born March 27, 1966), is a German music video and film director. He has directed over 350 videos and worked with artists such as Nickelback, Brandy, Puff Daddy, and LL Cool J. He has also directed numerous commercials. 
Martin Weisz won an MTV Europe Music Award for Best Dance Video and was nominated for Best Rock Video in 2000. 
He made his debut as a film director with the controversial 2006 film Rohtenburg (called Grimm Love in the United States), which is banned in some areas of Germany. His second film, The Hills Have Eyes 2, debuted in theaters in 2007. His third film, Squatters, debuted in theaters on May 13, 2014. 
In 1914, he and his wife commissioned the design by Gray and Wischmeyer of their home in The Highlands. The house, built by the Alfred Struck Company is known as the Humphrey-McMeekin House and was placed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1983. The couple had two daughters and two sons.[citation needed] 
Humphrey contracted cancer and died on February 3, 1927 at the age of 51. He was buried at Louisville's Cave Hill Cemetery. 
Gojushiho is also practiced in Goshin Kagen Goju Karate, a modified style of Goju founded by Hanshi Gerald Thomson 
Al Raya was launched by Gulf company for printing and publishing as a weekly newspaper on 10 May 1979. The company which was founded by Ali bin Jaber Al Thani also owns Gulf Times, an English language daily. Based in Doha, Al Raya is the second Arabic newspaper published in Qatar. On 27 January 1980 Al Raya was relaunched as a daily newspaper. 
In 1996 a corpus was created which included 187 articles published in Al Raya. On 27 April 2012 the paper launched the mapping mangroves project. 
Although Al Raya is privately owned, it is the semi-official newspaper of Qatar. Therefore, it has a pro-government stance. The major rival of the daily is another Arabic Qatari newspaper Al Sharq which has opposite political stance. 
Al Raya mostly provides news about the receptions and activities of the ruling family, Al Thani, as well as about official events. In addition, the daily has large supplements on sports and business as well as a special supplement called He and She. The paper offered a weekly page on the environmental issues from 1999 to 2005. 
Following the 2013 coup in Egypt, Al Raya concentrated on the ongoing demonstrations of supporters of the Muslim Brotherhood and ousted President Mohamed Morsi. In August 2013, an editorial of the paper argued that possible US-led intervention against Syria would not be celebrated, but the Assad regime was "useless" and caused no other option than such intervention. 
Nasser Mohamed Al-Othman is the first editor-in-chief of the daily newspaper. In the initial period many leading Arab journalists wrote for the daily. As of 2019 Abdulla Ghanim Al Binali Almuhannadi was the editor-in-chief and Abdulla Talib Al Meri was the Editor-Manager of the daily. Abdulla Ghanim Al Binali Almuhannadi is the current editor-in-chief of the daily. 
NGC 2573 (also known as Polarissima Australis) is a barred spiral galaxy located in the constellation Octans, discovered in 1837 by John Herschel. It is the closest NGC object to the South Celestial Pole. 
Many of the bands on Camera Obscura released albums on other labels or were formally signed to other labels at the time of their appearance in the Camera Obscura roster.[citation needed] 
Frank Kyle Spain (November 29, 1927 - April 25, 2006) was an American inventor and television engineer. He is best known for founding and building WTVA, an NBC affiliate in Tupelo, Mississippi. 
In his later life, Spain also owned and operated other stations and a microwave service company. He was also a principal investor of MCI Southeast. 
Spain was born in North Lewisburg, Ohio. He spent most of his youth in Tupelo. Even early in his life, Spain took great fascination with the way electronics worked. While still a high school student, he helped build and operate a local AM radio station, WELO. Spain also served as the chief engineer on a part-time basis. After graduating with honors from Mississippi State University at the age of 19, Spain took his electrical engineering degree and ventured to Washington, D.C. 
Shortly after being employed by NBC, Spain assisted in the construction of WNBW (now WRC-TV). He helped with the first live television feeds which originated from the Capitol, White House, and other various historic locations, including the 1949 presidential inauguration.  
In 1949, Spain joined the NBC Development Group in New York City to design television and microwave relay equipment.  
"In those days, at least in the case of NBC and CBS, they had design and development groups who were basically manufacturing their own cameras and equipment and whatever. And then RCA and General Electric would take these designs and modify them somewhat and sell them commercially. So, the projects we were working on were very shortly thereafter [evolved into] color television."
While there, he also helped build the first UHF television station in Bridgeport, Connecticut, and supervised the pattern measurements of the station's antenna.  
With technology rapidly changing the scope of television in 1950, the decision was made by the Federal Communications Commission to adopt a color standard for all broadcast television networks. Spain participated in the 1949-1950 demonstration of the RCA-compatible color television system. Though the FCC initially dropped RCA's system, a rehearing was held two years later and RCA's all-electronic system was adopted. 
Two years later, Spain left NBC to take an engineering director position at WHEN-AM-FM-TV in Syracuse, New York. 
While working in Syracuse, Spain hoped to build a station in Tupelo.  In December 1953, Spain successfully petitioned the FCC to allocate channel 9 to Tupelo, and was granted a construction permit three years later.  The station first went on the air on March 18, 1957.  The station's equipment--antenna, transmitter, cameras, etc.--had been hand-built by Spain. 
In 1959, Spain started Microwave Service Company to provide distant signals to CATV systems and network interconnects for broadcast facilities. At the peak of his terrestrial transmission business, the company served twelve states.  
Because of the strategic location of these facilities, Spain joined Jack Goeken and Bill McGowan in the start-up of MCI. He maintained a sole ownership in MCI Mid-South and an equal partnership with the Meredith Corporation in MCI Southeast. 
Spain began a fascination with antique cars after buying his first in 1974. Today, the Tupelo Automobile Museum houses all of Spain's 150-car collection. The museum, founded by Spain, opened in 2002 and was designated as the official state automobile museum in 2003. 
Spain was known internationally in broadcast circles and was awarded the Gold Circle Emmy Award in 2005 for 50 years' Lifetime Achievement in Broadcasting.  
Though his health declined after the turn of the millennium, Spain continued to visit WTVA almost daily until his death. Known to many of his employees as a true hands-on owner, Spain often bragged that he could "take the Channel 9 staff anywhere in the world and they would be second to none." Of all the accomplishments Spain had overseen, WTVA was his crown jewel.   
Spain died at North Mississippi Medical Center in Tupelo on April 25, 2006 after a long battle with cancer.  His family sold WTVA in 2015. 
According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 325 inhabitants. Ethnic groups in the village include: 
In the 1944 King's Birthday Honours, Jowett was appointed an Officer of the Order of the British Empire (Military Division). She retired from the WAAC in August 1947. 
This biographical article related to the military of New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mount Kissane is a small rocky mountain range with a synclinal pattern. It has a length of 14 km and a maximum width of about 1.8 km. On the top of the mountain there are two ridges cut by a ravine in the middle. There are several peaks; the highest summit is located at the western end of the range, reaching 1485 m. 
The Jbel Kissane is a characteristic mountain whose shape dominates the eastern landscape of the town of Agdz. Its bare rock takes a variety of pastel hues such as pink, salmon and violet, depending from the angle of the sunlight and the time of the day. It is as well a dominant feature of the panoramic views from nearby villages such as Ouliz, Taliouine, Ait Ali, Tinfoula, Aremd, Tisserghate, Ait el Kharj, Igamodene, Tamnougalt, Talate, Talamzit, Timiderte, Ighrghr and Afra. 
Today, Amaveni house addresses are arranged into sections which are named alphabetically from A to W with the W section easily outnumbering all the other sections. It is located west of the city centre, where most of the roads are dusty and the residents are poor working class or self-employed. 
Amaveni has an estimated 2,000 houses, but because of the overcrowding the population is estimated to be around 20,000. 
The main bus terminus for the city of Kwekwe is located in the suburb opposite the Batanai tavern. There has been one main shopping centre till 2002 when another one was established at the 'Superette' in the W section of the township. 
There are three primary schools, namely Amaveni Primary School, Kushinga Primary School and St Martin's Primary School. Only one high school exists, Amaveni High School. 
Blessing Chebundo member of parliament of Kwekwe resides in Amaveni//Currently Masango Matambanadzo is the MP 
Tollesbury Wick is a 242.8 hectare nature reserve east of Tollesbury in Essex. It is managed by the Essex Wildlife Trust. 
This is coastal freshwater marsh which is grazed by sheep, and is worked by traditional methods which encourage wildlife. Areas of ungrazed rough pasture have badgers, and field voles and pygmy shrews are hunted by hen harriers and short-eared owls. 
Jade Te Rure (born 18 June 1993) is a New Zealand rugby union player who is currently signed for Yorkshire Carnegie in the English RFU Championship have previously played for Manawatu in the Mitre 10 Cup. He plays as a fly-half. 
Scottish-qualified, through his Edinburgh-born grandmother, Te Rure has played in the capital before as part of a touring under-18 side. 
This biographical article relating to New Zealand rugby union, about a person born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ralph Elmer Clarkson (3 August 1861, Amesbury, Massachusetts - 5 April 1942, Orlando, Florida) was an American painter, known primarily for his portraits of public figures in and around Chicago. 
Three years later, he became one of the first occupants of the newly refurbished Fine Arts Building on Michigan Avenue (formerly the Studebaker Carriage Shop). Soon, he was the at the center of an artistic group that included Charles Francis Browne (1859-1920), Oliver Dennett Grover and Lorado Taft, who he assisted in creating the Eagle's Nest Art Colony on property provided by the Chicago attorney, Wallace Heckman (1851-1927). 
He became one of the first members of the Cliff Dwellers Club in 1909. The following year, he became an Associate Member of the National Academy. He also taught at the Art Institute of Chicago. He was a member of the art juries at the Louisiana Purchase Exposition and the Panama-Pacific Exposition. In 1921, he created the first history of painters in Chicago for the journal Art and Archaeology. 
Among his portraits are those of the physicist, Albert Michelson, several Governors of Illinois, including John Peter Altgeld, and Secretary of War Jacob M. Dickinson, which is on display in the Pentagon, and William Jennings Bryan, painted specifically at Bryan's request. The University of Chicago professors sometimes referred to him as their "court painter" 
According to a legal agreement, the lease for the Eagle's Nest would expire when the last member died, and Clarkson was that member. He died while vacationing in Florida. 
Winfield is a city in Henry County, Iowa, United States. The population was 1,033 at the time of the 2020 census. 
In 1882, the Chicago, Burlington and Pacific constructed a rail line west from a railroad ferry crossing of the Mississippi River at Oakville, Iowa to Oskaloosa.  This line passed Winfield along the south border of Winfield, and it largely paralleled the Burlington and Western to Oskaloosa, Iowa.  The line was sold to the Central  Iowa Railway as soon as it was built, and that line became the Iowa Central Railway a few years later. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 1,134 people, 437 households, and 302 families living in the city. The population density was 1,080.0 inhabitants per square mile (417.0/km2). There were 482 housing units at an average density of 459.0 per square mile (177.2/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 96.8% White, 1.1% African American, 0.2% Native American, 0.5% Asian, 0.5% from other races, and 0.9% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.4% of the population. 
There were 437 households, of which 35.5% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 49.4% were married couples living together, 14.6% had a female householder with no husband present, 5.0% had a male householder with no wife present, and 30.9% were non-families. 27.9% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.50 and the average family size was 3.02. 
The median age in the city was 39.4 years. 27.2% of residents were under the age of 18; 7.2% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 23.4% were from 25 to 44; 24.2% were from 45 to 64; and 17.9% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 49.3% male and 50.7% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 1,131 people, 437 households, and 280 families living in the city. The population density was 1,089.7 people per square mile (419.9/km2). There were 471 housing units at an average density of 453.8 per square mile (174.9/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 97.97% White, 0.35% African American, 0.35% Asian, 0.80% from other races, and 0.53% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.50% of the population. 
There were 437 households, out of which 35.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 52.4% were married couples living together, 8.0% had a female householder with no husband present, and 35.9% were non-families. 32.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 19.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.49 and the average family size was 3.18. 
29.8% were under the age of 18, 5.7% from 18 to 24, 27.0% from 25 to 44, 17.8% from 45 to 64, and 19.8% were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 37 years. For every 100 females, there were 91.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 86.8 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $32,500, and the median income for a family was $44,500. Males had a median income of $32,125 versus $23,393 for females. The per capita income for the city was $17,949. About 11.2% of families and 12.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 14.0% of those under age 18 and 11.8% of those age 65 or over. 
Winfield is home to the Winfield-Mt. Union Community School District.  WMU is classified as a 1A school. Their football team has been 8-player since 2015. Their mascot is the Wolves, and is a member of the Southeast Iowa Superconference (SEISC) North Division. 
The travel writer Bill Bryson, in his book The Lost Continent: Travels in Small-Town America, visits Winfield while retracing his childhood family holidays. His grandparents had lived there on a small farm; his grandfather was a postman.  Bryson again fondly recalls his childhood visits in detail in his 2006 memoir, The Life and Times of the Thunderbolt Kid. 
Blue Lake provides public access along its entire shore. The public is allowed to access Highlands Hammock State Park and therefore Blue Lake daily from dawn to dusk. There is no information about the types of fish in this lake. A parking area and four shelter houses with picnic tables are on the northwest side of Blue Lake. 
Sometimes this lake is confused with another Blue Lake, which is located just north of Lake Placid, Florida, further south and also in Highlands County. 
Scleropogon is a monotypic genus of grass which includes the sole species Scleropogon brevifolius, or burrograss. This grass is found in two areas of the world, in North America from the southwestern United States to central Mexico and in South America in Chile and Argentina. This is a perennial mat-forming grass with sharp, tufted leaves and firm awns. This grass may be dioecious, with staminate and pistillate plants growing in separate colonies. 
Rep played for Slovenia under-19 through qualifications for the 2009 UEFA European Under-19 Championship where he scored five out of six Slovenia goals in the final phase of qualifications, including a hat-trick against Russia. He also scored against the Netherlands and Belarus. 
Rep was born in Rogatec and started to play football at a local club when he was six years old. He is a declared NK Maribor supporter as he started to support the team during 1999 when the club was playing in the group stages of the UEFA Champions League. 
Leiostyla corneocostata is a species of land snail in the family Lauriidae known commonly as the Madeiran land snail. It is endemic to Porto Santo Island in the Madeira archipelago. 
This species is limited to a range of about 6 square kilometers on a single island. It lives in coastal habitat in the sea spray zone where it lives in rock cracks and under vegetation. The population is likely stable, but the species is threatened by development of the beach areas near its habitat. 
Ricard remained in Parliament as an opposition MP through the 1965 and 1968 general elections, and retired from politics in 1972. 
Sirous was born in Montreal, Quebec and graduated from the University of Montreal in 2008. Between 2008 and 2011, she worked as a freelance writer for many French Canadian magazines and websites. During those years, Sandra Sirois also travelled around the world and visited more than 30 countries. 
In 2020, Sandra Sirois hosted a documentary series about the issues of period around the world in France.  
Dirk Christian Baltzly (born 1963) is an Australian philosopher and Professor of Philosophy at the University of Tasmania. He is known for his research on ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy. Baltzly is a Fellow of the Australian Academy of Humanities (2008). 
Remains of the first Cyprus Dwarf Elephant were discovered and documented by Dorothea Bate in 1902. She found the fossilized bones of the elephant in a cave in the Kyrenia hills of Cyprus. The species is also known under its synonym Elephas cypriotes. 
Finds of whole or partial skeletons of this elephant are very rare. The first recorded find was by Dorothea Bate in a cave in the Kyrenia hills of Cyprus in 1902, described in a paper for the Royal Society in 1903 and in a later paper for Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society of London in 1905. 
This geographical article about a location in Kalecik, Ankara, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The OpenWebNet protocol allows a "high-level" interaction between a remote unit and Bus SCS of MyHome domotic system. The latest protocol evolution has been improved to allow interaction with well-known home automation systems like KNX and DMX512-A system, by using appropriate gateways. 
The protocol is thought to be independent from the used technology. For example, it is possible to use a supervisor software connected via Ethernet, via serial RS-232 or via USB to a gateway that is directly connected to a domotic system. 
Everyone can require protocol message extension. It is enough to propose your own RFC. It will be examined and disclosed if it respects  OpenWebNet syntax. 
An OpenWebNet message is structured with variable length fields separated by the special character '*' and closed by '##'. 
It characterizes an action to do or a status to read. For every WHO (and therefore for every function) there is a specific WHAT table. 
Example of actions: switch ON light, dimmer to 75%, switch DOWN shutter, radio ON, etc.  Example of status: light ON, active alarm, battery unload, etc. 
It characterizes the set of objects to which the OpenWebNet message is referred. It can be a single object, a group of objects, a specific environment, the entire system, etc. 
Is a range of value that characterizes the dimension of the object to which the message is referred. For every WHO (and therefore for every function) there is a specific DIMENSION table. 
There are two typologies of gateways that allow a connection to the field bus by using different standard protocols: 
The current implementation by BTicino is also an embedded web server. It works as a translator between OpenWebNet messages via TCP/IP and the SCS messages transmitted on the SCS bus. 
The gateway is an interface that works as a translator between the OpenWebNet messages transmitted on USB or serial and the SCS messages transmitted on the SCS bus. 
Du Plessis was born on 24 November 1919 in Steynsburg, in the Eastern Cape. He was the nephew of Nic du Plessis, a Springbok who toured to New Zealand in 1921 and gained 5 caps over a three-year career. 
As a 19-year-old Felix Du Plessis was selected for the first Northern Transvaal team ever, when that union was formed in 1938. His teammate and captain was Danie Craven. He enlisted voluntarily during World War II. 
The men's horizontal bar event at the 2020 Summer Olympics was held on 24 July and 3 August 2021 at the Ariake Gymnastics Centre. Approximately 70 gymnasts from 35 nations (of the 98 total gymnasts) competed on the horizontal bar in the qualifying round. 
This was the 25th appearance of the event, which is one of the five apparatus events held every time there were apparatus events at the Summer Olympics (no apparatus events were held in 1900, 1908, 1912, or 1920). 
A National Olympic Committee (NOC) could enter up to 6 qualified gymnasts: a team of 4 and up to 2 specialists. A total of 98 quota places are allocated to men's gymnastics. 
The 12 teams that qualify will be able to send 4 gymnasts in the team competition, for a total of 48 of the 98 quota places. The top three teams at the 2018 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships (China, Russia, and Japan) and the top nine teams (excluding those already qualified) at the 2019 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships (Ukraine, Great Britain, Switzerland, the United States, Chinese Taipei, South Korea, Brazil, Spain, and Germany) earned team qualification places. 
Each of the 98 qualified gymnasts are eligible for the pommel horse competition, but many gymnasts do not compete in each of the apparatus events. 
The COVID-19 pandemic delayed many of the events for qualifying for gymnastics. The 2018 and 2019 World Championships were completed on time, but many of the World Cup series events were delayed into 2021. 
The top 8 qualifiers in the qualification phase (limit two per NOC) advance to the apparatus final. The finalists perform an additional exercise. Qualification scores are then ignored, with only final round scores counting. 
The competition is held over two days, 24 July and 3 August. The qualifying round (for all men's gymnastics events) is the first day; the apparatus final is on the second day. 
Only two gymnasts from each country may advance to the event final. No gymnasts were excluded from the final or as reserves because of the quota. 
WGOW-FM (102.3 MHz) is a commercial FM radio station licensed to Soddy-Daisy, Tennessee, and serving the Chattanooga metropolitan area.  It is owned by Cumulus Media, and broadcasts a talk radio format.  Cumulus also owns WGOW 1150 AM, which simulcasts some shows shared with 102.3 WGOW-FM, but has its own talk schedule most of the day.  The radio studios and offices are on Pineville Drive in Chattanooga. 
WGOW-FM has an effective radiated power (ERP) of 6,000 watts.  The transmitter is off Caves Springs Road in Chattanooga, near Chickamauga Creek. 
Weekdays begin with a local news and information show, "The Morning Press," hosted by Jim Reynolds, Kevin West and Brian Joyce.  Late mornings feature a talk show from Brad Giese and a local sports talk show airs in afternoon drive time, hosted by Scott McMahen and Joe Varner.  The rest of the schedule is made up of nationally syndicated talk shows:  Dave Ramsey, Free Talk Live, Armstrong & Getty and Red Eye Radio. 
Weekends feature shows on money, health, movies, the outdoors and cars.  Weekend programs include Jim Bohannon and Tom Sullivan.  WGOW is an affiliate of the Tennessee Titans Radio Network.  Most hours begin with world and national news from ABC Radio News. 
The 102.3 frequency was started in 1977 as WZDQ.  It then became Kicks briefly, followed by Choo Choo 102 playing The Music of Your Life.  It then became Fox 102 at Four Squares in Chattanooga. 
In January 1994, some of the WGOW talk hosts switched to the Eastgate FM station, which was 102.7, but later on that year, WGOW's parent company bought them, and installed the talk format on 102.3, and most of those hosts returned to the WGOW tent. After the change 102.7 became Fox 102, and aired a classic rock format that 102.3 had previously aired. The station remained at Eastgate Mall sharing office and studio space with 102.7 WBDX until 1996 when they moved to studios in Moccasin Bend. 
The SS Morro Castle was a passenger ship build in 1899 for the Ward Line Company. She was launched in April 14, 1900 and was named after the fortress of the same name, at the entrance to the Havana Bay, Cuba. On 14 May 1904 she sank the schooner Pleiades in a collision at sea after leaving New York for Havana. She was active during the Mexican Revolution. In 1924, the ship was retired in Brooklyn and In 1926, the ship was Sold for scrap in Italy. 
After the completion of the Morro Castle, William Cramp & Sons delivered the ship to Ward Line in October 1900. On November 10, 1900, she set sail on her maiden voyage from, New York city to Havana. The command was the Ward Line commodore, Captain Cleveland Downs. Robert R. Willmott later became the ship's long-time captain. He later also took command of the second Morro Castle. 
On May 16, 1904, the Morro Castle rammed the schooner Pleiades of the Fulton Fish Market off the coast of New Jersey, which sank as a result. The passenger liner rescued Captain Henry Ness and the other 17 crew members of the schooner. She was acquired by the US navy for the Mexican Revolution and World War 1. In 1924 the ship was Laid up in Brooklyn and shortly thereafter In 1926 the ship was scrapped in Italy. 
This article about a specific civilian ship or boat is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Polish Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress is an annual award given to the best supporting actress in Polish movie. 
Jeffrey Scott Schaefer (born May 31, 1960 in Patchogue, New York) is an American former professional baseball utility infielder. He played all or part of five seasons in the majors between 1989 and 1994. Of the 225 games Schaefer played in the majors, about half (110) were at shortstop, with most of the rest at third base (81) or second base (25). 
Schaefer was inducted into the Suffolk Sports Hall of Fame on Long Island, New York, in the Baseball Category with the Class of 2010. 
This biographical article relating to a baseball infielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Judolia cordifera is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Olivier in 1795. 
Damon was headquartered in Kansas City, Missouri. Damon used musicians and singers who were not members of the American Federation of Musicians labor union to make recordings during the ban on Union recordings ordered by James Petrillo. 
In May 1948, the singing duo of Jon and Sondra Steele released "My Happiness" on Damon Records, a fact that was acknowledged on sheet music promoting the song. One of the better known artists with Damon was big band bandleader Al Trace. The Al Trace Orchestra recorded for major labels in the 1940s in addition to Damon. Trace was a writer on several popular songs, including "If I'd Known You Were Coming I'd Have Baked a Cake." 
The label was still in existence up to at least 1960, when a rock 'n' roll group from Pittsburg, Kan., Conny and the Bellhops, had a regional hit with a 45 titled "Shot Rod," an instrumental on the Damon label. 
The Titumir is currently under the command of the Commander Khulna Naval Area  (COMKHUL). About 2500 personnel serve at Titumir, which is one of the largest bases in the Bangladesh Navy. It also provides some naval training.  Some training schools located here are 
This biographical article related to association football in the Czech Republic, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Asteiidae is a small but widespread family of acalyptrate flies or Diptera. About 130 species in 10 genera have been described worldwide. They are rarely collected. 
Sabrosky, C.W., 1943. New genera and species of Asteiidae (Diptera), with a review of the family in the Americas. Annals of the Entomological Society of America: 36(3):501-514. Available online at the Core Historical Literature of Agriculture, Albert R. Mann Library, Cornell University. 
Sabrosky, C.W., 1956. Additions to the knowledge of Old World Asteiidae.Revue francaise d'entomologie (Nouvelle Serie) 23:216-243. 
Canning Half Tide Dock on the River Mersey, in Liverpool, England, is a half tide dock and is part of the Port of Liverpool. It is situated in the southern dock system, connected to Canning Dock to the east and Albert Dock to the south. 
The dock was originally the site of the Gut, the entrance to the Dry Dock which was later to become Canning Dock. Canning Half Tide Dock was built by Jesse Hartley between 1842 and 1844, also opening in 1844. 
Adjacent to the dock is the Pilotage Building, which opened in 1883 to manage the river's pilot boats. The building was converted in 1980 by the Building Design Partnership for use as a museum. Both this building and the dock itself are now part of Merseyside Maritime Museum. 
Richard Johnson (born 19 December 1985) is an English professional rugby league footballer who played in the 2000s. He has played for the Bradford Bulls and on loan from the Bradford Bulls at Wollongong. 
Johnson was born in Oldham, Greater Manchester, England. He is one of three rugby playing brothers, who have all donned the Bulls shirt at Academy level. Richard joined Bradford Bulls straight from school and has been there for the last six years. 
Leaving Muldoon he next joined Jack Kilrain, a former heavy weight boxing champion and from whom he learned to box. Aged 17 Bankier joined Buffalo Bill's Wild West, a circus-like attraction that toured annually.  From there he joined the Ginnett Circus for three months, performing as 'Carl Clyndon'. 
Next he joined the Bostock Circus, known at that time for having the best performers and acts, and here he polished and honed his strongman skills, part of his new act involving harness-lifting a full grown elephant weighing 32cwt and balancing on the backs of two chairs while raising a man with his right hand above his head while juggling plates with his left. 
In 2019, the History Channel's The Strongest Man in History dedicated an episode entitled "Strongmen Go West"; traveling to Cody, Wyoming and recreating several original feats made famous by Bankier. 
Newington High School is a public high school located in Newington, Connecticut, on Route 174/Willard Avenue.  Its address is 605 Willard Avenue.  All students in the town of Newington seeking a public high school education attend Newington High School. 
The connectors the USB committee specifies support a number of USB's underlying goals, and reflect lessons learned from the many connectors the computer industry has used. The female connector mounted on the host or device is called the receptacle, and the male connector attached to the cable is called the plug. The official USB specification documents also periodically define the term male to represent the plug, and female to represent the receptacle. 
By design, it is difficult to insert a USB plug into its receptacle incorrectly. The USB specification requires that the cable plug and receptacle be marked so the user can recognize the proper orientation. The USB-C plug however is reversible. USB cables and small USB devices are held in place by the gripping force from the receptacle, with no screws, clips, or thumb-turns as other connectors use. 
The different A and B plugs prevent accidentally connecting two power sources. However, some of this directed topology is lost with the advent of multi-purpose USB connections (such as USB On-The-Go in smartphones, and USB-powered Wi-Fi routers), which require A-to-A, B-to-B, and sometimes Y/splitter cables. See the USB On-The-Go connectors section below for a more detailed summary description. 
There are cables with A plugs on both ends, which may be valid if the cable includes, for example, a USB host-to-host transfer device with two ports. 
The standard connectors were designed to be more robust than many past connectors. This is because USB is hot-swappable, and the connectors would be used more frequently, and perhaps with less care, than previous connectors. 
In standard USB, the electrical contacts in a USB connector are protected by an adjacent plastic tongue, and the entire connecting assembly is usually protected by an enclosing metal shell. 
The shell on the plug makes contact with the receptacle before any of the internal pins. The shell is typically grounded, to dissipate static electricity and to shield the wires within the connector. 
The USB standard specifies tolerances for compliant USB connectors to minimize physical incompatibilities in connectors from different vendors. The USB specification also defines limits to the size of a connecting device in the area around its plug, so that adjacent ports are not blocked. Compliant devices must either fit within the size restrictions or support a compliant extension cable that does. 
USB 2.0 uses two wires for power (VBUS and GND), and two for differential serial data signals. Mini and micro connectors have their GND connections moved from pin #4 to pin #5, while their pin #4 serves as an ID pin for the On-The-Go host/client identification. 
The thinner Micro-USB connectors were intended to replace the Mini connectors in devices manufactured since May 2007, including smartphones, personal digital assistants, and cameras. 
Micro-USB was endorsed as the standard connector for data and power on mobile devices by the cellular phone carrier group Open Mobile Terminal Platform (OMTP) in 2007. 
Micro-USB was embraced as the "Universal Charging Solution" by the International Telecommunication Union (ITU) in October 2009. 
USB 3.0 introduced Type-A SuperSpeed plugs and receptacles as well as micro-sized Type-B SuperSpeed plugs and receptacles. The 3.0 receptacles are backward-compatible with the corresponding pre-3.0 plugs. 
USB cables exist with various combinations of plugs on each end of the cable, as displayed below in the USB cables matrix. 
USB On-The-Go (OTG) introduces the concept of a device performing both master and slave roles. All current OTG devices are required to have one, and only one, USB connector: a Micro-AB receptacle. (In the past, before the development of Micro-USB, On-The-Go devices used Mini-AB receptacles). 
The Micro-AB receptacle is capable of accepting both Micro-A and Micro-B plugs, attached to any of the legal cables and adapters as defined in revision 1.01 of the Micro-USB specification. 
To enable Type-AB receptacles to distinguish which end of a cable is plugged in, plugs have an "ID" pin in addition to the four contacts in standard-size USB connectors. This ID pin is connected to GND in Type-A plugs, and left unconnected in Type-B plugs. Typically, a pull-up resistor in the device is used to detect the presence or absence of an ID connection. 
OTG devices attached either to a peripheral-only B-device or a standard/embedded host have their role fixed by the cable, since in these scenarios it is only possible to attach the cable one way.[citation needed] 
Manufacturers of personal electronic devices might not include a USB standard connector on their product for technical or marketing reasons. Some manufacturers such as Apple provide proprietary cables that permit their devices to physically connect to a USB standard port. Full functionality of proprietary ports and cables with USB standard ports is not assured; for example, some devices only use the USB connection for battery charging and do not implement any data transfer functions. 
Upstream USB connectors supply power at a nominal 5V DC via the V_BUS pin to downstream USB devices. 
Unlike USB 2.0 and USB 3.2, USB4 does not define its own VBUS-based power model. Power for USB4 operation is established and managed as defined in the USB Type-C Specification and the USB PD Specification. 
USB Battery Charging (BC) defines a charging port, which may be a charging downstream port (CDP), with data, or a dedicated charging port (DCP) without data. Dedicated charging ports can be found on USB power adapters to run attached devices and battery packs. Charging ports on a host with both kinds will be labelled. 
Since these currents are larger than in the original standard, the extra voltage drop in the cable reduces noise margins, causing problems with High Speed signaling. Battery Charging Specification 1.1 specifies that charging devices must dynamically limit bus power current draw during High Speed signaling; 1.2 specifies that charging devices and ports must be designed to tolerate the higher ground voltage difference in High Speed signaling. 
Portable devices having a USB On-The-Go port may want to charge and access a USB peripheral simultaneously, yet having only a single port (both due to On-The-Go and space requirement) prevents this. Accessory charging adapters (ACA) are devices that provide portable charging power to an On-The-Go connection between host and peripheral. 
The intent is to permit uniformly charging laptops, tablets, USB-powered disks and similarly higher-power consumer electronics, as a natural extension of existing European and Chinese mobile telephone charging standards. This may also affect the way electric power used for small devices is transmitted and used in both residential and public buildings. The standard is designed to coexist with the previous USB Battery Charging specification. 
On 8 January 2018 USB-IF announced "Certified USB Fast Charger" logo for chargers that use "Programmable Power Supply" (PPS) protocol from the USB Power Delivery 3.0 specification. 
In May 2021, the USB PD promoter group launched revision 3.1 of the specification.  Revision 3.1 adds Extended Power Range mode which allows higher voltages of 28, 36, and 48 volts, providing up to 240 watts of power (48V at 5A), and the "Adjustable Voltage Supply" (AVS) protocol which allows specifying the voltage from a range of 15 to 48 V in 100 mV steps. 
In September 2007, the Open Mobile Terminal Platform group (a forum of mobile network operators and manufacturers such as Nokia, Samsung, Motorola, Sony Ericsson, and LG) announced that its members had agreed on Micro-USB as the future common connector for mobile devices. 
His first piece of journalism in Australia was his coverage of the 1987 America's Cup for the Australian Financial Review, a paper for which he continued to write for most of his career. It was his satirical column in this paper that brought recognition, leading Roger Johnstone (chief executive of the Financial Review Group) to praise him as a "one of a kind in Australian journalism". 
After his death, a collection of his columns between November 1993 and April 2011 was published as a book in Men are Stupid, Woman are Crazy. 
At the time of his death, Ruehl lived in the eastern Sydney suburb of Clovelly with his wife and their three children, Mercedes, John and Tom. According to colleague Colleen Ryan, Ruehl had a few close select friends and "could be quite introverted", preferring to spend time with his family or writing. 
This geographical article about a location in Mersin Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Slovak boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
OSADL was founded on December 8, 2005. It was assigned the cooperative register number 440085 at the Stuttgart, Germany, District Court in August 2006. 
OSADL is a member of OPC Foundation which governs the OPC UA industrial automation standard, in which the lab is also involved. 
Over time a number of working groups has been established and projects participated in, this lists some of the more prominent: 
The relevance of the Linux operating system for embedded systems and OSADL's role to foster its real-time capabilities are recognized. 
This article about a Japanese politician born in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The elections had originally been scheduled for 1962 but after being postponed, they took place amid widespread unrest; political detentions were common and public meetings were banned. The major political parties, including the People's Socialist Party (PSP), all boycotted the elections. 
Despite the boycott, voter turnout was 76%. A man imprisoned in the 1963 airport grenade attack against the British delegation received 98% of the vote in Crater, and 14 of the other 16 elected council members successfully demanded that he be released from prison and seated on the council. Zain Baharoon initially continued as Chief Minister, but was replaced by the PSP's Abdulqawi Makkawi in March 1965. 
Voodoo-Murders (stylised in all capital letters), or more simply as VDM, is a professional wrestling stable, best known as the main heel group in All Japan Pro Wrestling between 2005 and 2011. In 2013, the group was reformed in Diamond Ring. They are famous for their violent actions and lack of respect for their opponents. 
Things continued to get worse as Kojima returned from injury and decided to form his own stable with KAI and Hiroshi Yamato Later, Shuji Kondo also decided to leave the group and return to the All Japan Seikigun. Despite these setbacks, Taru would rebuild and in the fall, recruited top gaijin Joe Doering and veteran wrestler Nobukazu Hirai. Doering would team up with Zodiac as the Voodoo Towers, whilst Hirai was renamed to Hate. 
After Zodiac's departure, the group would have a slump for the rest of the year as they lost to F4 in a Captain's Fall Elimination Match on September 23, 2009, Taru and Doering then failed to win the All Asia Tag Team Championship on October 24, Hate failed to win the Jr. Heavyweight Title on October 25, and Taru and Doering placed last at the World's Strongest Tag Determination League due to Doering suffering from the flu. 
Kingsley Holgate (born 28 February 1946 in Natal) is a South African explorer, humanitarian and author. A fellow of the Royal Geographical Society, he has been described by Getaway Magazine as "the most travelled man in Africa" and has modelled himself on David Livingstone. Holgate has also written several books about his expeditions and fronted several National Geographic documentaries. 
Holgate's expeditions are rarely completed on his own, notably they usually involve him travelling with other members of his family including his partner Sheelagh and son Ross. 
Michigan's 58th House of Representatives district (also referred to as Michigan's 58th House district) is a legislative district within the Michigan House of Representatives located in Branch County and Hillsdale County. The district was created in 1965, when the Michigan House of Representatives district naming scheme changed from a county-based system to a numerical one. 
Gaylon Moore (born June 15, 1978) is an American professional basketball player, who most recently played for the Plymouth Raiders in the British Basketball League. 
The 6'7" Forward born in Union City, Tennessee was a star center for Gibson County High School from 1992 to 1996 and attended Union University in Jackson, Tennessee on   a basketball scholarship from 1996 to 2000.  Moore spent just one season with the BBL team where he only played three games. From 2001 to 2005, Moore played with leading EBL team Worthing Thunder where he caught the attention of many bigger clubs. 
Plymouth Raiders coach Gary Stronach, a long-time admirer of Moore's, was the first to step in and the EBL Player of the Year 2003 joined the Raiders in the summer of 2005. Moore was awarded Raiders' MVP award, which was voted by the fans, for the 2006/07 season, in only his second season at the club. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball player, coach, or other figure born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2018 Team Bath netball season saw Team Bath finish fourth  in the 2018 Netball Superleague regular season. They subsequently lost to Wasps in a play-off semi-final. During their pre-season, Team Bath also played in the inaugural Fast5 Netball All-Stars Championship and finished as runners up after losing the final to Loughborough Lightning. 
On 24 September 2017, Team Bath played in the inaugural Fast5 Netball All-Stars Championship. Team Bath reached the final but lost to Loughborough Lightning. 
On 6 January 2018 Team Bath hosted and won a three team tournament which also featured Severn Stars and Wasps. The tournament was broadcast live on BBC Sport. 
Team Bath played three games at the 2018 Mike Greenwood Trophy tournament but failed to register a win. Traditionally a pre-season tournament, the 2018 event, was switched to April this season to act as a warm-up for the restart of the 2018 Netball Superleague season, following the five-week Commonwealth Games break. 
It becomes apparent that Jody hasn't left his store for months on end, rarely going outside and rather having things brought to him. Carl has placed the chairs in his store in hopes that Jody will realize that there are things going on in their community, and as a member Jody must bear witness and help the problem, rather than shun the world. 
 The most recent revival of the play by New York City's Keen Company was positively reviewed by several newspapers. Reviewers seemed to agree that Burton and McGrath were brilliant choices for the revival, commenting on their ability to bring the perfect amount of life and humour to the piece. Their performances also carried the nuance and weight of the play well, results in an emotional touch that "sneaks up on you to devastating effect."
Crimson Sabre is a Hong Kong television series adapted from Louis Cha's novel Sword Stained with Royal Blood. The series was first broadcast on TVB in Hong Kong in 2000. 
The second edition (1956), comprises two volumes, 20 main chapters and 110 sub-chapters. The author focuses on World History from a European perspective, and the newer editions also exists under the title "A History of Europe in the Modern World". 
Content of the second edition, Note:  Swedish translation re-translated. Although this double translation may differ in some words or formulations, from the American English original, this illustrates the content and structure of R.R. Palmer's work. 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
NBA Jam, also known as NBA Jam 2004, is a 3-on-3 basketball video game published by Acclaim Entertainment for the PlayStation 2 and Xbox in 2003. It is part of the NBA Jam series. The game was announced on May 12, 2003. The play-by-play is voiced by Tim Kitzrow. There was also originally to be a GameCube version of the game. 
NBA Jam would also be the last Jam game released until Electronic Arts revived the franchise with its 2010 NBA Jam game. 
The game received "average" reviews on both platforms according to the review aggregation website Metacritic. 
Charles Martel appointed him to these offices, during his tenure of which Teutsind distinguished himself by conveying abbey properties to members of the local nobility in order to ensure their support for the king. 
He is generally considered a poor abbot, in that he pursued the king's political agenda to the detriment of the abbeys in his charge, running down their finances and offending benefactors and his fellow clerics. 
This biographical article about a French religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Todd Atwater (born March 9, 1966) is an American politician who served in the South Carolina House of Representatives from the 87th district from 2010 to 2018. 
In the 2018 South Carolina primary election, Atwater ran against Alan Wilson for the Republican nomination for Attorney General. Atwater finished second to Wilson, forcing a run-off election on June 26, 2018. In the run-off, Atwater lost to Wilson. 
Until 18 July 2020, Zelenyi Hai belonged to Borova Raion. The raion was abolished in July 2020 as part of the administrative reform of Ukraine, which reduced the number of raions of Kharkiv Oblast to seven. The area of Borova Raion was merged into Izium Raion. 
This biography article about a member of the German Free Democratic Party (FDP) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Bahraini association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joseph Haydn's composed the Concerto per il Clarino (Hob. VIIe/1) (Trumpet Concerto in E-flat major) in 1796 for his long-time friend, the trumpet virtuoso Anton Weidinger. Joseph Haydn was 64 years of age. A favourite of the trumpet repertoire, it has been cited as "possibly Haydn's most popular concerto". Although written in 1796, Weidinger first performed the concerto four years later on March 28, 1800. 
There were attempts all over Europe around the mid-classical era to expand the range of the trumpet using valves, but Weidinger's idea of drilling holes and covering them with flute-like keys was not a success as it had very poor sound quality. Thus the natural trumpet still had continual use in the classical orchestra while the keyed trumpet had barely any repertoire. The valved trumpets used today were first constructed and used in the 1830s. 
The work is composed in three movements (typical of a Classical period concerto), they are marked as follows: 
In addition to the solo trumpet, the concerto is scored for an orchestra consisting of 2 flutes, 2 oboes, 2 bassoons, 2 horns, 2 (presumably natural) trumpets (which generally play in support of the horns or timpani rather than the solo trumpet), timpani, and strings. 
Lucius Edward William Plantagenet Cary, 15th Viscount of Falkland (born 8 May 1935), styled Master of Falkland from 1961 to 1984, is a British nobleman and politician. 
Cary is the eldest of four children, and the only son of Lucius Cary, 14th Viscount of Falkland, and Constance Mary Berry, daughter of Captain Edward Berry. The Viscount of Falkland is the senior viscountcy in the peerage of Scotland, created in 1620 by King James VI. 
Cary was educated at Wellington College in Berkshire, and was formerly an officer in the Hussars.[citation needed] 
The Viscount married Caroline Anne Butler, daughter of Lieut-Cmdr George Butler, in 1962; they were divorced in 1990. They have four children: 
Deborah Swift (born 1955), who has also written  as Davina Blake, is an English writer of historical fiction, based in north west Lancashire. 
Her first published novel was The Lady's Slipper (2010), which alludes to the lady's slipper orchid found in the Silverdale area near her home. Levens Hall features as one of the locations of the book, which is set in 1660 and involves the persecution of local Quakers. 
The Gilded Lily (2012) follows some of the same characters but moves the location to London and considers aspects of beauty and cosmetics. 
A Divided Inheritance (2013) starts in London in 1609 but the action moves to Seville during the expulsion of the Moors and reflects this turbulent period of European history. 
Swift's Shadow on the Highway (2014) is the first of The Highway Trilogy of young adult novels, and is based on the life of highwaywoman Katherine Fanshawe, also known as Lady Katherine Ferrers. The second in the trilogy, Spirit of the Highway (2015) is told in the voice of the ghost of a roundhead farmer's son who loved Katherine. Lady of the Highway (2016) completes the trilogy. 
Past Encounters (2014), published under the name Davina Blake, is a story set in Carnforth which features the filming of Brief Encounter at Carnforth railway station in 1944 and uncovers a husband's wartime secrets. 
Pleasing Mr Pepys (2017) is a " re-imagining of the events" from the diary of Samuel Pepys. It forms a trilogy with A Plague on Mr Pepys (2018) and Entertaining Mr Pepys (2019). 
This drug article relating to the genito-urinary system is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In IBM mainframe operating systems, queued sequential access method (QSAM) is an access method to read and write datasets sequentially. QSAM is available on OS/360, OS/VS2, MVS, z/OS, and related operating systems. 
QSAM is used both for devices that are naturally sequential, such as punched card readers and punches and line printers, and for data on devices that could also be addressed directly, such as magnetic disks. QSAM offers device independence: to the extent possible, the same API calls are used for different devices. 
Indeed, QSAM manages truncated final blocks and truncated embedded blocks completely transparently to the user. 
The QSAM application program interface can be compared with the interface offered by open, read, write and close calls (using file handles) in other operating systems such as Unix and Windows. 
Anthodon (meaning "flower tooth") is an extinct genus of pareiasaurid parareptile from the Permian period of South Africa and Tanzania. 
Richard Owen, who described Anthodon, thought it was a dinosaur because dinosaurian skull material from the Early Cretaceous had become associated with the Permian material. The dinosaur material was later separated out by Robert Broom in 1912 and was renamed as the stegosaurid Paranthodon by Franz Nopcsa in 1929. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus was the name of several Roman men who lived during the early Roman Empire. They were descendants of Orfitus who was adopted by Servius Cornelius Scipio, an otherwise unknown member of the patrician branch of the Cornelii Scipiones.  
There were at least six members of this family who used this name, all direct male descendants of the earliest known member of this branch, the consul of 51. Except for the first two generations, little is known about any of them. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus was ordinary consul in AD 51 as the colleague of the emperor Claudius. He was one of the victims of the delator Marcus Aquilius Regulus during the reign of Nero. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus was a suffect consul in some year prior to 87; his colleague has not been identified. He was the son of the consul of AD 51. He was also a victim of imperial suspicion, and was first banished to an island by the emperor Domitian then later executed. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus is known through inscriptions to have been proconsul of Africa in 163/164. From this it can be inferred that this Orfitus was suffect consul around 146. It is surmised he was the son of the consul of 110. 
It was assumed at one point that this Orfitus was also the ordinary consul of 149, but more recent research has identified that Orfitus as Lucius Sergius Salvidienus Scipio Orfitus, a member of the gens Sergia. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus was ordinary consul in AD 178 with Decimus Velius Rufus as his colleague. He is known only through consular dating; it is surmised he was the son of the previous Orfitus. 
Servius Cornelius Scipio Salvidienus Orfitus was a member of the Salii Palatinii an ancient Roman priesthood for the years 189 and 190. It is surmised he was the son of the previous Orfitus. There is no record of this Orfitus acceding to the consulate; while this may indicate that he died before the age of 31 or 32, the earliest point a Patrician could be a consul, attestations of suffect consul become much more scarce after 180 and evidence of his consulate may simply await recovery. 
The Hits Re-Imagined is a studio album by American country singer-songwriter Bill Anderson. It was released on July 24, 2020 through TWI Records. It was co-produced by Anderson and Thomm Jutz. His 45th studio recording in his career, The Hits features a re-working of his former hits as well as compositions that had been hits for other country artists. 
The Hits Re-Imagined was officially released on July 24, 2020. It was Anderson's 45th studio album and 73rd album in his career, overall. The album was made available for pre-ordering in the weeks preceding its intended release. In early July 2020, "Give It Away" was released as a digital download in promotion for the album's release. 
This article related to a location in Madhya Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chris Morris is a music writer based in Los Angeles, California. He is known for his coverage of L.A.'s independent scene in the 1970s and 1980s, which made him "a central voice in Left Coast music journalism." He has also written well-received books on Los Lobos and Bob Dylan. 
Morris showed that his knowledge extended more broadly in writing for Rolling Stone about Uprising, the last album that Bob Marley released in his lifetime. That was also evidenced by his 1981 feature on Echo and the Bunnymen. 
Morris contributed a bi-weekly column, "Sonic Nation," to the alternative weekly LA CityBeat.  His writing has also appeared in the Los Angeles Times, Spin, Mojo, LA Weekly, Chicago Reader, and other publications. 
He served as a DJ on KDLD, hosting a show devoted to roots music called "Watusi Rodeo" during the station's years under the "Indie 103.1" format in the first decade of the 2000s. After it was canceled, the show resurfaced on Scion Radio 17 from Scion Audio/Visual. 
As an authority on L.A.'s indie scene, Morris was chosen to write liner notes for several compilations and reissues of works by pivotal bands of the era. They included: 
An especially colorful example of his words may be found in the liner notes for Pigus Drunkus Maximus (1987), the only album from Top Jimmy & The Rhythm Pigs, another band central to that scene. 
Morris annotated Rhino Records' punk rock boxed set No Thanks! The '70s Punk Rebellion (2003). In 2004, he received a 47th Annual Grammy Awards nomination for best album notes. 
His book Los Lobos: Dream in Blue was published by University of Texas Press in 2015. It was the first book-length critical history of the veteran band from East L.A. The Lincoln Journal-Star called it "a much needed, insightful look." Record Collector News observed that Morris was the ideal teller of this tale. Latin American Music Review cited its "journalistic, accessible style" and viewed it as an excellent companion text for other studies of Mexican-American popular music. 
The following year brought the release of Together Through Life: A Personal Journey with the Music of Bob Dylan (Rothco Press). American Songwriter called Morris a gifted writer and the book "an enlightening exploration." 
Homedahl is an abandoned townsite in sections 29 and 30 of Seely Township in Faribault County, Minnesota, United States. 
The town was originally settled by the Osul Haaland family, Norwegian immigrants.  Rasmus O. Haaland was the first postmaster, and named the post office in honor of a "[remembered] location in Norway."  The village had a station  of the Chicago, Rock Island and Pacific Railroad, and the post office lasted from 1877 to 1904. 
This article about a location in Faribault County, Minnesota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Schwartz is also in his second term as President of the World Health Academy, serving from 2011 to 2012 and 2014 to present, and has been active on National Institutes of Health study sections since 2004. Schwartz has served as Faculty President of the Rutgers New Jersey Medical School in 1993 and 1995 and as Chairman of its Committee on Appointments and Promotions twice. 
Schwartz joined the Trump administration as a member of the Presidential Advisory Council on HIV/AIDS in 2019. 
In 1984, Schwartz married Camila Krysicka, a dermatologist and academic. Their son Edmund Janniger was an advisor to Polish Defence Minister Antoni Macierewicz for a short period of time in 2015. 
Currently the AJS review is published by Cambridge University Press. It is edited by Alyssa Gray and James Loeffler. 
This article about an academic journal on Judaic studies is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
After all schools had to be closed as of March 2020 to control the spread of COVID-19, the UAE Ministry of Education turned to distance learning for all academic levels. 
The UAE Ministry of Education installed in March 2020 a FOR-A HVS-1200 video switcher at its headquarters in Ajman to drive a virtual studio system for distance learning programs, which has become essential due to the COVID-19 pandemic. 
Cloud seeding in the United Arab Emirates is a strategy used by the government to address water challenges in the country. The United Arab Emirates is one of the first countries in the Persian Gulf region to use cloud seeding technology. It adopted the latest technologies available on a global level, using sophisticated weather radar to monitor the atmosphere of the country around the clock. 
The UAE has an arid climate with less than 100mm per year of rainfall, a high evaporation rate of surface water and a low groundwater recharge rate. Although rainfall in the UAE has been fluctuating over the last few decades in winter season, most of that occurs in the December to March period. During the summer months, the prevailing Indian Monsoon drought effect leads to a build-up of cumulus clouds especially along the mountainous terrain in the eastern UAE. 
The UAE cloud-seeding Program was initiated in the late 1990s. By early 2001 the Program was being conducted in cooperation with the National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) in Colorado, USA, the Witwatersrand University in South Africa and the US Space Agency, NASA. 
Tests of new technologies were done in 2020 with partners in the United States to test the use of nanomaterials for seeding. 
A cloud seeding experiment conducted by the UAE National Center of Meteorology & Seismology as part of The UAE Research Program for Rain Enhancement Science in January 2020 resulted in flooding. 
The UAE now has more 75 networked automatic weather stations distributed across the UAE, 7 air quality stations, a sophisticated Doppler weather radar network of five stationary and one mobile radar, and six Beechcraft King Air C90 aircraft for cloud seeding operations. Natural salts such as potassium chloride and sodium chloride are used in these operations. 
Since 2021, the country has been using a new technology: drones equipped with a payload of electric-charge emission instruments and customised sensors fly at low altitudes and deliver an electric charge to air molecules. This method produced a significant rainstorm in July 2021. For instance, in Al Ain it rained 6.9 millimetres on 20 - 21 July 
At present, the UAE mostly seed with salt particles in the eastern mountains on the border to Oman to raise levels in aquifers and reservoirs. 
The United Arab Emirates Research Program for Rain Enhancement Science (UAEREP) is a global research initiative offering a grant of US$5 million over a three-year period to be shared by up to five winning research projects in the field of rain enhancement. 
Attic Greek is the Greek dialect of the ancient region of Attica, including the polis of Athens. Often called classical Greek, it was the prestige dialect of the Greek world for centuries and remains the standard form of the language that is taught to students of ancient Greek. As the basis of the Hellenistic Koine, it is the most similar of the ancient dialects to later Greek. Attic is traditionally classified as a member or sister dialect of the Ionic branch. 
The earliest Greek literature, which is attributed to Homer and is dated to the eighth or seventh centuries BC, is written in "Old Ionic" rather than Attic. Athens and its dialect remained relatively obscure until the establishment of its democracy following the reforms of Solon in the sixth century BC; so began the classical period, one of great Athenian influence both in Greece and throughout the Mediterranean. 
Students who learn Ancient Greek usually begin with the Attic dialect and continue, depending upon their interests, to the later Koine of the New Testament and other early Christian writings, to the earlier Homeric Greek of Homer and Hesiod, or to the contemporaneous Ionic Greek of Herodotus and Hippocrates. 
Attic retained Proto-Greek h- (from debuccalization of Proto-Indo-European initial s- or y-), but some other dialects lost it (psilosis "stripping", "de-aspiration"). 
Attic-Ionic places an n (movable nu) at the end of some words that would ordinarily end in a vowel, if the next word starts with a vowel, to prevent hiatus (two vowels in a row). The movable nu can also be used to turn what would be a short syllable into a long syllable for use in meter. 
Attic Greek grammar follows Ancient Greek grammar to a large extent. References to Attic Grammar are usually in reference to peculiarities and exceptions from Ancient Greek Grammar. This section mentions only some of these Attic peculiarities. 
In addition to singular and plural numbers, Attic Greek had the dual number. This was used to refer to two of something and was present as an inflection in nouns, adjectives, pronouns and verbs (any categories inflected for number). Attic Greek was the last dialect to retain it from older forms of Greek, and the dual number had died out by the end of the 5th century BC. In addition to this, in Attic Greek, any plural neuter subjects will only ever take singular conjugation verbs. 
In the omicron or second declension, mainly masculines (but with some feminines), the stem ends in o or e, which is composed in turn of a root plus the thematic vowel, an o or e in Indo-European ablaut series parallel to similar formations of the verb. It is the equivalent of the Latin second declension. The alternation of Greek -os and Latin -us in the nominative singular is familiar to readers of Greek and Latin. 
In Attic Greek, an original genitive singular ending *-osyo after losing the s (like in the other dialects) lengthens the stem o to the spurious diphthong -ou (see above under Phonology, Vowels): logos "the word" logou from *logosyo "of the word". The dative plural of Attic-Ionic had -oisi, which appears in early Attic but later simplifies to -ois: anthropois "to or for the men". 
Classical Attic may refer either to the varieties of Attic Greek spoken and written in Greek majuscule in the 5th and 4th centuries BC (Classical-era Attic) or to the Hellenistic and Roman  era standardized Attic Greek, mainly on the language of Attic orators and written in Greek uncial.  
BASF planning is headquartered at the University of California, San Francisco.  BASF's founder is former National Academy of Sciences president Bruce Alberts, and its director in 2011 was Kishore Hari.  Principal institutional sponsors have included Chevron, Genentech, and UC San Francisco and funding has been provided in part, from the National Science Foundation. 
John Eason (born July 30, 1945) is a former American football wide receiver. He graduated from Howard High School, a segregated high school in Ocala, Florida, in 1963. He played for the Oakland Raiders in 1968, the BC Lions in 1969 and for the Montreal Alouettes in 1972. He was the athletic directory of Florida A & M University from 2017 to 2019. Eason earned bachelor's and master's degrees at FAMU and a Ph.D. in educational administration From Florida State University in 1987. 
Brunswick Land (German: Braunschweiger Land) is a historical region in the Southeast of the German state of Lower Saxony, centred around the city of Braunschweig. It refers to the core territory of the historic Duchy of Brunswick and its successor, the Free State of Brunswick, which was disestablished in 1946. 
The area stretches from the Harz mountain range in the south along the Oker river down to the Burgdorf-Peine Geest in the North German Plain. The natural landscape includes the Elm, Asse and Salzgitter Hills, the Hainberg and Vorholz ranges in the west, as well as the Harly Forest.  
Today Brunswick Land roughly corresponds to the central parts of the former Lower Saxon Verwaltungsbezirk Braunschweig in its pre-1978 borders, including: 
Away from the main cities, the region encompasses large agricultural areas. The traffic infrastructure relies on numerous railway lines and controlled-access highways such as Bundesautobahn 2 and Bundesautobahn 39. The main employer in the region is Volkswagen headquartered in Wolfsburg. 
Like the tales that refer to Henry the Lion (as rendered by Agostino Steffani's opera Henrico Leone), the legends about the medieval trickster Till Eulenspiegel from Kneitlingen, Brunswick Mum beer, or the alleged foundation of Braunschweig and Dankwarderode Castle by the Brunonid brothers Brun and Dankward, are rich in tradition. The densely forested mountains of the Harz and Elm ranges are the setting of numerous myths and fables. 
The 2015 Chicago aldermanic elections happened on February 24, 2015, to elect the 50 Aldermen that represent Chicago in the City Council. The elections were non-partisan and if no candidate received an absolute majority, a runoff would be held between the top two finishers on April 7, 2015. 
Ward boundaries had been redrawn since the previous 2011 election, to reflect the results of the 2010 United States Census. The new ward map had been approved by the Chicago City Council in January 2012. 
In the first round, two candidates who ran for re-election lost their seats, including Joann Thompson (who died in office, but remained on the ballot). There were runoffs in 18 wards. Six additional incumbent alderman were defeated in runoffs.' 
Incumbent alderman Proco Joe Moreno was reelected. Moreno had been appointed alderman in 2010 by Mayor Richard M. Daley, and had subsequently been reelected in 2011. 
Incumbent second-term alderman Bob Fioretti did not seek reelection, instead, opting to run (unsuccessfully) for mayor. Brian Hopkins was elected to succeed him, defeating  Alyx Pattison in a runoff. 
Incumbent second-term alderman Scott Waguespack was reelected, defeating Elise Doody-Jones, his sole challenger. 
Incumbent eighth-term alderman Patrick J. O'Connor was reelected, defeating Dianne Daleiden, his sole challenger. 
Incumbent first-term alderman Michelle Smith was reelected, defeating Caroline Vickrey in a runoff by a narrow 79 vote margin (equal to 0.54% of the votes cast in the runoff). 
Incumbent first-term alderman Ameya Pawar was reelected, defeating Rory Fiedler, his sole challenger. 
Four candidates were removed from the ballot due to insufficient nominating petition signatures or other reasons: 
Incumbent alderman Roberto Maldonado was reelected. Maldonado had been first appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2009, and had been subsequently reelected in 2011. 
Incumbent third-term alderman Ariel Reboyras was reelected, running unopposed on the ballot, facing only a write-in opponent. 
Incumbent sixth-term alderman Ray Suarez unsuccessfully sought reelection. He was defeated in a runoff by Milly Santiago. 
Incumbent alderman Deb Mell was reelected to a first full term. Mell had been appointed by Mayor Rahm Emanuel in 2013. 
Incumbent Nicholas Sposato ran in the adjacent 38th Ward due to redistricting. Gilbert Villegas was elected to succeed him as 36th Ward alderman, defeating Omar Aquino in a runoff. 
Incumbent Timothy Cullerton did not run for reelection. Cullerton had been first appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2011, and had been elected outright to a full term in the 2011 aldermanic elections shortly thereafter. Redistricted 36th Ward incumbent Nicholas Sposato was elected to succeed Cullerton as 38th Ward alderman. 
Two candidates were removed from the ballot due to insufficient nominating petition signatures or other reasons: 
Incumbent alderman Margaret Laurino was reelected. Laurino had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 1994, and had been reelected five times before. 
Incumbent first-term alderman Mary O'Connor ran unsuccessfully for reelection, being defeated by Anthony Napolitano in a runoff. 
Incumbent alderman Michael Chandler did not run for reelection. Michael Scott Jr. was elected to succeed him, defeating Vetress Boyce in a runoff. 
One candidate was removed from the ballot due to insufficient nominating petition signatures or other reasons: 
Incumbent alderman Daniel Solis was reelected. Solis had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 1996, and had been reelected four times before. 
Incumbent fifth-term alderman Walter Burnett Jr. was reelected, defeating Gabe Beukinga, his sole challenger. 
Incumbent alderman Daniel Solis was reelected. Solis had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 1996, and had been reelected four times before. 
Incumbent first-term alderman Jason Ervin was reelected, running unopposed on the ballot, facing only a write-in opponent. 
Six candidates were removed from the ballot due to insufficient nominating petition signatures or other reasons: 
Incumbent alderman Deborah L. Graham unsuccessfully sought reelection. Graham had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2010, and had been reelected in 2011. She was defeated by Chris Taliaferro in a runoff. 
Incumbent alderman Emma Mitts was reelected. Mitts had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2000, and had subsequently been reelected in 2003, 2007, and 2011. She defeated Tara Stamps in a runoff. 
Incumbent alderman James Balcer did not run for reelection. Balcer had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 1997, and had been reelected four times. Patrick Daley Thompson was elected to succeed him, defeating John Kozlar in a runoff. 
Incumbent third-term alderman George Cardenas was reelected, running unopposed on the ballot, with only a write-in opponent. 
Incumbent alderman Edward M. Burke was reelected, running unopposed. The longest-serving member of the Chicago City Council, Burke had consecutively served eleven full terms, plus a partial term. 
Incumbent two-term alderman Toni Foulkes ran in the adjacent 16th ward due to redistricting. Raymond Lopez was elected to succeed her as 15th Ward alderman, defeating Rafael Yanez in a runoff. 
Incumbent alderman JoAnn Thompson sought reelection. She was challenged by redistricted incumbent two-term 15th Ward alderman Toni Foulkes and several other candidates. Thompson ultimately died two weeks before the general election. Foulkes advanced to a runoff, in which she narrowly defeated Stephanie Coleman. 
Incumbent Latasha Thomas did not run for reelection. Thomas had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2000, and was elected outright in a 2001 special election, later being thrice reelected. David H. Moore was elected to succeed her. 
Incumbent alderman Lona Lane unsuccessfully sought reelection. Lane had first been appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley, and had been reelected in 2007 and 2011. She was defeated by Derrick Curtis in a runoff. 
Incumbent second-term alderman Pat Dowell was reelected, defeating Patricia Horton, her sole challenger. 
Incumbent alderman Natashia Holmes unsuccessfully sought reelection. Holmes had been appointed by Mayor Rahm Emanuel in 2013. She was defeated by Gregory Mitchell in a runoff. 
Incumbent alderman Michelle A. Harris was reelected. Harris had been first appointed by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 2006, and had been reelected in 2007 and 2011. 
Incumbent fourth-term alderman John Pope unsuccessfully sought reelection. He was defeated by Susan Sadlowski Garza in a runoff by a narrow 20-vote margin (equal to 0.18% of the votes cast in a runoff). 
As of April 21, Alderman Pope had filed suit for a recount.  On May 12, however, Pope conceded defeat to Garza. 
Incumbent first-term alderman Matt O'Shea was reelected, defeating Anne Schaible, his sole challenger on the ballot. 
Incumbent alderman Carrie Austin was reelected. Austin had first been appointed alderman by Mayor Richard M. Daley in 1994, and had subsequently been reelected to five consecutive subsequent terms before this. 
"Tuesday I'll Be Gone" is a song by American singer John Anderson for his twenty-second studio album, Years (2020). It features guest vocals from American singer Blake Shelton. Anderson co-wrote the song with Dan Auerbach and David Ferguson, the sole producer. It was released as the album's second single on February 7, 2020, though Auerbach's Easy Eye Sound record label. 
Stephen L. Betts from Rolling Stone described "Tuesday I'll Be Gone" as a "plaintive yet forward-looking" country song with lyrics that discuss the uncertainty of life. Taste of Country's Sterling Whitaker called it a musical departure from Anderson's "traditional country" roots, noting that it sounds more like an "early country rock" song suited for the American band Eagles. 
He was the author of works that encompassed many aspects associated with ancient Egypt, including books dealing with subjects such as religion, the afterlife, occult practices, myths and fairy tales, etc. A few of his works were later translated and published in English: 
Craftsman: Honyaki is the application of Japanese swordsmithing tradition. Blacksmithing backgrounds (specialty, personality, geography, family lineage, teacher, knowledge, money, tradition, business structure) differ and accordingly produce different interpretation of the technique. It usually represents the best work of all craftsmen involved. 
Brands that offer honyaki include Akifusa, Aritsugu, Ashi Hamono, Carter Cutlery, Fudo Kuniyuki, Gesshin, Ino, Ittotsai Kotetsu, Kikuichi-monji, Hiromoto, Konosuke, Masamoto Sohonten, Masamoto Tsukiji, Minamoto Izumimasa, Mizuno Tanrenjo, Monzaburo, Nenohi, Sakai Takayuki, Singatirin, Suisin, Sukenari, Tesshu, Tsubaya, Yamamoto Haken (Hide), Yoshihiro/Yamawaki. 
Blacksmiths who have produced honyaki include Futoshi Nagao, Genkai, Hiroki Ashi, Kenichi Shiraki, Satoshi Nakagawa, Kenji Togashi, Kiyoshi Kato, Jyunichi Takagi, Okishiba Masakuni, Tatsuo Ikeda, Watanabe, Yasha Yukawa, and Yoshikazu Ikeda. 
Makers of Western style "honyaki" include Cris Anderson, Mert Tansu, Bill Burke, Bryan Raquin, William Catcheside, and Bob Kramer. 
Fort Lauderdale station is a train station in Fort Lauderdale, Florida. It is served by Tri-Rail and Amtrak. The station is located on Southwest 21st Terrace, just south of West Broward Boulevard. 
The station was served by the Orange Blossom Special until 1953 and, among other Seaboard trains, the Silver Meteor beginning in 1939.  Amtrak maintained Silver Meteor service to the station when it took over intercity passenger train service in 1971. Both the Silver Meteor and Amtrak's Silver Star continue to use the station. 
On January 9, 1989, the South Florida Regional Transportation Authority began Tri-Rail service to the station, building additional facilities and a pedestrian overpass just north of the original station. A park and ride lot is available, and is directly accessible via a proprietary exit from Interstate 95 north. 
The station consists of a passenger waiting room on the northern end and a baggage room in the center section.  On the southern end is a freight room, which is used by CSX, the successor to Seaboard. Just south of the street side entry to the passenger waiting room, and representative of the racial segregation laws of the era in which the station was constructed, is the entrance to what had been the "colored" waiting room. 
The station has two side platforms connected by an elevated passageway. The station house, parking lot, and bus stops are located west of the southbound platform. 
Fort Lauderdale Amtrak and former Seaboard Air Line Railway station (left) and Tri-Rail station (rear) 
The introduction of Spiritism in the twentieth century attracted more participants of all racial backgrounds. It also added new foundations of practice and ritualistic objects such as: santiguos (healing blessings), 19 despojos (spiritual cleansings), prayers, and spells; and an array of indigenous, medieval Catholic, and African offerings. 
This geographical article about a location in Yalova Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It's Like This is an album by the American singer/songwriter Rickie Lee Jones, released in 2000. Like her 1991 album Pop Pop, it is a covers record. The album was nominated for a 2001 Best Pop Traditional Record Grammy Award. 
The Washington Post wrote that "the album's most successful track is Jones's sinewy reading of Steely Dan's edgy missive, 'Show Biz Kids', [which] kicks off with just terse triangle and Richard Davis's snaky bass, with Jones tapping into the caustic detachment and cool cynicism the song's writers always intended." 
A closely related concept is that of pseudo-Hermitian operators, which were considered by physicists Dirac, Pauli, and Lee and Wick. Pseudo-Hermitian operators were discovered (or rediscovered) almost simultaneously by mathematicians Krein et al.     as G-Hamiltonian in the study of linear dynamical systems. The equivalence between pseudo-Hermiticity and G-Hamiltonian is easy to establish. 
Ethylhexyl palmitate, or octyl palmitate, is the fatty acid ester derived from 2-ethylhexanol and palmitic acid.  Ethylhexyl palmitate is commonly used in cosmetic formulations. 
Ethylhexyl palmitate is a branched saturated fatty ester derived from ethylhexyl alcohol and palmitic acid. 
Ethylhexyl palmitate is used in cosmetic formulations as a solvent, carrying agent, pigment wetting agent, fragrance fixative and emollient.  Its dry-slip skinfeel is similar to some silicone derivatives. 
Proof Positive was a reality television paranormal investigation show broadcast by the SciFi Channel (now SyFy) beginning in October 6, 2004 through December 8, 2004. It was shown as part of the "SciFi Wednesday" evening schedule line up in the United States along with other reality television programs as Scare Tactics and Ghost Hunters. Proof Positive  ran for ten episodes. 
Only one of the segments in each episode would be given a proof positive. Before the commercial break at the end of the third segment, the audience would be asked which of the three segments they think would be concluded positive. 
The program's purpose was to only validate the authenticity of evidence from a paranormal encounter and not to prove that the paranormal activity exists. For example, if a photo of a flying saucer was declared "proof positive" by the show, it does not prove beyond a reasonable doubt that flying saucers exist. The show would simply validate that the photo was a picture of something unexplained, appearing in the sky, that was really there, and was not apparently faked in any way. 
Digrammia gnophosaria, the hollow-spotted angle, is a species of moth of the  family Geometridae. It is found in Illinois, Louisiana, Minnesota, New Jersey, North Carolina, Oklahoma, Texas and Wisconsin. 
A list of notable films produced in the Cinema of Spain, ordered by year of release in the 1940s. For an alphabetical list of articles on Spanish films, see Category:Spanish films. 
The Hongqi QM9 is an upcoming luxury minivan to be produced by Chinese luxury automobile manufacturer Hongqi, a subsidiary of FAW Group. 
In November 2021, Hongqi's press release department unofficially revealed the brand's first minivan, the QM9 (codenamed C095), through teaser images. The Hongqi QM9 will go into trial production on January 30, 2022, and will begin full production later that year on June 30. When launch, the QM9 is set to directly compete against other premium minivans on sale in China such as the Buick GL8, Toyota Alphard. 
The Hongqi QM9's engine options will be a 2.0T L4 twin-turbo engine with a 48V mild hybrid system, that outputs 252 hp, and a 3.0T V6 supercharged engine that outputs 283 hp. The QM9 will use a 7-speed dual-clutch transmission. 
This article about a modern automobile produced after 1975 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Keith Jon Hughes (born August 4, 1972) is an American educator and media personality, best known for his YouTube channel HipHughes History.  His YouTube channel has seen millions of views since starting in 2008. Hughes has been a featured historian on multiple historical television shows. 
Hughes was raised in Putnam Valley, New York. In 1994, he moved to Buffalo to attend Buffalo State College where he received his undergraduate degree in Social Studies Education. Hughes went on to receive his master's degree in Educational Technology from the University of Buffalo in 2006. 
Hughes started teaching full-time in 1999 at McKinley High School; his focus was teaching U.S. History and Advanced Placement American Government. Shortly after the September 11 attacks, Hughes collaborated with his students on his first video, titled "Wings of Hope". The success of this project evolved into bringing in video production and media into his courses. 
In the fall of 2014, Hughes started a new phase of his teaching career as a Technology Instructional Coach for the Buffalo Public School district, leaving the teaching role he had for the last 15 years. Hughes is still teaching as an adjunct professor of education at the Graduate School of Education at the University of Buffalo. 
On April 20, 2008. he started his educational YouTube Channel HipHughes History which focuses on government, politics and history. He was recognized by YouTube with an EDU Guru award in 2012. 
Hughes started his television career discussing U.S. history on the television show United Stuff of America on the History channel in 2014. Afterwards he followed up with America's Most Badass on the American Heroes Channel in 2015. His latest television appearance was on the two-hour special Transition of Power: The Presidency back on the History channel in January 2017. 
The Concorde District is a high school district in the state of Virginia that includes public schools  from Fairfax County. It is widely regarded as one of the most competitive districts in the Virginia High School League (VHSL). 
The Concorde District was founded in 1993 as part the realignment of the Northern Region.  The charter members of the district, which began playing in the 1994-1995 school year, were Centreville, Chantilly, Herndon, Thomas Jefferson, Oakton, South Lakes, and W.T. Woodson, all of Fairfax County.  All seven schools were among the largest schools in the Northern Region at the time, playing Division 6 football. 
In 1997, Potomac Falls High School of Loudoun County opened and joined the Concorde District due to its proximity to its member schools. It was not competitive because its size which was well below the AA/AAA cutoff, and also because it was new. Potomac Falls moved to the Northwestern District in 1999, and W.T. Woodson moved to the Liberty District This reunited it with crosstown rival Fairfax which dropped the Concorde to six schools. 
In 2000, Westfield opened and joined the Concorde, making it the second newly established school to join the district.  South Lakes left the Concorde in 2003 to the Liberty due to declining enrollment, and Thomas Jefferson was allowed to play in the National District for football while remaining in the Concorde for other sports. 
In 2005, Thomas Jefferson moved to the Liberty, while Fairfax moved to the Concorde, and Robinson moved from the Patriot to the Concorde District.  In 2009, Fairfax returned to the Liberty. In 2017 as part of a realignment by the VHSL, Robinson and founding member Herndon left the Concorde District as Robinson returned the Patriot District and Herndon moved to the Liberty District. James Madison, a long-standing member of the Liberty District, was added to the district. 
Lorne Taylor (born 1944) is a former tenured professor and member of the provincial legislature of Alberta, Canada. 
The band is the current 1st Section National Champions, winning the title on 18th September 2021 at Cheltenham Racecourse, conducted by Ian Porthouse. 
Kingdom Brass is graded in the Championship Section, and performs at various concerts, festivals and competitions all over the UK and abroad. It was formed in 1999 by the amalgamation of the Cowdenbeath and Kelty & Blairadam Bands. 
Kingdom Brass was formed in August 1999 after the amalgamation of the Cowdenbeath and the Kelty & Blairadam Bands. What seemed like a sudden decision by many was actually the end process of 18 months of careful planning and negotiation, which started in the spring of 1998. Individuals in both camps saw the potential to form one band with the cream of players in Fife which would be capable of challenging for the top honours. 
A meeting between the two band committees was organised, and this took place in the Warout Stadium in Glenrothes in the summer of 1999. The proposals were discussed and the majority voted for the amalgamation. Both bands were then advised of the decision, which was positively welcomed by the majority of players. 
The final competition between the two bands was the Scottish Miners Gala, which saw the rivalry of past years put aside with players from both bands guesting with the other in an almost party atmosphere. Cowdenbeath won the event, Kelty were runners up, and with that the new band was born. 
In 2008 Kingdom finally broke into the top 3 at the Scottish Championships, the best result by a Fife band in 30 years. That result was repeated in 2012, continuing Kingdom's consistent run of Scottish Championship results. 
The band won the Carnegie Invitation Contest in 2005, retaining the title in 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2018. Kingdom also won the Land O'Burns contest in 2011 (and were runners up in 2012), the Northern Counties title in 2017 and 2018 and the Scottish Challenge Shield in 2018.  
Kingdom has also found success at a National Level, winning the 2006 Senior Trophy competition and gaining third place at the 2009 Senior Cup. In 2014 Kingdom were runners up at the Senior Cup, gaining promotion to the Grand Shield for 2015. In 2021 Kingdom Brass won the National Championships of Great Britain (1st Section) title, conducted by Ian Porthouse. 
The band can boast some of the finest solo players in Scotland, and produced the Scottish Solo champion in 2000 (cornet player Lee Bathgate), 2001 (tuba player Gareth Ross) and 2008 (when cornet player James Smith lifted his eighth Scottish Title). The band's trombone quartet has been runners up at the Scottish Championships in 2000 and 2001, while Kingdom's mixed quartet became Scottish Champions in 2001, a title they retained in 2007 and again in 2008. 
In 2019 Kingdom completed a Community Asset Transfer to take ownership of the old library building in Kelty. After extensive refurbishment the band moved into the new hall, rehearsing there for the first time on 19 December 2019. 
During 2011 a planning and recruitment phase took place, and the 'B' Band was officially registered with SBBA on 22 August 2011. The first rehearsal of Kingdom Brass 'B' was on Wednesday 12 October 2011. 
The band made their contesting debut at the Scottish Championships in Glenrothes on 10 March 2012, conducted by Bede Williams, and won the 4th section. Kingdom 'B' then contested at the Carnegie competition in April 2012, winning the 4th section title. In April 2013 the band added the 3rd section title at the Carnegie to their impressive contesting record. 
On 22 September 2012, Kingdom Brass 'B' competed in their third competition, the National Brass Band Championships of Great Britain, at 'The Centaur', Cheltenham. They were conducted at the contest by Andrew Duncan and finished in 7th place. 
On 6 October 2012, Kingdom Brass 'B' competed at their first FCBA Championships, winning the 4th section contest as well as the title of 'Best Fife 'B' Band'. 
On 2 December 2012, Kingdom Brass 'B' won the Scottish Challenge Cup, in Perth Concert Hall, conducted by Ken Blackwood. That victory rounded off a clean sweep of all the 4th Section titles in 2012, and meant the band took the title of 'Scottish 4th Section Band of the Year'. 
On 9 March 2013, Kingdom Brass 'B' competed in Section 3 at the Scottish Championships in Perth, finishing in 2nd place. 
The Kingdom Brass Youth Initiative (KBYI) was proposed in February 2007 following the very poor turn out in the youth sections at the Fife Charities Band Association (FCBA) solo & ensemble contest. 
An initial meeting was held between members of Kingdom Brass and Alan Edmond, the Youth Development Officer for the Scottish Brass Band Association (SBBA). This meeting led to the formation of a 5-year youth development plan for Kingdom Brass, and the formation of the KBYI. 
In November 2007 the first workshops were held in local primary schools, and tuition began in December 2007. 
The first concert appearance of Kingdom Brass Youth was in August 2008, alongside Kingdom Brass at the Aberdour Festival. 
The first competition appearance of Kingdom Brass Youth was in August 2008, at Brass in the Park in Newtongrange. 
In September 2008, Kingdom Brass was awarded a Youth Music Initiative Large Grant from the Scottish Arts Council. This investment allowed a professional tutor and conductor to be employed on a part-time basis by the organisation to oversee the development of the members and tutors. 
The Scottish Arts Council awarded Kingdom Brass a YMI Small Grant in September 2009 to launch the Kingdom Brass Percussion Academy, to teach percussion alongside brass. 
In September 2010 the Kingdom Brass Youth Band won their first ever contest, with victory in the Novice Section at Brass in the Park. 
In July 2011 funding was received from Fife Council and the Coalfields Regeneration Trust to allow the Percussion Academy to purchase new equipment and grow in size, with up to 20 young percussionists receiving lessons on a wide range of percussion instruments. 
Creative Scotland awarded the KBYI another Youth Music Initiative Large Grant in August 2011. This award was part of a wider project to expand the organisation's youth setup from 2011 to 2013. 
On 17 November 2013 the Kingdom Percussion Academy, led by Head Tutor Lynsey Paterson, won the Percussion Section at the Scottish Youth Championships in Perth Concert Hall. 
CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (2nd Section) Winners - 1995 CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (2nd Section) Runners-up - 1985 CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (2nd Section) 3rd Place - 1996 
CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (3rd Section) Winners - 1964 CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (3rd Section) Runners-up - 1963 
CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (3rd Section) Winners - 1991 CISWO Mineworkers National Champions (3rd Section) 3rd Place - 1978 
In December 2007, Bob Ross visited Scotland again, and was filmed alongside Kingdom Brass in one of the band's Christmas concerts, which was screened throughout Germany in 2008. 
Before the formation of Kingdom Brass, several members of the Cowdenbeath Band appeared twice on Songs of Praise. 
In August 2007, BBC Radio Scotland broadcast Sunday Bandstand, a programme featuring recordings from the West Lothian Festival of Brass which included a live performance from Kingdom Brass. 
Before the band's appearance at the European Open Brass Band Championships in 2002, a preview of the competition on local radio in Switzerland featured several pieces from one of the band's CD recordings. 
Kingdom's first CD recording was Les Preludes in 2000. The recording featured cornet player Graeme McCulloch as guest soloist. 
In 2006, to coincide with the band's tour of Germany, Kingdom Brass released The Flying Scot. This CD featured pieces recorded over two studio sessions, with Archie Hutchison conducting the first session, and Craig Anderson the second. This recording was a great commercial success for the band, selling several hundred copies on the tour. 
In March 2011 Kingdom Brass recorded alongside Simon Johnson, principal trombone of the BBC Scottish Symphony Orchestra, on his solo CD. The recording was released in November 2011. 
The current Musical Director of Kingdom Brass is Paul Drury. Paul took over that post with Kingdom Brass in January 2016. 
The current Professional Conductor of Kingdom Brass is Ian Porthouse. Ian took on that role with Kingdom in September 2017. 
Over the past few years Kingdom has worked very successfully at a variety of events with various professional conductors, including Thomas Wyss, Alan Morrison, David Hirst, Ray Farr, Graham O'Connor, James Gourlay, Frans Violet and Luc Vertommen. 
The band have also employed several local conductors to act as Musical Director since 1999, including Bruce Fraser, Gavin Lindsay, Simon Kerwin, Iain Davey, Craig Anderson, Andrew Duncan, Bede Williams and Eoin Tonner. 
Kingdom Brass is affiliated locally to the Fife Charities Band Association and nationally to the Scottish Brass Band Association. 
This geographical article about a location in Kemah District, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
AllMusic journalist Bruce Eder stated that Fury's "mix of rough-hewn good looks and unassuming masculinity, coupled with an underlying vulnerability, all presented with a good voice and some serious musical talent, helped turn [him] into a major rock and roll star in short order". Others have suggested that his rapid rise to prominence was due to his "Elvis-influenced hip swivelling and, at times, highly suggestive stage act". 
Fury was born Ronald Wycherley at Smithdown Hospital (later Sefton General Hospital and now demolished) on Smithdown Road in Liverpool on 17 April 1940. He commenced music lessons on the piano before he was a teenager, and was bought his first guitar by the age of 14. Wycherley fronted his own group in 1955, but simultaneously worked full-time on a tugboat and later as a docker. He entered and won a talent competition, and by 1958 had started composing his own songs. 
Fury's We Want Billy! (1963) was one of the first live albums in UK rock history, and featured renditions of his hits and cover versions of several R&B songs such as "Unchain My Heart". 
In 1965 he appeared in the film I've Gotta Horse, which also featured his backing group the Gamblers, the Bachelors, Amanda Barrie, Michael Medwin and Jon Pertwee. The album from the film was made available in stereo. Fury left Decca Records in 1966, after signing to a five-year recording contract with Parlophone. 
In 1973, Fury emerged from a period of semi-retirement to star as 'Stormy Tempest' in the film That'll Be the Day. Also starring David Essex and Ringo Starr, it was roughly based on the early days of the Beatles. Starr was from the Dingle area of Liverpool, as was Fury, and had originally played drums for Rory Storm & the Hurricanes, whom the Stormy Tempest group were said to be modelled on. 
Fury was a keen birdwatcher. He lived with businesswoman Lee Everett Alkin, better known as "Lady Lee" Middleton, from 1959 to 1967. During this time, he had a short relationship with actress Amanda Barrie, his co-star in I've Gotta Horse. Fury went from Liverpool to London (like the Beatles) and he lived in Number 1 Cavendish Avenue, the same street as Paul McCartney. He is remembered and honoured with a Blue Plaque there. 
Fury married Judith Hall in May 1969, but later left her for heiress Lisa Voice. They lived together in London, and sometimes on Fury's farm in Wales, from 1971 until his death, although they were leading separate lives for the last two years. 
On 10 April 1983, a tribute concert for Fury was held at the Beck Theatre in Hayes. All the artists performed for free and the money raised was donated to the Billy Fury memorial fund for research into heart disease. On the bill were names including Marty Wilde with his daughter Kim Wilde, Joe Brown, Alvin Stardust, Dave Berry, Helen Shapiro and John Miles.[citation needed] 
On 19 April 2003, a bronze statue of Fury was unveiled by Jack Good at the National Museum of Liverpool Life. The sculpture, by Tom Murphy, a Liverpool sculptor, was donated by 'The Sound of Fury' fan club after the money was raised by fans. 
In 2010, Camden Council named a previously unnamed alleyway "Billy Fury Way" in his honour. It starts just off Finchley Road near Finchley Road & Frognal station and runs to West Hampstead Station. He had recorded at the nearby Decca Studios. The alleyway was decorated with a large mural of his face (at the West Hampstead end), which was unveiled and blessed on Friday 29 July 2011. 
Fury's backing band from 1970 until 1976, when he stopped touring due to ill health, were Fury's Tornados, named by Fury and his then manager Hal Carter. They continue to tour in the theatre show Halfway to Paradise: The Billy Fury Story. Fury is also remembered in the work of tribute bands such as another theatre show called The Billy Fury Years. The film Play It Cool was first released on DVD on 10 February 2014. 
Community boards of Queens  are New York City community boards in the borough of Queens, which are the appointed advisory groups of the community districts that advise on land use and zoning, participate in the city budget process, and address service delivery in their district. 
Community boards are each composed of up to 50 volunteer members appointed by the local borough president, half from nominations by City Council members representing the community district (i.e., whose council districts cover part of the community district). Additionally, all City Council members representing the community district are non-voting, ex officio board members. 
The 1963 revision of the New York City Charter extended the Borough of Manhattan's "Community Planning Councils" (est. 1951) to the outer boroughs as "Community Planning Boards", which are now known as "Community Boards". 
The 1975 revision of the New York City Charter set the number of Community Districts/Boards to 59, established the position of the district manager for the community districts, and created the Uniform Land Use Review Procedure (ULURP) which gave the community boards the authority to review land use proposals such as zoning actions, and special permits. 
The 14 community boards in Queens, and a few representative neighborhoods in each, are listed below: 
Within the borough of Queens there are five Joint Interest Areas (JIA), which are outside of the jurisdiction of individual community districts, and have their own district number. The five JIAs in Queens county are: 
The Queens Borough Board is composed of the borough president, New York City Council members whose districts are part of the borough, and the chairperson of each community board in Queens. The current borough board is composed of the 30 members listed in the table below: 
Kalle M. Saksela (born September 10, 1962, in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, US) is a Finnish virologist. He has been a professor at University of Helsinki since 2005, where he leads the virology department. 
In 2002 Saksela was awarded the Anders Jahre Prize for Young Scientists by the University of Oslo for his research on Aids. In 2003 he became a member of the Finnish Academy of Science and Letters. 
Zaleski's stay in India was not limited to pastoral and missionary activities. He was into botanical science, gathering a large collection of tropical plants. This collection, numbering about 35,000 images of flora Indo-Malay, went to the Department of Plant Systematics and Geography, University of Warsaw. Among other topics in his books of travel, Zaleski described Botanical Gardens at Buitenzorg (in Java) and Penang (Malaysia) and several exotic plants he encountered during his travels. 
Patriarch Zaleski was the author of several travel and ethnographic works. His published works run into more than seven and a half thousand pages of print, and he left a further seven thousand pages of manuscripts. Some books were written under pseudonyms, including the History of Ceylon from 1913 as G. Francis, and under the pseudonym 'Pierre Courtenay' he published several books of adventure for young people. He was also accomplished in poetry. 
Nuuk Art Museum's collection includes 14 lithographs of Sermitsiaq created by Hove. She illustrated several stamps for Post Greenland, beginning in 1997. For several years she presided over KIMIK, a Greenlandic artist's association. 
Born in Bensonhurst, Brooklyn, in 1915, William W. Landsberg graduated from Carnegie-Mellon University in 1936 with a Bachelor of Architecture degree. He then attended the Harvard Graduate School of Design to study Modern architecture from masters Walter Gropius and Marcel Breuer. He graduated in 1938, and from 1939 to 1940, worked as a draftsman in the firm of Gropius & Breuer. 
Landsberg married Muriel Ginsberg in 1941 and, serving as an Army architect, was deployed to St. Johns, Newfoundland, where he lived for two years, designing and supervising the building of military air bases for WWII Allies. Landsberg later served with the 1253rd Combat Engineers Battalion of the 9th Army and participated in the crossing of the Rhine in March 1945. 
William Landsberg started his own design firm in Port Washington, NY, in 1956 where he would design homes, synagogues, and commercial buildings and continue his working relationship with Breuer.  In 1957, Landsberg designed a house for Randall and Helen McIntyre in Deer Park, NY which was awarded Architectural Record's House-of-the-Year award and was featured in the magazine. 
In the early 60s and beyond, Landsberg worked as Project Architect for many large New York firms, including Kahn & Jacobs HOK and Edward Durell Stone. He also spent time creating his own artwork, and became very active in community affairs such as the North Shore Community Arts Center and the Manhasset Art Association.  Landsberg also served as a local Building Inspector and Board Member of Zoning Appeals. He also presided as President of the local chapter of American Field Services. 
Landsberg moved to Port Washington, NY, designing and building a house for his family in 1951.   Featured in international books, journals, magazines, newspapers, and museum exhibits, this house was the most recognized of his independent projects.  The house was occupied by Landsberg and his family until his death in 2013 and is still extant. 
"U.S.A. Habitation a Port Washington; Views and Plans William Landsberg, Architecte." L'Architecture D'aujourd'hui 52 (1954): 15. 
Inner City Press was founded in 1987 in the South Bronx of New York City. Its first projects involved under-housed people fixing up abandoned buildings. 
In August 2011, Inner City Press exclusively put online the UN's internal plan for post-Gaddafi Libya, as credited and covered by Al Jazeera English. 
In October 2012, Lee and Inner City Press raised fair lending and compliance issues about M&T Bank's application to acquire Hudson City Bancorp. The deal went through in 2015. 
Inner City Press was profiled in the Columbia Journalism Review Guide by journalist Armin Rosen "Online News Start Ups" on March 11, 2011. 
In mid-2006, investigative journalism at the UN by Inner City Press exposed human rights abuses in the forcible disarmament programs carried out by the Uganda People's Defense Force in the Karamoja region of Uganda. The United Nations Development Programme halted its activities in the region. 
In 2006 in U.S. journalism, Lee and Inner City Press were engaged in litigation to deem the "citizens-only" provision of the Freedom of Information Act of Delaware (and ten other states) to be unconstitutional. 
On February 13, 2008 Google removed Inner City Press from Google News, allegedly due to pressure from the UN. As of 2015, however, ICP is active on Google News Alerts subscriptions. 
In 2012, after Inner City Press's reporting on Sri Lanka, Syria and UN corruption, the UN apparently reneged on a commitment to renew Inner City Press' accreditation, amid a "Board of Examination" to expel Inner City Press, started by the President and Executive Committee of the UN Correspondents Association.  Despite suggestions to the contrary, Inner City Press' UN accreditation was renewed and he remains a member of the UN press corps in good standing. 
Inner City Press' Lee became a subject of controversy for soe over the last year. A Guardian UK article cited recounts how some UNCA Executive Committee members acted against Inner City Press' Lee after he reported that the UNCA President had a previous financial relationship with Sri Lanka's Permanent Representative to the UN, then agreed to screen for this ambassador his government's film denying war crimes. 
In December 2012 along with Luiz Rampelotto of Europa Newswire, Inner City Press co-founded as an alternative to UNCA the new Free UN Coalition for Access. 
Inner City Press continues to break and pursue stories, for example in the Spring of 2013 the auctioning off of an internship in the UN for over $20,000, credited by among others Talk Radio News Service  and on AlJazeera.com  
Likewise, Inner City Press continues reporting on Sri Lanka, as for example credited in the Colombo Gazette of May 14, 2013. 
And see, July 5, 2013, BBC: "DR Congo's M23 rebels: Rwandan support 'falling'" ("The report, leaked by Inner City Press which follows UN affairs")  
On August 13, 2013, @InnerCityPress was named to Foreign Policy Magazine's Top 100 Twitterati list, one of only two covering the UN. 
On August 15, 2013, Inner City Press' work covering the UN Security Council on Egypt was cited in Buzz Feed's story on the same subject. 
On August 28, 2013, Inner City Press' reporting on Syria was features in Pacifica radio station KPFA's "Flashpoints" program  and elsewhere  
Inner City Press' questioning of the UN on when it asked the Syrian government for access to al Ghouta was played on Democracy Now on August 28, from Minute 18:30  
In August 2018, Lee was permanently banned from the UN premises because of his non compliance with the restrictions of his new non-resident correspondent status.  
Grande Ravine is a communal section in the Croix-des-Bouquets commune of the Croix-des-Bouquets Arrondissement, in the Ouest department of Haiti. 
He wrote the books Stick Control for the Snare Drummer (1935) and Accents and Rebounds for the Snare Drummer (1961). Among his students were Joe Morello, Gene Krupa, Lionel Hampton, and Vic Firth. 
As Stone's renown as a teacher increased, the George B. Stone & Son drum manufacturing business began to decline. The factory closed in the late 1930s and the equipment was idle until 1950 when Ralph Eames purchased it, using it to make Eames rope-tensioned parade drums. Today, some of Stone's equipment is still used by the Eames Drum Company in Saugus, MA, in the manufacture of its drum shells. 
George Lawrence Stone died at the age of 81 on November 19, 1967. His wife died two days later, and his son, George Lawrence Stone Jr., died thirty-two days after his father. Eulogizing his friend in The Ludwig Drummer, William F. Ludwig, Sr. said, "George was always helpful to everyone - his motto was 'Service before self.' May he rest in the satisfaction that he did his best for the percussion field for many, many years." 
Patargo is an arrondissement in the Donga department of Benin. It is an administrative division under the jurisdiction of the commune of Djougou. According to the population census conducted by the Institut National de la Statistique Benin on February 15, 2002, the arrondissement had a total population of 19,568. 
Mizpah church is one of the oldest churches in Perambure, Kannigapuram area of Chennai, the capital of the South Indian state of Tamil Nadu. The original structure was built in 1995. The church is named after Mizpah Prayer Tabernacle who founded the mission of the Free Church. 
Mizpah Prayer Tabernacle is a working church with hourly prayer and Sunday services and it follows Protestant sect of Christianity. The church also celebrates Anniversary festival every year during the month of May. In modern times, it is under the dominion of the Diocese of Madras of the Church of South India. It is one of the most prominent landmarks of Perambur, Kannigapuram. 
The 1956 2E received a new hood, with the "Studebaker" script now on a secondary chrome grille mounted up high. The front turn signals were also incorporated in the grille, beneath the headlights. 20,218 Studebaker 2E trucks were built in the 1956 model year. A new massive fiberglass grille appeared on the 1957-58 3E models, and was the last significant styling change made to these trucks. 
Four-wheel drive was available on 1/2 and 3/4-ton models beginning in 1957. Studebaker did not make the 4WD equipment themselves, but (in common with Chevrolet and GMC at the time) purchased the hardware from NAPCO (Northwestern Auto Parts Company). 
Kaveinga waai is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Rhysodinae. It was described by R.T. & J.R. Bell in 2000. 
Periasamy Geetha Jeevan (born 6 May 1970) is an Indian Tamil politician serving as the current Minister for Social Welfare and Women Empowerment of Tamil Nadu. She is a Member of the Legislative Assembly, representing Thoothukkudi constituency in the Tamil Nadu Legislative Assembly. She also formerly served as the Minister for Animal Husbandry of Tamil Nadu. 
Geetha Jeevan was born in Thoothukudi, Tamil Nadu, India, on 6 May 1970 and is the daughter of N. Periasamy, himself a former Thoothukkudi constituency MLA. She holds a master's degree in commerce awarded by A.P.C. Mahalakshmi College for Women, Thoothukudi, having previously attended Geetha Matriculation Higher Secondary School in the city. 
Geetha Jeevan was a member and chairperson of Thoothukudi district panchayat between 1996 and 2006. In 2006, She first time became an MLA representing Thoothukkudi constituency in Tamil Nadu Legislative Assembly. The Social Welfare ministry portfolio was given to her when Poongothai Aladi Aruna was implicated in a telephone controversy. 
In 2011 Tamil Nadu state election, She was defeated by S. T. Chellapandian of the AIADMK. In 2016 and 2021 elections she consecutively elected as an MLA from her constituency and became Minister for Social Welfare and Women Empowerment in ministry headed by Chief Minister of Tamil Nadu M. K. Stalin, third son of former chief minister M. Karunanidhi. 
This article about a Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mark A. Jackson (born April 1, 1965) is an American former professional basketball player and coach. A point guard from St. John's University, he played for the New York Knicks, Los Angeles Clippers, Indiana Pacers, Denver Nuggets, Toronto Raptors, Utah Jazz, and Houston Rockets of the National Basketball Association (NBA) in a career spanning from 1987 to 2004. 
After retiring from playing basketball, Jackson became a broadcast commentator for ESPN and ABC alongside his former coach Jeff Van Gundy and play-by-play man Mike Breen. He also worked as an analyst for The YES Network's New Jersey Nets games. In 2011 the Golden State Warriors hired Jackson as head coach. He coached the team for three seasons, but was fired in 2014 despite leading the Warriors to consecutive playoff appearances for the first time in over 20 years. 
Mark Jackson was born in Brooklyn, New York. He was regarded as one of the nation's elite point guards while attending Bishop Loughlin Memorial High School in Brooklyn under coach Patrick Quigley. Jackson gained a reputation as a streetballer in New York and a college hoops star at St. John's University. While at St. John's, he played alongside Olympian and NBA All-Star Chris Mullin for two seasons. He credits Mullin with teaching him the importance of rigorous practice work in the gym. 
While at St. John's, Jackson developed an unusual free-throw line ritual of extending his hand and "cupping" his thumb and index finger around the rim. This helped him stay focused on the rim while shooting foul shots. He continued this well into his pro career and it helped him to a career 77.0% free-throw percentage. 
Jackson was the 18th pick of the 1987 NBA draft by the New York Knicks. He teamed with Patrick Ewing and Charles Oakley to turn the Knicks into a prime playoff team in the late 1980s and early 1990s. However, before the Knicks peaked and became regular playoff contenders, he was traded to the Los Angeles Clippers in 1992. 
Jackson had a steady career with the Knicks, most notably under coach Rick Pitino, averaging 13.6 points and 10.6 assists per game in his rookie season, earning him the 1988 Rookie of the Year award, the lowest overall draft pick to win the award since Woody Sauldsberry in 1958. He was the only non-lottery pick to have won the award since the introduction of the system in 1985 until the 2016-17 season, where Malcolm Brogdon won the award as a second round pick. 
On June 30, 1994, the Indiana Pacers traded Pooh Richardson, Malik Sealy, and the draft rights to Eric Piatkowski for Jackson and the draft rights to Greg Minor. With the Pacers, he teamed with Reggie Miller, Rik Smits, Antonio Davis and Dale Davis for five out of the next six seasons to make the Indiana Pacers a contender. 
Jackson would leave the Pacers that off-season for the Toronto Raptors, who needed a point guard and had extra money to spend due to the departure of Tracy McGrady earlier that off-season. Antonio Davis recommended his former Pacers teammate as a suitable replacement. Jackson would only play 54 games for the Raptors before being traded at the trade deadline back to the Knicks. 
On January 15, 2004, Jackson signed with the Houston Rockets backing up Steve Francis. Jackson played in only 42 games as a Rocket and, experiencing a large drop-off in skills, finished his career at season's end. 
Jackson ranks 13th on the NBA all-time games list (1,296), 26th on the all-time minutes played list (39,121), 77th on the all-time three-point field goals made list (734), 65th on the all-time three-point field goal attempts list (2,213), 4th on the all-time assists list (10,334) and 23rd on the all-time steals list (1,608). He never achieved great individual success; despite winning Rookie of the Year in 1988, he made only one All-Star appearance in his career (1989). 
Jackson is also notable for prompting an NBA rule change. In response to his penchant for backing down opposing point guards in the post for 15 or more seconds at a time, the league instituted the five-second back-to-the-basket violation, sometimes called the "Mark Jackson Rule", prohibiting an offensive player from dribbling with his back to the basket for more than five consecutive seconds when below the free throw line. 
Jackson is also known for perfecting and increasing the popularity of the "teardrop" shot, which he often used to shoot over much larger defenders. 
Jackson worked as an analyst for New Jersey Nets on YES Network, mostly with Marv Albert. He has also worked as an analyst for ABC, teaming with Mike Breen and former coach Jeff Van Gundy. 
At the end of the 2008 NBA season, Jackson unexpectedly quit his position with the YES Network. This move fueled speculation that Jackson would be replacing Isiah Thomas as coach of the New York Knicks, but Jackson said the rumors were untrue and the decision was based on a desire to stop commuting from Los Angeles and his contract with ABC. Still, the rumors persisted until the Knicks hired former Phoenix Suns head coach Mike D'Antoni. 
A basketball card depicting Jackson has gained notoriety for featuring the Menendez brothers in the background watching as courtside spectators. 
Jackson is of partial Dominican descent, which qualified him to play for the national basketball team of the Dominican Republic. 
This biographical article about a person notable in connection with Islam is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
All shrines, trees, and houses were moved before the valley was flooded. The town hall was also moved. 
Maimonides Park and the Staten Island Yankees' Richmond County Bank Ballpark were paid for with public money, part of a deal that involved both the Mets and Yankees.  The Yankees had to approve the arrival of the Cyclones, and the Mets had to approve a Yankee farm team in Staten Island. The two teams share MLB territorial rights to the New York City market, and have veto power over each other (and any other MLB organization). 
In October 2012, Hurricane Sandy hit Brooklyn and caused extensive damage to the ballpark, including the front office, clubhouses & team store. The entire playing surface, previously a natural grass field, had to be replaced with synthetic FieldTurf before the 2013 season. 
In 2021, MCU did not renew the naming rights deal. Maimonides Medical Center became the new sponsor. 
Maimonides Park prohibits fans from bringing outside food into the stadium, a policy in every minor league stadium, but not in effect at Citi Field and Yankee Stadium. 
In early 2015, the New York University Violets moved in and made Maimonides Park their home stadium. In the process, they forced the St. Joseph's College Bears to move out. Baruch College plays a few games at Maimonides Park, as do a few high school teams. 
Following the 2015 season, a set of bleachers were removed, removing 500 seats from the ballpark. The area which housed the bleachers was turned into a picnic area. 
Maimonides Park hosted a qualifying round for the 2017 World Baseball Classic in September 2016. Israel won the Qualifier over Great Britain, Brazil & Pakistan. 
Maimonides Park served as the Mets' alternate training site in 2020 when the COVID-19 pandemic forced the cancellation of the Minor League Baseball campaign and the shortening of the Major League Baseball season. 
In February 2017, the New York Cosmos officially announced they would host their home games at Maimonides Park for the 2017 NASL season. The Cosmos had previously used Maimonides Park as a home field: once for a regular season match against the Ottawa Fury and once for a post season match against the Fort Lauderdale Strikers, both in 2015. The NASL cancelled its 2018 season, and the Cosmos later announced they will move to Mitchel Athletic Complex in Nassau County for their 2019 home games. 
The Brooklyn Bolts played their home games at Maimonides Park during the 2014 and 2015 Fall Experimental Football League seasons before folding. The football field was positioned in the outfield. 
On August 7, 2018, Rugby United New York announced that it would play its inaugural Major League Rugby season in 2019 at MCU Park. The rugby pitch is laid out predominantly across left and center field, with part of the left side of the infield included.[citation needed] 
On July 2, 2010, Maimonides Park hosted a live Total Nonstop Action Wrestling house show which also broke the TNA attendance record and became the most attended live TNA house show in the United States to date with a crowd of just under 5,550 fans. 
On August 22, 2015, Ring of Honor Wrestling returned to Maimonides Park with the second edition of Field of Honor. 
The ballpark hosted the annual Nathan's Famous Hot Dog Contest on July 4, 2021.  It is usually held in a public plaza on Coney Island, but has been relocated due to capacity restrictions and other health and safety requirements related to the COVID-19 pandemic. At the event, Joey Chestnut set a world record of 76 hot dogs and buns within 10 minutes. 
Man of the People is a 1937 American drama film directed by Edwin L. Marin and written by Frank Dolan. The film stars Joseph Calleia, Florence Rice, Thomas Mitchell, Ted Healy and Catherine Doucet. The film was released on January 29, 1937, by Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer. 
All that attorney Jack Moreno wants to do is help his friends and the people from his neighbourhood, but in order to make a living he has to do business with the mob. 
Johny Ruiz (born 11 June 1971) is a Colombian former professional racing cyclist. He won the Colombian National Road Race Championships in 1998. 
This biographical article relating to Colombian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hercules was the name of a large number of ships, named in honour of the Roman mythological hero Hercules: 
WRNB (100.3 FM) is a commercial radio station licensed to Media, Pennsylvania in the Philadelphia/Delaware Valley radio market. It is owned by Radio One and airs an urban contemporary radio format. In afternoon drive time, WRNB carries the syndicated D. L. Hughley Show.  WRNB's studios and offices are in the Two Bala Plaza building on City Line Avenue in Bala Cynwyd. 
In the early 1990s, however, the battle for AC listeners heated up, with WEAZ (now WBEB) becoming the dominant station for soft music in Philadelphia. WKSZ lost ground in the ratings, falling to 17th place in 1992. To improve ratings, WKSZ tried to combine AC and oldies with what the station called the "50/50 Mix"; however, this failed to turn ratings around, and in 1993, WKSZ returned to a playlist of AC love songs. 
The station initially had a slight alternative rock lean, but still played other Top 40 hits, including pop and dance. By early 1995, WPLY evolved into a full-time modern rock format, which lasted nearly ten years. Through the late 1990s, Y100 leaned towards Modern AC, and would shift towards an active rock lean in 2000. 
On March 29, 2013, WRNB went jockless and began promoting a "big announcement" at 5 p.m. on April 1. At that time, after playing "Keep Your Head to the Sky" by Earth, Wind, & Fire, WRNB flipped to urban oldies as "Old School 100.3." The first song on "Old School" was "Atomic Dog" by George Clinton. 
The format played Motown, disco, funk, new jack swing, freestyle, and early hip hop from the 1960s to the early 2000s. The new format was designed to better compete with the dominant Urban AC station in Philadelphia, WDAS-FM. 
In November 2014, sister station WPHI moved to a classic hip-hop format. In response, WRNB re-added some current music, although the station continued to focus on older urban hits. 
On October 6, 2016, WRNB moved back to urban adult contemporary music, once more calling itself "100.3 WRNB," and dropping the "Old School" branding. 
On November 16, 2020, at 10 a.m., WRNB adopted sister station WPHI's urban contemporary format, branded as "100.3 R&B & Hip Hop" (subsequently, WRNB's urban adult contemporary format would move their HD2 sub-channel). This was a result of Urban One selling said station to Entercom; the two stations simulcasted for a week, as it had been previously announced that WPHI would begin simulcasting KYW ahead of the sale's closure, on November 23. 
WRNB is short-spaced to two other co-channel Class B stations: WHTZ Z100 (licensed to serve Newark, New Jersey) and WBIG-FM Big 100 (licensed to serve Washington, D.C.). The cities WRNB and WHTZ are licensed to serve are only 86 miles apart, while the cities WRNB and WBIG-FM are licensed to serve are only 112 miles apart. The minimum distance between two Class B stations operating on the same channel according to current FCC rules is 150 miles. 
Beginning in the 1950s, the call sign WRNB was licensed to North Carolina's first full-time rock 'n roll radio station, a 1000-watt outlet in New Bern located at AM 1490 (now sports radio WWNB). WRNB 1490 was also famous for being one of the first radio stations to play Carolina Beach Music.[citation needed] 
Gallifrey: Weapon of Choice is a Big Finish Productions audio drama based on the long-running British science fiction television series Doctor Who. The series is set on the Doctor's home planet of Gallifrey. 
The Doctor is gone forever.  Leela's husband is missing.  And Romana's presidency is under threat.  The Time Lords are now part of a coalition of temporal powers, along with less ancient civilizations such as the Monan Host, the Nekkistani and the Warpsmiths of Phaidon.  Together, they curtail the efforts of less deserving species from making any major breakthroughs with time travel technology.  Those that do are often shunted to a miserable little world called Gryben. 
Some refugees on Gryben wish to strike back at their oppressors by forming a terrorist organization called Free Time.  They weren't taken seriously by the temporal powers, until a rumor surfaced that they had acquired a top secret and highly unstable Time Lord weapon called a Timeonic Fusion Device.  And a mysterious information dealer named Mephistopheles Arkadian won't reveal what he knows. 
The river is named after Barron Township through which it flows, which in turn was named in honour of John Augustus Barron. 
The river begins at Clemow Lake in the geographic township of Barron in the Unorganized South Nipissing District of Nipissing District, Northeastern Ontario. It flows southeast through Grand Lake where it is crossed by the former Canadian Northern Railway later Canadian National Railway main line, now abandoned, and where the Achray campground, formerly a station on the railway, is located on the north shore. 
It passes into Stratton Township, takes in the right tributary Carcajou Creek, then flows out over the Grand Lake Dam and again under the railway to enter Stratton Lake. The river turns northeast, passes over High Falls to High Falls Lake, then heads east over  Brigham Chute. It takes in the right tributary Mulock Creek, enters Master Township, passes over the Cache Rapids, and reaches the Squirrel Depot picnic area and the Squirrel Rapids. 
The river was an important highway during the last part of the 19th century and early 20th century when its water levels were carefully manipulated to facilitate the transport of timber to the Ottawa River and onwards. The Barron Canyon was the scene of noisy log drives every spring. The name the loggers used for the towering cliffs was the "Capes". Moving timber in this way was a dangerous task and evidence can be found by the graves still found on the edge of the Petawawa and Barron Rivers. 
A notable feature in the park is the eastern part of the Barron Canyon, that provide a microclimate in its cracks and crevices for plants that are more at home in the subarctic. On top of the cliffs are red and white pine forests. 
It is a non-operating park without any facilities or services. Permitted activiities include boating, canoeing, fishing, and hunting. 
He served as Governor of Montevideo between August 2, 1790, and February 11, 1797, and in 1792 was promoted to Field Marshal. 
This article article about the history of Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In early 2010, Nick Rizzuto, without notice, stopped paying the hosting fees for Conservativepunk.com, causing the website and discussion forum to become inaccessible. Longtime members and regular posters created a replacement site, ConPunk.com, in order to maintain the community, but that site went offline in May 2013, in favor of a Facebook group which too has closed as of 2014. 
Calderon Fournier was elected secretary of secondary education issues of the Partido Unificacion Nacional (PUN). At 20 he was elected President of the Youth of the PUN. Shortly after the death of his father in 1970, he was appointed to the board of the Caja Costarricense de Seguro Social. In that capacity he participated in the drafting of the new regulations of the retirement systems of the country .[citation needed] 
He was elected congressman in 1974 and served for two consecutive terms as chairman of the Committee on Social Affairs. Among other important bills, the commission adopted the Law on Social Development and Family Allowances, which gave the country a non-contributory pension scheme, which now covers more than a hundred thousand elderly (citation required). 
After an alleged corruption scandal he was incarcerated in October 2004. He was released from jail and was placed under house arrest. 
Trifolium pratense, the red clover, is a herbaceous species of flowering plant in the bean family Fabaceae, native to Europe, Western Asia, and northwest Africa, but planted and naturalized in many other regions. 
Red clover's flowers and leaves are edible, and can be added as garnishes to any dish. They can be ground into a flour. 
The flowers often are used to make jelly and tisanes, and are used in essiac recipes. Their essential oil may be extracted and its unique scent used in aromatherapy. 
Trifolium pratense is used in traditional medicine of India as deobstruent, antispasmodic, expectorant, sedative, anti-inflammatory and antidermatosis agent. 
Red clover contains coumestrol, a phytoestrogen. Due to its activity on oestrogen receptors, red clover is contraindicated in people with a history of breast cancer, endometriosis, ovarian cancer, uterine cancer, uterine fibroids or other oestrogen-sensitive conditions, although some authors have suggested the high isoflavone content counteracts this, and even provides benefits in these conditions. It is said to be a blood cleanser. 
It is metabolised by CYP3A4 and therefore caution should be used when taking it with other drugs using this metabolic pathway. 
Red clover is subject to bacterial as well as fungal diseases, including the red clover rust, Uromyces trifolii-repentis var. fallens. Other problems include parasitic nematodes (roundworms) and viruses. 
In the western part of the ocean of Tethys, the Berriasian consists of four ammonite biozones, from top to bottom (latest to earliest): 
The top of the Berriasian stage is defined by the base of the Valanginian, which is fixed at the first appearance of calpionellid species Calpionellites darderi. This is just a little below the first appearance of the ammonite species Thurmanniceras pertransiens. 
Regional terms used in Russia include "Volgian"(which spans perhaps the latest Kimmeridgian, all the Tithonian and an uncertain amount of the lower Berriasian) and the "Ryazanian" (?upper Berriasian) . 
This article about the Municipality of Ribnica na Pohorju in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Until 2006, members paid a nominal subscription to receive a quarterly publication, the Curry Club Magazine with contributions from members and professionals, including regular features on curry and the curry lands, news items, recipes and reports on restaurants. Now, membership is free of charge, and regularly updated information is sent online. 
Curry Club members form the national network of reporters, which leads to the selection of restaurants in the Good Curry Guide and achievement awards to the top restaurants. 
The Club holds hands-on private and group cooking tutorials at its Haslemere cooking school, and on the social side organises gourmet nights at selected restaurants and venues. Between 1983 and 2009, the Club organised sixteen gourmet trips to India and other countries, where a small group of enthusiasts engages in sightseeing as well as sampling the food of each region. 
Chapman founded the Curry Club as a hobby business in January 1982 at a time in which little information had been published on the subject of curry and many of the published recipes were complicated and contained hard-to-get ingredients. 
This article about an organisation in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She competed at the 2012 Summer Paralympics, winning a gold medal in the 100 metre breaststroke S6 event, and at the 2016 Summer Paralympics where she won silver medals in the 50 metre freestyle S6, 100 metre freestyle S6 and 100 metre breaststroke SB5 events. 
Savtsova also competed at the 2013 IPC Swimming World Championships where she broke the world record and won a gold medal in the 50 metre freestyle event and won silver medals in the 100 metre breaststroke event and the 4 x 50 metre freestyle relay. She also won silver medals in the 100 metre freestyle and 50 metre freestyle events at the 2015 Championships. 
King recalled that she entered the business after selling a few short stories to pulp magazines and arranged a meeting with Thomas Ince. "I've read some of your stuff and I think your literary style is absolutely lousy," she later recounted Ince saying. "But you've got a good sense of drama, and I'll give you $50 a week." Five years later, she was making $1,500 a week. 
She was married several times. One was a short marriage to silent film director John Griffith Wray, who died just nine months after their October 1928 wedding. After a later husband, George Hiram Boyd, lost most of her $400,000 fortune ($7.4 million today) to bad investments, she divorced him in 1940. 
She wrote her last screenplay for the 1947 movie That's My Man and disappeared at age 53. She had been having poor health. She was never heard from again, and there is no known record of her death. 
This was the final series of the three-year deal signed by Simon Cowell in 2010, before it was announced by ITV on 15 November that the show's contract was extended by a further three years, keeping it on air until 2016. 
Between 25 March and 1 April 2013, mobile auditions took place in Inverness, Great Yarmouth, Warrington, Aberdeen, Colchester, Hull, Dumfries, Grimsby, Romford, Belfast, Newport on the Isle of Wight, Sunderland, Wakefield, Bangor, Middlesbrough, Yeovil, Aberystwyth, Blackburn, Dublin, Blackpool, Cork, Merthyr Tydfil and Newport in Wales. It was reported that around 20 people attended Colchester auditions on 26 March and producers tried to convince passers-by to audition. 
The first room audition episode aired on 31 August, and featured auditions from Cardiff, Manchester, London and Birmingham. The second room audition episode featured auditions from Manchester, Cardiff and Glasgow. The third room audition episode showcased auditions from London, Manchester, Birmingham and Glasgow. 
^1  Due to band member SeSe Foster being in the hospital, Miss Dynamix did not perform and were given a bye week which automatically advanced them to the following week. They would have performed "Dreams", but actually performed the song the following week. 
The flash vote was "rested" this week because of lack of time, due to Rodgers and Chic's performance, and the two acts receiving the fewest votes were announced during Sunday's results show. 
However, voting statistics revealed that Kingsland Road received more votes than Foster which meant that if Walsh sent the result to deadlock, Kingsland Road would have been saved. 
The acts performed with a 36-piece live band, instead of a backing track. The flash vote did not return this week, and a show source said there were no plans for it to return. Cowell made an appearance during rehearsals via VT this week and told the final 8 they would be taking part in the 2014 live tour. 
A minimum of 15p from every contestant vote cast, plus a minimum of 50p from every track downloaded from this weekend's live performances, will be donated to the Disasters Emergency Committee's relief efforts following Typhoon Haiyan. 
However, voting statistics revealed that Barrett received more votes than Rough Copy which meant that if Walsh sent the result to deadlock, Barrett would have advanced to the quarter-final and Rough Copy would have been eliminated. 
For the first time this series, contestants performed two songs each. One song was chosen by a public vote via the official The X Factor app. On 24 November, the song choices for the public were revealed. 
With the acts in the bottom two receiving two votes each, the result went to deadlock and reverted to the earlier public vote. Foster was eliminated as the act with the fewest public votes. 
With the acts in the bottom two receiving two votes each, the result went to deadlock and reverted to the earlier public vote. Friend advanced to the final as the act with the most public votes. 
1 Includes advert breaks 2 Excludes ITV+1 3 The rank for the ITV broadcast, compared with all channels for that week, from Monday to Sunday. 
Robin Thicke's performance, which featured a large number of scantily-clad female dancers, also received a total of 317 complaints. On 16 December, both Gaga and Thicke were cleared of any wrongdoing, with an Ofcom spokesman stating, "We assessed the complaints and concluded there were no grounds to investigate." 
There were technical problems during Sam Bailey's duet performance with Scherzinger, when Jedward's voices could be heard as they completed a microphone test. The duet was panned by viewers who accused Scherzinger of being "selfish" by singing the "best" lines and notes of the song. 
NCIS revolves around a fictional team of special agents from the Naval Criminal Investigative Service, which conducts criminal investigations involving the U.S. Navy and Marine Corps. 
Roberto Sanchez (born May 5, 1986) is an American mixed martial artist  (MMA) and he competes in the Flyweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC). 
Sanchez made his professional debut in 2015. He was featured in the debut episode of Dana White's Looking For A Fight web series Session 1, Episode 5. After amassed a record of 8-0, he was signed by UFC. 
Sanchez made his promotional debut on August 5, 2017 at UFC Fight Night: Pettis vs. Moreno, facing Joseph Morales.  He lost the fight via a rear-naked choke in round one. 
His next fight came February 18, 2018 against Joby Sanchez at  UFC Fight Night: Cowboy vs. Medeiros. He won the fight via submission in round one. 
On September 8, 2018, Sanchez faced Ryan Benoit  at UFC 228. However, it was reported that Benoit pulled out from the event for undisclosed reason and he was replaced by Jarred Brooks. He lost the fight via split decision. 
Sanchez works a full-time job as an actuarial analyst and he worked as a high school mathematics teach and special education teach prior starting competing MMA professionally. 
This is a list of UNIVAC products. It ends in 1986, the year that Sperry Corporation merged with Burroughs Corporation to form Unisys as a result of a hostile takeover bid launched by Burrough's CEO W. Michael Blumenthal.[circular reference]. 
Krzysztof Walencik (born 26 February 1965) is a Polish wrestler. He competed in the men's freestyle 74 kg at the 1992 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Polish sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a member of the Wisconsin State Senate is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A right-handed batsman and right-arm medium pace bowler, he played first-class cricket for both the Fiji national cricket team and Auckland in the 1950s. 
He made his first-class debut against Otago on Fiji's 1954 tour of New Zealand, playing three further matches on the tour. He then attended university in New Zealand, and played four first-class matches for Auckland in the Plunket Shield. 
The Alien comic books are part of the Alien franchise and has had several titles published based on the license, most of which are part of the Dark Horse Comics line, but other comics by other distributors have been made. 
Alien: The Illustrated Story is a critically acclaimed graphic novel adaptation of the original 1979 movie Alien, published by Heavy Metal magazine the same year. The creative team consisted of Archie Goodwin as the scriptwriter and Walt Simonson as the artist. It won the Harvey Award for Best Graphic Album of Previously Published Work in 2013. 
Dark Horse Comics is the most well-known publisher of Aliens comics, having published many limited series from 1988 to 1999. Publishing took a hiatus until 2009. 
Stories based on the Alien franchise published in comics not related to the franchise, such as the Dark Horse Presents anthology title. 
Marvel Comics obtained the license to the Aliens comics following the acquisition of 21st Century Fox by Disney, along with new Predator and Alien vs. Predator titles. A new Alien series was published, starting in March 2021. 
Phelps's rapid improvement culminated when he qualified for the 2000 Summer Olympics at the age of 15, as he became the youngest male (since Ralph Flanagan in 1932) to make a U.S. Olympic swim team in 68 years. While he did not win a medal, he did make the finals and finished fifth in the 200-meter butterfly. 
At the 2005 World Championship Trials, Phelps decided to drop his specialty events, the 400-meter individual medley and the 200-meter butterfly, and experiment with the 400-meter freestyle and the 100-meter freestyle. Phelps went on to win the 400-meter freestyle, the 200-meter freestyle, the 100-meter butterfly, the 100-meter freestyle, and the 200-meter individual medley at the Trials. 
At the 2006 National Championships, Phelps won three events. In his first event, the 200-meter butterfly, Phelps won with a championship record of 1:54.32. In his second event, the 100-meter butterfly, Phelps just edged out Ian Crocker 51.51 (another championship record) to 51.73. In his third event, the 200-meter individual medley, Phelps won with a time of 1:56.50, just ahead of Ryan Lochte's time of 1:56.78. 
Phelps set an Olympic record in the preliminary heats of the 400-meter individual medley. He followed that up in the final by winning the gold medal, as well as breaking his previous world record by nearly two seconds. 
For his third race, Phelps broke his previous world record in the 200-meter freestyle by nearly a second and won his third gold medal. He also set his third world record at the Olympics, 1:42.96, winning by nearly two seconds over silver medalist Park Tae-hwan. In this race, Phelps became the fifth Olympic athlete in modern history to win nine gold medals, joining Mark Spitz, Larisa Latynina, Paavo Nurmi, and Carl Lewis. 
After taking a day off from finals (Phelps did swim in qualifying heats), Phelps won his sixth gold of the Beijing Games on August 15 by winning the 200-meter individual medley with a world record time of 1:54.23, finishing ahead of Cseh by over two seconds. 
Unlike all six of his previous events in the 2008 Games, Phelps did not set a new world record, leaving intact Ian Crocker's world-record time of 50.40 seconds, set in 2005. 
At the 2009 National Championships, Phelps drastically shortened his program, swimming in only three individual events. In his first event, the 200-meter freestyle, Phelps won with a time of 1:44.23. In his second event, the 200-meter butterfly, Phelps easily won with a time of 1:52.76, 0.88 seconds ahead of the second-place finisher. In his third event, the 100-meter butterfly, Phelps won with a world-record time of 50.22. 
He repeated the achievement of winning the same event at three Olympics the following evening, winning the Olympic gold medal in the 100 m butterfly, his last individual event. After two very close victories in the 100 m butterfly at the 2004 and 2008 Olympics (by 0.04 and 0.01 sec, respectively), in this race Phelps beat Le Clos and Yevgeny Korotyshkin, who tied for silver, by 0.23 sec. 
After the 2012 Olympics, Phelps retired from swimming, stating: "I'm done. I'm finished. I'm retired. I'm done. No more," and that "I just wanted to be done with swimming and didn't want anything to do with the sport anymore." 
After having been dropped from the team for the 2015 World Aquatics Championships for a DUI, Phelps instead competed in the US National Championships (long course) in San Antonio as his target meet of the summer. He won gold medals in the 100-meter butterfly (50.45 s), 200-meter butterfly (1:52.94), and the 200-meter individual medley (1:54.75). In each of these events he swam the fastest time in the world for 2015. 
In December 2015 at the Winter Nationals in Federal Way, Phelps won titles in the same three events, again in long course, bringing his career total to 62 national titles. 
Phelps's performance in the Rio Olympics was unique in "winning multiple gold medals at 31 years old, well beyond the typical peak for male swimmers". Phelps is considered one of the greatest Olympians of all time. 
Bob Bowman described Phelps as "a solitary man" with a "rigid focus" at the pool prior to a race, but afterward "a man incredibly invested in the success of the people he cares about". He states that "he's unbelievably kind-hearted", recounting Phelps's interaction with young children after practices. 
Phelps has also cited Michael Jordan as a sporting idol of his, and stated that "he changed the sport of basketball". Phelps is also a fan of the Baltimore Ravens and stated that he found his life purpose and desire to compete in the 2016 Summer Olympics after seeking Ray Lewis's advice. 
In January 2018, Phelps revealed that he has struggled both with ADHD and depression, having contemplated suicide after the 2012 Olympics. 
At age 19 in November 2004, Phelps was arrested for driving under the influence of alcohol in Salisbury, Maryland. He pleaded guilty to driving while impaired and was sentenced to serve 18 months of probation, fined $250, ordered to speak to high school students about drinking and driving, and to attend a Mothers Against Drunk Driving (MADD) meeting. When Phelps was later asked about the incident by Matt Lauer on the Today Show, he said that he had "let a lot of people in the country down". 
In February 2009, a photograph of Phelps using a bong went viral; this resulted in the loss of the Kellogg Company as a sponsor, as well as a three-month suspension by USA Swimming. Phelps admitted that the photo, which was taken at a party at the University of South Carolina, was authentic. He publicly apologized, saying his behavior was "inappropriate". 
The Foundation's largest event is its annual fundraiser, the Michael Phelps Foundation Golf Classic. Phelps stated he hoped to work with his Foundation more after retirement from competition following the 2012 Summer Olympics in London. 
In 2017, Phelps joined the board of Medibio, a company focused on diagnosis of mental health disorders. 
In 2011, Michael Phelps: Push the Limit, an Xbox 360/Kinect game, was released, which promised to bring "the fun, fitness and excitement of head to head swimming to your living room." The game received a lukewarm review from ABC News, which observed that "the title would have been better as cheap downloadable content or packaged in a larger Olympic sports world." 
Phelps was a USA Olympic team member in 2000, 2004, 2008, 2012 and 2016, and holds the records for most Olympic gold medals (23), most such medals in individual events (13), and most such medals at a single games (8, in Beijing 2008). A street in his hometown of Baltimore was renamed The Michael Phelps Way in 2004. On April 9, 2009, Phelps was invited to appear before the Maryland House of Delegates and the Maryland Senate, to be honored for his Olympic accomplishments. 
r = relay lead-off *Phelps is a former WR holder in this event, however, his personal best came in a 2nd-place finish to Ryan Lochte's new WR at the 2011 World Championships. 
Phelps has set 39 world records (29 individual, 10 relay), which is more records than any other swimmer that is recognized by FINA; this achievement surpassed Mark Spitz's previous record of 33 world records (26 individual, 7 relay).[citation needed] However, Johnny Weissmuller is reported to have broken 67 official world records. 
Phelps holds 20 Guinness World Records which predominantly consist of accumulative Guinness World Records ("Guinness mosts", records formulated starting with "most") for total number of accomplishments and victories in swimming such as: most medals, consecutive number of medals, most medals within one tournament, most records in swimming etc. It is the highest number of accumulative Guinness World Records held by an athlete. 
Elections were held in Elgin County, Ontario on October 22, 2018 in conjunction with municipal elections across the province. 
Elgin County Council consists of the mayors of the constituent municipalities plus the deputy mayors of Central Elgin and Malahide. 
During the Battle of Banjo or Battle of Banyo, British forces besieged German forces entrenched on the Banjo mountain from 4 to 6 November 1915 during the Kamerun campaign of the First World War. By 6 November much of the German force had deserted, while the rest surrendered. The battle resulted in victory for the Allies and breakdown of German resistance in northern Kamerun. 
Aromanian shares many features with modern Romanian, including similar morphology and syntax, as well as a large common vocabulary inherited from Latin. An important source of dissimilarity between Romanian and Aromanian is the adstratum languages (external influences); whereas Romanian has been influenced to a greater extent by the Slavic languages, Aromanian has been more influenced by Greek, with which it has been in close contact throughout its history. 
The preponderant number of Aromanian speakers is found in Greece, with substantial numbers of speakers also found in Albania, Bulgaria, Serbia, and North Macedonia. The latter  was the only country where Aromanians are officially recognized as a national minority, until October 2017 when Albania also officially recognized them. 
Large Aromanian-speaking communities are also found in Romania, where some Aromanians migrated from Greece, Albania, Bulgaria and Serbia, mainly after 1925. Aromanians may have settled in Turkey due to the influence of the Ottoman Empire in the Balkans. Today, there are a few Aromanians living in Turkey.[citation needed] 
Greek influences are much stronger in Aromanian than in other Eastern Romance languages, especially because Aromanian has used Greek words to coin new words (neologisms), while Romanian has based most of its neologisms on French. 
With the arrival of the Turks in the Balkans, Aromanian also received some Turkish words. Still, the lexical composition remains mainly Romance. 
The Aromanian language has some exceptions from the Romance languages, some of which are shared with Romanian: the definite article is a clitic particle appended at the end of the word, both the definite and indefinite articles can be inflected, and nouns are classified in three genders, with neuter in addition to masculine and feminine. 
Aromanian grammar has features that distinguish it from Romanian, an important one being the complete disappearance of verb infinitives, a feature of the Balkan sprachbund. As such, the tenses and moods that, in Romanian, use the infinitive (like the future simple tense and the conditional mood) are formed in other ways in Aromanian. For the same reason, verb entries in dictionaries are given in their indicative mood, present tense, first-person-singular form. 
Aromanian verbs are classified in four conjugations. The table below gives some examples and indicates the conjugation of the corresponding verbs in Romanian. 
The future tense is formed using an auxiliary invariable particle "u" or "va" and the subjunctive mood. 
Only the auxiliary verb inflects according to number and person (aviam, aviai, avia, aviamu, aviatu, avia), whereas the past participle does not change. 
Films produced in the Aromanian language include Toma Enache's I'm Not Famous but I'm Aromanian (2013) and Pero Tsatsa's Carvanea Armaneasca (2015). 
Even before the incorporation of various Aromanian-speaking territories into the Greek state (1832, 1912), the language was subordinated to Greek, traditionally the language of education and religion in Constantinople and other prosperous urban cities. The historical studies cited below (mostly Capidan) show that especially after the fall of Moscopole (1788) the process of Hellenisation via education and religion gained a strong impetus mostly among people doing business in the cities. 
The Romanian state began opening schools for the Romanian-influenced Vlachs in the 1860s, but this initiative was regarded with suspicion by the Greeks, who thought that Romania was trying to assimilate them. 19th-century travellers in the Balkans such as W. M. Leake and Henry Fanshawe Tozer noted that Vlachs in the Pindus and Macedonia were bilingual, reserving the Latin dialect for inside the home. 
The following text is given for comparison in Aromanian and in Romanian, with an English translation. The spelling of Aromanian is that decided at the Bitola Symposium of August 1997. The word choice in the Romanian version was such that it matches the Aromanian text, although in modern Romanian other words might have been more appropriate. The English translation is only provided as a guide to the meaning, with an attempt to keep the word order as close to the original as possible. 
This article about a place in Salta Province, Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a place in Jujuy Province, Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Black River Falls is the second album from Cathal Coughlan. It was released in October 2000 on Cooking Vinyl Records (COOKCD 126). 
Scouting in Guernsey is organisationally part of the Scout Association of the United Kingdom, covering the Bailiwick of Guernsey in the Channel Islands, which are not part of the United Kingdom. 
The Guernsey Scout Association is the largest co-educational youth organisation within the Bailiwick of Guernsey.  As of 2016 over 700 young people and 150 adults are members, belonging to the 10 groups in Guernsey and 1 in Alderney.  
Zhitnitsa is a village in the municipality of Dobrichka, in Dobrich Province, in northeastern Bulgaria. 
The member lineup for the title track and several supporting B-sides was determined by the results from the annual election held by AKB48 and its several sister groups. Rino Sashihara, having won the election for the third time, serves as the center (choreography center) in the title song. 
16 members, ranked 1st to 16th of the 45th single general election, were selected for the song. The choreography center is Rino Sashihara. 
16 members, ranked 17th to 32nd of the 45th single general election, are called Under Girls and sing this song. 
16 members, ranked 33rd to 48th of the 45th single general election, are called Next Girls and sing this song. 
16 members, ranked 49th to 64th of the 45th single general election, are called Future Girls and sing this song. 
16 members, ranked 65th to 80th of the 45th single general election, are called Upcoming Girls and sing this song. 
This biographical article related to Swazi association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 This debacle led Di Giovanni to suspend his bombing campaign; he focused instead on his journal Culmine. In 1929, he wrote: 
On 1 April 1963, he was promoted to inspector of police and sent to the United Kingdom for further studies. On 10 October 1963, he was promoted to the gazetted rank of assistant superintendent of police. On 5 September 1964, he was transferred from Arua to Fort Portal, still attached to the Special Branch, serving in that capacity until 8 June 1965, when he was transferred to Special Branch Headquarters in Kampala. 
On 10 October 10, 1970, he was promoted to superintendent of police. On 13 May 1973, he was promoted to senior assistant commissioner of police. On 1 January 1974, he was appointed commissioner of police. 
As IGP, Ofungi's deputy was Ali Toweli. George William Luzide Mukasa was appointed  Director of the Criminal Investigation Department, (CID) and Aisu was made Director of the Special Branch. On 1 August 1974, Inspector General Luke Ofungi was sent on leave by President Idi Amin after defying the dictator openly at a security meeting. Knowing that his life was in danger, Ofungi fled across the border with his family to exile in Nairobi, Kenya. 
After the fall of Amin's regime, Ofungi returned and was appointed Deputy Inspector General of Police on 9 October 1979, to help reorganize the Police Force. He was later sent to Nairobi in Uganda's Foreign Service. On 15 May 1980, he was appointed Inspector General of Police, serving in that capacity until 1 May 1981, when he took leave of absence, under the government of President Milton Obote. 
United Commercial Travelers or UCT is a non-profit financial services membership organization that supports communities and causes across the United States and Canada. The organization is headquartered in Columbus, Ohio, just south of Grandview Heights. 
The Order of United Commercial Travelers was formed on January 16, 1888 by six men in a meeting at the Neil House in Columbus, Ohio to provide a society for traveling salesmen, or commercial travelers. 
The new organization's officers adopted titles similar to those of other organizations of the day. Levi Pease was the first Supreme Counselor, John Fenimore was the first Supreme Junior Counselor, and Charles Flagg was the first Supreme Secretary. 
The sample case, a vital tool in the life of a commercial traveler, became the symbol of UCT. The original emblem of the organization consisted of a gold crescent with a sample case suspended within the points of the crescent. 
In 1956, the Order founded the UCT Fraternal Foundation which has yielded income to the Retarded Children Teachers Reserve Fund. Early in the Order history it paid out $25 a week to members disabled as the result of an accident, and beginning in 1894 it paid out $5,000 in accidental death benefits. 
With the development of transcontinental rail in the late 1800s markets for many products expanded west and into Canada.  Commercial travelers headed west and north to take advantage of these new markets. 
As they did, they took with them information about UCT and its membership benefits. Winnipeg Council 154 became the first UCT Canadian council in 1899. 
The order had a ritual that included an oath of secrecy, vows to aid other brothers and their dependents, obey the laws of their country and aid in caring for the sick, among other things. An older version included a vow to never violate the chastity of a maiden. The ritual included five lectures and was full of religious symbolism, with an altar and an open Bible. 
Membership is open to both men and women age 18 and above who have an interest in good citizenship and volunteering to improve their local communities.  Members of local councils have the ability to direct volunteer efforts based on the needs of the local community.[citation needed] 
Providing leadership and direction to local councils are 29 regional and state councils in the U.S. and Canada. Regional councils help with local council operations, provide direction and form new councils. Officers are elected at the regional level and serve one-year terms.[citation needed] 
The board hires the CEO who is responsible for the operations of UCT's home office. The CEO and the rest of the Senior Management team oversee insurance operations and Fraternal operations in the home office in Columbus and the Canadian office in Calgary.[citation needed] 
Agents are members and active within local councils. They provide products based on the financial needs of individuals and families in their areas.[citation needed] 
Saw You in a Dream is the fourth extended play by English indie pop act the Japanese House, released on 30 June 2017 through Dirty Hit. It was preceded by Swim Against the Tide, and was followed by her debut album Good at Falling, released 1 March 2019. Upon release, it received mostly positive reviews from critics, with some criticism for a lack of deviation from Bain's established style. 
The EP's lead single, "Saw You in a Dream", was inspired by an experience Bain had dreaming of someone she had known who had recently died. The title track "Saw You In a Dream" was released as a single on 26 April 2017. 
The EP has been described as dream pop, electropop, yacht rock and indie pop. The EP includes a combination of 80s-esque synth beats, acoustic guitars, layered vocals, and melancholic lyrics. 
Saw You in a Dream received mostly positive reviews for its composition, symphonic arrangements, and Bain's development of a distinctive style compared to the varied and experimental style of her previous releases. Nicole Almeida of Atwood Magazine positively reviewed the EP, commenting that Bain "talks about love, friendship, loss, and life through mesmerizing and descriptive lyrics which, when coupled with her hypnotizing melodies, result in honest and heartwarming songs." 
The single "Saw You in a Dream" was especially well-received for its heartfelt lyrics and contrastingly upbeat melodies. "Count to Nine" was also praised for its dreamy quality, and complex progression. 
Two fossil species of Steindachneridion have been found. The first to be described, S. iherengi (Woodward, 1898) was first described to Arius, but subsequently moved to Steindachneridion; though originally considered to be of Pleistocene age, it was later found to be actually of Oligocene age. The second fossil species to be described was S. silvasantosi Figueiredo & Costa-Carvalho, 1999. 
The phylogenetic placement of Steindachneridion and its relationship to other pimelodid genera is unresolved. These fish have been classified with Sorubim-like fish such as Brachyplatystoma and Pseudoplatystoma. They have also been classified as being more closely related to Phractocephalus and Leiarius. 
The large species of Steindachneridion always occur in swift-flowing, clear-water rivers running over large stony beds. These fish are naturally scarce in their habitats. 
This biographical article related to a Mexican association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
James Sohn holds a Bachelor of Arts degree from the University of California, Berkeley; a Master of Business Administration from University of Phoenix, and a Master of Arts from King's College London. He is a LEED accredited professional, licensed general contractor in the state of California and a member of the London-based think tank, International Institute of Strategic Studies. 
James Sohn initially worked as a consultant at LAUSD prior to becoming a Senior Project Manager for Robert F. Kennedy Community Learning Center.  This is considered the largest, most expensive school ever built in the United States, at a cost of over $578 million. The school is located on the site where Senator Robert F. Kennedy was shot and killed in 1968. It can hold 4,200 students and includes a manicured public park, swimming pool and fine art murals. 
He returned to LAUSD in July 2009 as a Deputy Chief of Facilities, eventually replacing the previous Chief of Facilities, Guy Mehula.  Mehula was criticized for the use of expensive consultants. 
One of James Sohn's priorities was the use of renewable energy.  On February 10, 2011, LAUSD officials gathered at Canoga Park High School to celebrate the activation of a 273-kilowatt (kW), 896-solar-panel system on the school's rooftops.  Sohn's goal is to achieve 21 megawatts of power in the next three years installing solar panels in various schools.  Projections show that this will save approximately $112 million in utility costs over 20 years. 
During his tenure at LAUSD, the district halted a cleanup effort of draft and outdated electronic versions of documents.  After Teamsters union complaints, LAUSD halted this practice. 
James Sohn would work to increase the speed of DSA approved projects.  On September 14, 2010 the Board of Education approved a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Division of State Architect (DSA) that would provide up to 8 million dollars to fund a DSA Certification pilot program that sought to relieve the backlog of DSA Certification files backlog that has developed over the last 12 years of construction. 
There were some bright spots to the season. Larry Jackson and Lindy McDaniel, who found success and saved 15 games after an early-season move to the bullpen, each won a team-high 14 games. Also, third baseman Ken Boyer won a Gold Glove this year. 
Right fielder Joe Cunningham led the National League in on-base percentage at .453 and batted .345 to finish second to Hank Aaron for the National League batting title. 
Note: Pos = Position; G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; SV = Saves; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Selva is a village in Tuscany, central Italy,  administratively a frazione of the comune of Santa Fiora, province of Grosseto. At the time of the 2001 census its population amounted to 100. 
In 1885, Konradi took one of her son's to Switzerland for medical care for his consumption, but he died. After his death, Konradi never returned to Russia, dying in a public hospital in Paris in 1898. 
The station was opened on 9 September 1863 by the Inverness and Perth Junction Railway (I&PJn) when the I&PJn opened the section from Aviemore to Pitlochry. 
The station had two platforms, connected with a footbridge, either side of a passing loop, there was a goods yard to the north that was able to accommodate most types of goods including live stock, it was equipped with a five-ton crane. There were two signal boxes and a turntable. 
The original station buildings were constructed of wood and were destroyed in a fire in April 1893. A replacement station building in stone was erected in 1893. 
A serious accident occurred on 2 August 1894 when the morning passenger train from Perth to Inverness collided with a goods train. One passenger was killed and several were badly injured. 
The station is served by trains to Inverness and Glasgow or Edinburgh, a Sunday southbound HST train service to London King's Cross and a nightly Caledonian Sleeper service to London Euston. The station has just one platform; since it was shortened the main building is now a private residence and is now no longer part of the platform. Because the platform is short, express services overrun the platform commonly.[citation needed] The station was listed for closure but was saved. 
EusLisp is a Lisp-based programming system. Built on the basis of object orientation, it is designed specifically for developing robotics software. The first version of it ran in 1986 on Unix-System5/Ustation-E20. 
Galvis played youth football for Once Caldas between the ages of five and seven, and with St. Catharines Concord from the age of seven. In April 2013 he and two teammates (including Adam Bouchard) left Oakville SC to sign for Uruguayan club Defensor Sporting. 
He spent 2014 with Burlington SC, before playing college soccer in 2015 with the Niagara Purple Eagles. 
He was named to Canada's provisional 40-man roster for the 2017 Gold Cup, but was ultimately not called up for the tournament. 
This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Colombia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paranotothenia magellanica was first formally described as Gadus magellanicus in 1801 by the German naturalist Johann Reinhold Forster with the type locality given as the Straits of Magellan. The Russian ichthyologist Arkady Vladimirovich Balushkin placed it in its own monotypic genus, Paranotothenia, in 1976. A second species P. dewitti was described by Balushkin in 1990. The specific name refers to the type locality. 
After finishing second over 1100 metres on his racecourse debut, and then won the Prix de Cabourg over 1200 metres at Deauville Racecourse. He was then moved up in class for the Group One Prix Morny over the same course and distance on 19 August. Ridden by Freddy Head he started at odds of 14/1 and finished sixth of the seven runners behind Nonoalco. 
Dankaro made very little impact as a breeding stallion, siring few foals and no winners of any consequence. According to one questionable source he died in 1979 at the age of eight. 
Grant McConachie Way is a three-to-six lane expressway in Richmond and Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada. Named for aviator Grant McConachie, it is the primary access road into Vancouver International Airport on Sea Island. It is also one of the three roads entering Vancouver from the south, along with Knight Street and Oak Street. Upon entering Vancouver, the road becomes Southwest Marine Drive. 
The road crosses the Arthur Laing Bridge over the North Arm Fraser River. Its east-west alignment on Sea Island between the Arthur Laing Bridge and the airport is closely paralleled by SkyTrain's Canada Line. 
This British Columbia road, road transport or highway-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Minico High School, also known as Minidoka County High School, is a four-year public secondary school in Minidoka County, Idaho, operated by the Minidoka County Joint School District #331. The school colors are red and gold and the mascot is a Spartan  
Minico High School opened 66 years ago in 1955, consolidating four high schools: Rupert, Paul, Heyburn, and Acequia. Towns in the MHS jurisdiction include: Acequia, Burley (Minidoka Co. portion), Heyburn, Minidoka, Paul, and Rupert. The campus is located on State Highway 25 (West 100 South) between the cities of Rupert and Paul, just west of the Rupert Country Club. 
The name Minico is a contraction of "Minidoka County." The only traditional high school in the county, its jurisdiction includes the entire county, as well as the rural Yale area in the panhandle of southeastern Blaine County and the very northeastern part of Lincoln County, near Kimama. MHS is fed by two middle schools: East Minico in Rupert and West Minico in Paul. 
Minico offers a variety of clubs and student oriented programs including: Key Club, Leo Club, Student Body/Council Government, Business Club, Young Republicans, Young Democrats, French Club, Spanish Club, FCCLA, Speech Arts Club, Ski Club, Mountain Bike Club, and FFA. Minico also features a cheerleading squad and the Spartan Dance Force. The school's student newspaper is The Spartan Chronicle. Minico also offers three music organizations: band, choir and orchestra. 
Minico competes in athletics in IHSAA Class 4A and is a member of the Great Basin (West) Conference with Burley, Jerome, and Wood River, all located in the Magic Valley region of Idaho. In August 2009, the conference added Twin Falls and just-opened Canyon Ridge, both located in Twin Falls. 
Minico has many varsity sports including boys and girls basketball, boys and girls soccer, tennis, golf, cross country, bowling, wrestling, track and field, volleyball, football, baseball, and softball. 
Minico teams have had recent success in several sports. Spartan wrestlers won 4A state championships in several weight classes in 2006 and took the team title. MHS had previously won the state title in 1962 (one class) and 1969 (large school). 
Minico's main predecessor, Rupert High School, won three state titles: one in basketball (1925) and two in track (1924, 1947). 
 The fifth round (also known as the Hexagonal or Hex) of CONCACAF matches for 2018 FIFA World Cup qualification was played from 11 November 2016 to 10 October 2017. Mexico, Costa Rica, and Panama qualified for the 2018 FIFA World Cup, while Honduras qualified for (and was later eliminated in) the inter-confederation play-offs. The United States (who failed to qualify for the World Cup for the first time in 32 years) and Trinidad and Tobago were eliminated in this round. 
Note: Bolded teams qualified for the World Cup. Italicised team advanced to the inter-confederation play-offs. 
One kilometre past Marl Mitte was the former halt of Marl-Drewer. The station was abandoned with the conversion of the line to S-Bahn operations due to the short distance between the stations. The halt had a platform on the eastern side of the line. 
The halt of Marl-Hamm is located in the north of the city on an embankment. A section of the A 52 runs parallel to the line. The halt has a side platform and can be reached by stairs and lifts. 
Clearwater National Forest with headquarters on the Nez Perce Reservation at Kamiah is located in North Central Idaho in the northwestern United States.  The forest is bounded on the east by the state of Montana, on the north by the Idaho Panhandle National Forest, and on the south and west by the Nez Perce National Forest and Palouse Prairie. 
The North Fork of the Clearwater and the Lochsa rivers provide miles of tumbling white water interspersed with quiet pools for migratory and resident fish. The mountains provide a habitat for raccoon, elk, moose, black bear, two species of fox, bald eagle, marten, white-tailed and mule deer, coyote, wolf packs, cougar, boreal owl, river otter, muskrat, beaver, pika, fisher, mink, and mountain goat. 
In 2012, Clearwater National Forest and Nez Perce National Forest were administratively combined as Nez Perce-Clearwater National Forests, with headquarters in Kamiah, Idaho. 
The Clearwater National Forest is home to the well-known Jerry Johnson Hot Springs and the smaller Weir Creek Hot Springs. Both springs are accessible via trails from U.S. Highway 12 and are popular tourist attractions, drawing visitors from Idaho and western Montana. 
Lewis and Clark travelled through the region in their journey westward in 1805-1804. Upon reaching Lolo Pass at the eastern edge of the forest on September 15, 1805, William Clark was quoted as saying, 
A small part of the Selway-Bitterroot Wilderness lies within Clearwater National Forest, although the largest portion of the wilderness lies in either the neighboring Nez Perce National Forest, Bitterroot National Forest, or Lolo National Forest. 
The following provides a listing of the individuals who have served as mayor of Fairbanks, Alaska, as well as the ten mayors of the Fairbanks North Star Borough, a county equivalent which includes the city. 
The Fairbanks North Star Borough, which encompasses the city and several surrounding towns and villages, was established by an act of the Alaska State Legislature in 1963 (Chapter 52, Session Laws of Alaska 1963), and incorporated on January 1, 1964.  The borough seat is in Fairbanks. 
The city mayor was originally elected from amongst the council.  This was later changed to the mayor being elected separately by voters for a two-year term, but serving as a figurehead, as the city was administered by a manager.  The mayor began serving as the chief administrator of city government, serving a three-year term, in 1992. 
The borough mayor's position was originally titled chairman, rather than mayor, until the mid-1970s, given the structure which the legislature had originally established for organized boroughs.  The term of office had changed from two years to three years at around the same time.  The position is non-partisan. 
Monotype Grotesque is a family of sans-serif typefaces released by the Monotype Corporation for its hot metal typesetting system. It belongs to the grotesque or industrial genre of early sans-serif designs. Like many early sans-serifs, it forms a sprawling family designed at different times. 
The family was popular in British trade printing, especially its series 215 and 216 regular and bold weights from around 1926, which have been credited to its American-born engineering manager Frank Hinman Pierpont. Several weights have been digitised. 
The inspiration for Monotype Grotesque 215 and 216 has been described as the popular 'Venus' family from the Bauer Type Foundry or 'Ideal', from the H. Berthold AG foundry, which is according to Indra Kupferschmid a Venus clone. Its name descends from William Thorowgood's 1832 face titled "Grotesque." 
Monotype Grotesque has standard characteristics of the 'industrial' sans-serifs of the period. Uppercase characters are of near equal width, the G has a spur in some weights, and the M in the non-condensed weights is square. The 'a' is double-storey. Early fonts have a double-storey 'g' following British tradition and 215 and 216 a single-storey 'g' on the German model. 
Monotype would later use aspects of Monotype Grotesque and New Grotesque as an inspiration for Arial, a new design styled to generally be very similar to Helvetica. 
Monotype Grotesque formed a sprawling family with a range of weights sold at different times. The following is a list of known series numbers, their state in post-war specimens and dates where available. 
A release of light and regular styles (with italics), bold and black, light and standard condensed, regular extra-condensed and bold extended weights. This set is also sold by Adobe. 
A variant with altered designs. The family consists of Bold Condensed and Bold Extended fonts. Digital version was sold by Linotype. 
A less eccentric updating designed by Rod McDonald. The design combines the features in Venus and Ideal Grotesk font families. Alternate characters are also added. The development was originally approved in 2008, and lasted four years. 
The font family originally includes 14 fonts in 7 weights, with a complementary italic. OpenType features include numerators/denominators, fractions, ligatures, lining/old style/proportional and tabular figures, superscript, small capitals, stylistic alternates, stylistic sets 1 and 2 (Roman fonts only). Only one width is offered, without condensed or extended designs. 
OpenType Pro version supports all western European, most central European and many eastern European languages. 
Madhesa is a former village development committee (VDC) in Sunsari District in the Kosi Zone of south-eastern Nepal. It merged with the district's headquarter Inaruwa. At the time of the 1991 Nepal census, it had a population of 4972 people living in 891 individual households. 
This article about a location in Sunsari District, Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Melchiah was a priest in the kingdom of Zedekiah, and the father of Pashur, the messenger who was charged with taking a message from the King to Jeremiah asking for God's intervention in the war against Nebuchadnezzar. 
Barmajhiya  is a village and market center in Kanchanrup Municipality in Saptari District in the Sagarmatha Zone of south-eastern Nepal. It was merged in the municipality along with other 8 Villages since 18 May 2013. At the time of the 1991 Nepal census, it had a population of 3,626 people living in 640 individual households.  Barmajhiya is famous for peda which is made from milk and sugar. 
This article about a location in Saptari District, Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The idea for a film based on the Cuban recovery first arose in August 2003 when Morgan traveled to Cuba as part of the Global Exchange program. Amazed by stories of survival during The Special Period, she learned that the Cuban economic crisis was survived with a fundamental shift in the country's economic policies, rather than with new energy sources. Morgan began securing funds for the film in 2004 with help from Community Services, Inc. and began filming in the fall of the same year. 
Carpina is a city in Pernambuco, Brazil. Its economy is based on commerce and footwear industry. Its current mayor is Manoel Botafogo. 
The main economic activities in Carpina are based in the footwear industry, commerce and agriculture especially sugarcane. 
"Dull Boy" is a single from American band Mudvayne's 2007 album By the People, For the People, later included on the band's 2008 studio album The New Game. 
At the beginning of the song, Chad Gray repeats "All work and no play makes me a dull boy" four times, elevating his voice from a whisper to a scream with each repetition. This is a reference to The Shining. The band has stated in numerous interviews that Stanley Kubrick is Mudvayne's favorite director. 
For the video the band made a green screen contest in which they record themselves in a green screen and upload it to their website so that anyone can do their own version of the video and upload it. 
This article about a Hamburg building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Banca Tirrenica S.p.A. formerly known as Nuova Banca dell'Etruria e del Lazio S.p.A. was an Italian bank based in Arezzo, Tuscany. The bank was re-established on 22 November 2015 as a good bank of the original Banca Popolare dell'Etruria e del Lazio (BPEL). The bank was bought by UBI Banca on 18 January 2017 for a nominal fee. 
Both Tyrrhenian and Etruria were alternative name to the area that located in Central Western Italy. 
Banca Mutua Popolare Aretina was found on 16 April 1881 in Arezzo. On 18 December 1971 the bank absorbed two fellow Tuscan "Popular Bank": Banca Popolare Senese (found 1865 in Siena) and Banca Popolare della Provincia di Livorno, as well as renamed into Banca Popolare dell'Etruria. 
In 1972 Banca Popolare di Montepulciano was absorbed, followed by Banca Popolare di Pontevalleceppi (a Perugia frazione) in 1982, Banca Popolare di Cagli in 1985 and Banca Popolare di Gualdo Tadino in 1987. 
On 31 December 1988 Banca Popolare dell'Alto Lazio (found 1974) was merged into the bank, forming Banca Popolare dell'Etruria e del Lazio. In 1990 Banca Cooperativa di Capraia Montelupo e Vitolini was absorbed. In 1998 the bank was listed in Borsa Italiana (ticker symbol: PEL). 
Clive Robertson, (born 1946 in Plymouth, Devon) is a Canadian performance and media artist, critic, curator, publisher and retired Queen's University art history professor. He is based in Kingston, Ontario. 
Robertson began curating performance art and experimental musics in 1970 in Reading, England programming works by Stuart Marshall, Keith Wood, the Scratch Orchestra and the Portsmouth Sinfonia. 
With the artist and educator, Paul Woodrow, Robertson initiated the international performance art collective, W.O.R.K.S. (We.Ourselves.Roughly. Know.Something) in Calgary producing: The First World Festival of W.O.R.K.S. (1972); the artist television series, Conceptographic Reading of Our World Thermometer (1973); and the community cable satire program, Live Lice (1974). Robertson started the audio art magazine, Voicespondence in 1974 as a W.O.R.K.S. project. 
Clive Robertson's audio, installation, video, sculpture and performance works have been seen, heard and/or collected in many countries including England, Wales, Canada, U.S., Germany, Poland, France, Holland, Japan and Australia. 
Audio and Music Albums include: Space Perception and Construction (1969); Family Music (1972); The Wreckin Role History of Art (1974); Popular songs (1981); Warfare versus Welfare (1985); and Isle of Retirement (2012). 
Clive Robertson, A W.O.R.K.S. Sampler (2016), with Judit Bodor, Gordian Projects, Glasgow-Sheffield-York, U.K. 
Sally Todd (born Sarah Joan Todd; June 7, 1934) is an American actress and model. She was Playboy magazine's Playmate of the Month for the February 1957 issue. Her centerfold was photographed by David Sutton and Ed DeLong. 
She was spotted by a talent scout for 20th Century Fox. That led to a contract with the studio and a movie career that consisted mostly of B-movie roles in The Unearthly and Frankenstein's Daughter. Other motion pictures in which she performed are The Revolt of Mamie Stover (1956), The Saga of the Viking Women and Their Voyage to the Waters of the Great Sea Serpent (1957), Al Capone (1959), and G.I. Blues (1960). 
She was among the models who appeared at the 9th Annual Los Angeles Home Show in June 1954. She also posed for several album covers and men's magazines, including Playboy, in which she first appeared in a non-nude pictorial in June 1956. 
 Mount William  is a small community in the Canadian province of Nova Scotia, located in Pictou County. 
Horseshoe Lake is a town in Crittenden County, Arkansas, United States. The population was 292 at the 2010 census. 
The town is named after Horseshoe Lake, an oxbow lake at the eastern tip of which the town is located. 
The town of Horseshoe Lake is situated in the Mississippi River floodplain at the eastern tip of a U-shaped water body named Horseshoe Lake, which the town is named after. The Lake is a summer recreation spot for residents of nearby Memphis offering boating, swimming, and fishing. 
Changes in the course of the Mississippi River resulted in the shape of the lake. The lake is a former meander in the Mississippi River that was cut off, shortening the river, and is no longer connected to the river. 
Horseshoe shaped lakes or oxbow lakes are not unusual in the flat plains of the lower Mississippi and other rivers. 
Of the 156 households 18.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 47.4% were married couples living together, 4.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 42.9% were non-families. 35.9% of households were one person and 16.7% were one person aged 65 or older.  The average household size was 2.06 and the average family size was 2.65. 
The age distribution was 17.4% under the age of 18, 4.0% from 18 to 24, 26.2% from 25 to 44, 27.4% from 45 to 64, and 24.9% 65 or older.  The median age was 47 years. For every 100 females, there were 92.2 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 89.3 males. 
The median household income was $30,083 and the median family income  was $36,250. Males had a median income of $29,583 versus $23,750 for females. The per capita income for the town was $17,517.  About 4.9% of families and 10.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 3.9% of those under age 18 and 20.5% of those age 65 or over. 
Residents are zoned to schools in the West Memphis School District, which operates Academies of West Memphis (formerly West Memphis High School). The community was previously in the Hughes School District, which operated Hughes High School. 
On April 9, 2015, due to the low number of students in the Hughes district, the Arkansas Board of Education voted to consolidate the Hughes district into the West Memphis district 7-1. 
The 7th Jutra Awards were held on February 20, 2005 to honour films made with the participation of the Quebec film industry in 2004. 
Senegal competed at the 2012 Summer Paralympics in London, United Kingdom from August 29 to September 9, 2012. 
Danielle Rieder (born 14 March 1961) is a Swiss former competitive figure skater. She placed in the top ten at four European Championships, won two medals at the International St. Gervais and three Swiss national titles. Rieder was selected to compete at two Winter Olympics. She withdrew from the 1976 event in Innsbruck following the compulsory figures, in which she placed 16th, but completed all segments at the 1980 event in Lake Placid, New York and finished 14th overall. 
Pfister is also known for his work on director F. Gary Gray's The Italian Job and Bennett Miller's Moneyball. In 2014, Pfister made his directorial debut with Transcendence (2014), through Alcon Entertainment. In addition to feature films, he has also directed commercials and television, including episodes of Flaked and The Tick. 
Within a few months, Pfister found a job as a cameraman for a Washington news service, which provided film for TV stations around the country. He covered the United States Congress, the White House and breaking news from 1982 through 1985. In 1985 Pfister began a freelance career shooting documentaries for the PBS series "Frontline" and industrial videos for various Washington production companies. 
In 1988, Robert Altman came to Washington to direct a mini-series for HBO called Tanner '88 (1988). Altman was looking for a real news cameraman to play that role in his show. They hired Pfister and asked him to also shoot some B-roll. When the producers saw his work, they brought Pfister on the show as the second unit cameraman. It was the first time he was exposed to acting and dramatic material. 
After that experience, Pfister enrolled at the American Film Institute. During his second year, he collaborated with his classmates on a short film called "Senzeni Na?", which was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Live Action Short Film in 1991. The film told the story of a man caught up in the apartheid struggle. Pfister drew on his documentary experience, and lit it darkly and stark, using a single light so the actor could play in and out of that source. 
Pfister shot The Unborn, his first feature, in 1991. After that, he filmed an array of independent B-movies, typically on 15-day schedules. Many of these early films were directed by Gregory Dark. 
Pfister has been nominated for an Academy Award for Best Cinematography four times, each time for a film directed by Nolan. He won an Academy Award for his work on Inception at the 83rd Academy Awards. He also has been nominated three times for the American Society of Cinematographers Award for Outstanding Achievement in Cinematography in Theatrical Releases, for Batman Begins, The Dark Knight and Inception, winning for the latter, in 2011. 
Pfister made his directorial debut with the science fiction thriller Transcendence, starring Johnny Depp, which was released by Warner Bros. on April 18, 2014. The cast also featured Morgan Freeman, Kate Mara, Cillian Murphy, Rebecca Hall, and Paul Bettany. 
Pfister had stated in 2015 he is finished with working as a cinematographer and planned to continue as a director. 
Pfister currently resides in Los Angeles, California and has three children: Nick, actress Claire Julien, and Mia. 
He is a member of the American Society of Cinematographers (ASC) since 2002, and the British Society of Cinematographers (BSC) since 2011. 
The JAC iEV6E is an electric city car produced by JAC Motors from 2016 under the iEV electric vehicle series based on the same platform as the JAC Yueyue. 
The JAC iEV6E was available starting April 2017. Originally debuted in April at the 2016 Beijing Auto Show, the production version was revealed during the 2017 Shanghai Auto Show. It is powered by an electric motor producing 80 HP and 175 Nm of torque. Range is 152 kilometers with a top speed of 102 km/h. 
The Sehol E10X is a restyled version of iEV6E sold in China by the Sehol marque (a joint venture between JAC and Volkswagen Group). The E10X has a different front bumper and grille, new interior but retains the same body and powertrain. 
"Girl in Saskatoon" is a song co-written by Johnny Cash with Johnny Horton and originally recorded by Cash for Columbia. 
It was released as a single (Columbia 4-41920, with "Locomotive Man" on the opposite side). in December 1960, the same month Sun Records released "Oh, Lonesome Me" / "Life Goes On" (Sun 355). 
U.S. Billboard picked the song "Girl in Saskatoon" as one of the "Spotlight winners of the week", giving it four stars that corresponded to a "very strong sales potential". The review called the song "another fine folkish effort by Cash" and continued: 
 It has the quality of one of those old Robert Service poems about the Far North. Solid chanting and it can go.
On the Cash Box country singles chart, "Girl in Saskatoon" reached number 25 during its nine weeks stay. 
Later the song was included on Johnny Cash's albums "Heart of Cash" (1968) & "More of Old Golden Throat" (1969). 
In late July 2011, Emerson signed for Portuguese club S.L. Benfica, for an undisclosed fee. In his first and only season, he beat competition from World and European champion Joan Capdevila. 
Jung finishes his chapter barely ten days before the onset of the illness that led to his death (this is his very last article) and after he has approved the draft of his collaborators. 
After Jung's death, Marie-Louise von Franz assumed the responsibility of taking over the coordination and drafted the conclusion. 
A German-language edition of the book, Der Mensch und seine Symbole, has been published by Patmos Verlag. The illustrations included in this edition are in color. 
This article about a non-fiction book on mythology is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Zike was a company that produced a line of scooter hybrids. The company was based in Greenville, SC, and was founded by inventor and former CEO Nathan Scolari. There were four initial models (Flyby, Hotshot, Slingshot, and Saber) available. Fox Business News called Zike one of "10 Tech-Free Toys Your Kids Will Love", and Zike has been featured on The View. 
The Court Building, or simply The Court, is a structure located on Sycamore's Elm Street and used mostly as an apartment building. The Tudor Revival Court Building is considered a contributing property to the integrity of the district by the National Register of Historic Places, a list the district joined in May 1978.  The Court Building, a free standing structure near downtown Sycamore, is designed in a Tudor Revival motif. 
The Daniel Pierce Block or Daniel Pierce Building is located in downtown Sycamore, Illinois along Illinois Route 64 (State Street). The building is a contributing member of the Sycamore Historic District. It is directly across the street from another notable structure in the district, the National Bank & Trust Co. Building. Today the building is known as Sycamore Center, the Sycamore City Council currently meets in the structure. 
The National Bank & Trust Company Building is located on Illinois Route 64 as it passes through historic downtown Sycamore, Illinois. The building was constructed in 1925 and designed by the Chicago architecture firm of Weary & Alford Company. The bank was founded in 1867 under the name "Daniel Pierce & Co." 
The 1906 Frederick Townsend Garage sits at the base of a small incline overlooked by the large Queen Anne style Townsend House. Last a gas station, the stone building has been used by a number of restaurants since then. 
The Sycamore, Illinois Townsend Building is another contributing property within the Sycamore Historic District. The district is located in and around downtown Sycamore. The Townsend Building is adjacent to, (connected to as well), to the historic building at 156 W. State St. The building was constructed around the turn of the 20th century and is probably the more architecturally interesting of the two adjacent structures. 
The Waterman Block is also located along Illinois Route 64 as it passes through the DeKalb County, Illinois city of Sycamore. The three structures that make up the Waterman Block are the oldest on State Street, Illinois 64. The buildings were constructed in sometime around 1870 by Sycamore merchant James Waterman. 
Employee monitoring software is a means of employee monitoring, and allows company administrators to monitor and supervise all their employee computers from a central location. It is normally deployed over a business network and allows for easy centralized log viewing via one central networked PC. Sometimes, companies opt to monitor their employees using remote desktop software instead. 
Employee monitoring software is used to supervise employees' performance, prevent illegal activities, avoid confidential info leakage, and catch insider threats. Nowadays employee monitoring software is widely used in technology companies. 
The Dennis Sabre is a purpose-built fire engine produced by Dennis Specialist Vehicles of Guildford, Surrey, England from 1995 to 2007. It was the last full-size fire appliance produced by the company before its closure in 2007. 
Destroyed and rebuilt in 1934, the Naka-za became the most major theatre in the city, surpassing the Naniwa-za, but was destroyed along with most of the rest of the city in the 1945 Allied bombing of Osaka in World War II. 
In algebraic geometry, a regular scheme is a scheme whose local rings are regular everywhere. Every smooth scheme is regular, and every regular scheme of finite type over a perfect field is smooth. 
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in 1914 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Murphy left government service in 1953 to practice with a St. Paul law firm. In 1955, Governor Orville Freeman appointed him to the Minnesota Supreme Court. Murphy left the court in 1972, and in 1975, the Security and Exchange Commission appointed Murphy a special agent to assess allegations of secret corporation contributions to the reelection campaign of President Richard M. Nixon. 
Josephine Pon is a Canadian politician who was elected in the 2019 Alberta general election to represent the electoral district of Calgary-Beddington in the 30th Alberta Legislature. She is a member of the United Conservative Party. On April 30, 2019, she was appointed to be the Minister of Seniors and Housing in the Executive Council of Alberta. 
She served the navy fleet during the blockade of ports and waterways of the Confederate States of America as an ammunition ship. 
Port Fire, a screw tug, built at the Portsmouth Navy Yard, Kittery, Maine, in 1863, was launched 8 March 1864. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
Jazan has one of the largest mega projects market in the kingdom with significant infrastructure projects worth many billions of dollars. Saudi Aramco is building a 400,000 bpd refinery with associated terminal facilities on the Red Sea near Jazan, scheduled for completion in late 2018. 
In the early 20th century, Jazan was a major site for pearl fishing. When World War I began, trade declined at Jazan, moving to Al Hudaydah. 
Today, ambitious projects in transport, renewable energy, tourism and agricultural development are taking place in Jizan region, particularly in Jazan Economic City, including a US$3 Billion aluminium smelter. 
Jazan is being turned into Saudi Arabia's naval industry hub.[citation needed] Furthermore, the southern and western outskirts of the city are a place which the Kingdom wants to turn into its agricultural hub due to the water underground as well as the rich and diverse soil.[citation needed] 
Jazan Refinery is a megaproject under construction and owned by Saudi Aramco. The Refinery will process heavy and medium crude oil to create liquefied petroleum gas, sulfur, asphalt, benzene, and paraxylene. It is expected to produce 400,000 barrels per day. 
The film tells about a woman who leaves her husband, as a result of which she tries to commit suicide, but can't decide. Suddenly, several contract killings take place in front of her eyes and each time she sees the same man who is likely to commit these crimes and she orders him her murder. 
Rebecca D'Agostino (born 15 October 1982) is a Maltese football defender currently playing for Mosta FC in the Maltese First Division. She has captained the Maltese national team since its creation in 2003, and she scored its first goal that same year and its first winner goal in 2011. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Malta is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Francisco Antonio Vargas Fontecilla (Santiago of Chile, April 27, 1824 - ibidem, December 10, 1883) was a Chilean lawyer and Liberal politician.  
He studied at the National Institute, where he was sworn in as a lawyer on April 19, 1847 and five years later, in 1852, he entered the Faculty of Humanities in University of Chile. 
He was a member of the Liberal Party. He was elected deputy for San Felipe, Putaendo and Los Andes for the period 1858 - 1861. He was part of the permanent commission of Education and Welfare. He was once again parliamentarian for the aforementioned districts in 1864-1867 and was a member of the permanent commission on Constitution, Legislation and Justice. 
In the following election he was reelected deputy, but this time by Santiago. During this last period, he presided at two sessions of the House, from June 4 to October 8, 1867 and from December 8, 1868 to June 2, 1870.  
Then he became a senator for Valparaiso (1870-1879), combining the permanent commission of Government and External Relations. He was dean of the Faculty of Humanities of the University of Chile. He was also minister of the Court of Appeals of Santiago (1872) and prosecutor of the Supreme Court (1882). 
He published several works on Castilian grammar, and on Constitutional law. He also contributed to The Museum and to the Magazine of Santiago. 
In the downtown sector of the city of Santiago de Chile, in the commune of Quinta Normal, at the beginning of the 20th century;  a street with its name,  Vargas Fontecilla. 
Mount Marcus Baker was originally called "Mount Saint Agnes"; according to Bradford Washburn, James W. Bagley of the USGS named it after his wife Agnes, adding the "Saint" in hopes of making the name stick. The name was later changed to honor a cartographer and geologist named Marcus Baker. 
The fifteenth edition of the South American Championship was held in Lima, Peru from January 15 to February 12. 
Each team played against each of the other teams. Two (2) points were awarded for a win, one (1) point for a draw and zero (0) points for a defeat. 
Andy Bell (Ride, Hurricane No. 1, Oasis, Beady Eye) has worked with The Most on various recordings and contributed guitars and vocals on the song Now I Feel from the second EP Moderation in Moderation (a title suggested by Andy Bell).  A video for Now I Feel was made by Mattias Pettersson. 
The band's third EP Resistance is Useless was released in 2010. Again Andy Bell contributed with guitar on one song, Easy When You're Down. In early 2011 a video for Little Girl was released. 
Two new videos was released by The Most in early 2012. Firstly, The Action from the Face the Future EP. A few months later the band released Bad Girl from the Moderation in Moderation EP. 
The Most first full-length album Auto-Destructive Art was released on May 17, 2013. A pre-release took place in Liverpool, UK with three live gigs at the famous Cavern Club for the International Pop Overthrow music festival. The first video from the album was for a song titled Spiderman. The second video from the album became the track So Wrong. It was released in August that same year. 
At Christmas 2014 the band released the Tages (band) song Fuzzy Patterns in a psychedelic video on YouTube. 
The end of 2014 also saw the light of new single Picking Up Speed. Featuring two new original songs and cover art by Ian Barrett. 
A video for the song I'm Not Your Man from the Auto-Destructive Art CD is released on YouTube in March 2015. 
Since 1951, he worked as chief editor and critic in the periodical Our Aeon, and in 1952, established with his father the periodical The New Greek. From the latter's pages he exercised intense criticism "against the political and literary establishment", and particularly against the "Generation of the '30s", accusing them of "spiritual and ethical inadequacy". For this posture of him, M. Karagatsis sued him and his father for reasons of copyright. 
After the end of the dictatorship, until 1979, Apostolidis continued writing critics in the periodical Tetramina and published several of his works. In his later years he published lectures and appeared on television for matters regarding the Greek language, education and literature. He was also honorary guest in presentations of his works. He was a supporter of the polytonic writing, the historical Greek orthography and the teaching of ancient Greek from prototypes in schools. 
Apostolidis died on 10 March 2004 after acute stroke. He received a non-religious burial, due to him being an agnostic and libertarian. 
Renos Apostolidis was a prolific writer. During his lifetime he published over 30 books. His first published work was Three Stations a Path (1945). Some of his most famous works are Wings of The Stork (1949), Poet Letters (1949), Pyramid 67 (1950), Modern Greek (1952), His Nipples and Manuscripts of Max Tod (1960), Criticism of War (1962), Corridors (1979), The Furies (1980) and Cats (1989), and Vortex (1993). One book, Centauri was published posthumously, in 2012. 
Gilbert was born in Maidstone Kent. His father was Rodney Stuart Gilbert. His mother was Edith Esgate. 
Gilbert gained entry to Maidstone Grammar School where he was a member of the ATC. His progression on to Emmanuel College Cambridge as an Open Exhibitioner and State Scholar to read history (later changed to economics), was interrupted by wartime service in the Royal Air Force. 
In February 1981 Gilbert corresponded with the Financial Secretary to the Treasury in respect of likely industrial action by the Society of Civil Service and Public Servants (a trade union), in the DNS HQ Transaction Accounting Branch. 
In May 1984 Gilbert presided over the end of the "Save as You Earn" scheme (SAYE), which was replaced by the new National Savings Yearly Plan. 
On 2 August 1986, Mr J.A. Patterson succeeded Gilbert, who had previously been his deputy, as Director of Savings at National Savings. 
Desert of Blood is a 2008 independent film about a vampire, Luis Diego, who has been left imprisoned underground by the village priest. When accidentally released, he begins to exact revenge on the villagers. However, when he falls in love with a young woman who is visiting the village to care for her aging aunt, he must face the possibility of forgiveness. The story is set in modern-day Mexico. 
For thirty-five years, something evil lay buried beneath the sands of Mexico until a hapless treasure hunter digs up more than he expects, releasing the mysterious, handsome, and deadly Luis Diego (Justin Quinn) from his desert tomb. Finally free, Diego seeks to exact vengeance on those who nearly destroyed him all those years ago, including the woman he once loved, Sarita (Yvonne  Rawn). 
The Ryland Inn is a restaurant in Readington Township, New Jersey that won the James Beard Mid-Atlantic region top prize. It achieved great success, winning several awards and being visited during then-president Ronald Reagan. 
This US-based restaurant or restaurant chain article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Concurrent with the still lifes, Lerner began painting Maine coastscapes. Describing the contrast between Maine's "dramatic, almost brooding landscape" and Chicago's urban unruliness as "a kind of epiphany," he said, "I became drawn into the more spiritual, psychological and atmospheric qualities and the sense of oneness that pervades everything in nature." 
A person holding multiple citizenship is, generally, entitled to the rights of citizenship in each country whose citizenship they are holding (such as right to a passport, right to enter the country, right to residence and work, right to vote, etc.), but may also be subject to obligations of citizenship (such as a potential obligation for national service, becoming subject to taxation on worldwide income, etc.). 
A country that allows dual citizenship may still not recognize the other citizenship of its nationals within its own territory (for example, in relation to entry into the country, national service, duty to vote, etc.). Similarly, it may not permit consular access by another country for a person who is also its national. Some countries prohibit dual citizenship holders from serving in their armed forces or on police forces or holding certain public offices. 
At the 1930 League of Nations Codification Conference, an attempt was made to codify nationality rules into a universal worldwide treaty, the 1930 Hague Convention, whose chief aims would be to completely abolish both statelessness and dual citizenship. The 1930 Convention on Certain Questions Relating to the Conflict of Nationality Laws proposed laws that would have reduced both, but in the end, was ratified by only twenty nations. 
Some countries may take measures to avoid creation of multiple citizenship. Since a country has control only over who has its citizenship, but has no control over who has any other country's citizenship, the only way for a country to avoid multiple citizenship is to deny its citizenship to people in cases when they would have another citizenship. This may take the following forms: 
Many countries allow foreigners or former citizens to live and work indefinitely there. However, for voting, being voted and working for the public sector or the national security in a country, citizenship of the country concerned is almost always required. 
The concept of a "dormant citizenship" means that a person has the citizenships of two countries, but as long as while living permanently in one country, their status and citizen's rights in the other country are "inactive". They will be "reactivated" when they move back to live permanently in the other country. This means, in spite of dual citizenship, only one citizenship can be exercised at a time. 
Some countries are more open to multiple citizenship than others, as it may help citizens travel and conduct business overseas. Countries that have taken active steps towards permitting multiple citizenship in recent years include Switzerland (since January 1, 1992) and Australia (since April 4, 2002). 
It is often observed that dual citizenship may strengthen ties between migrants and their countries of origin and increase their propensity to remit funds to their communities of origin. 
A study published in 2007 in The Journal of Politics explored questions of whether allowing dual citizenship impedes cultural assimilation or social integration, increases disconnection from the political process, and degrades national or civic identity/cohesiveness. 
A 2007 academic study concluded that dual citizens had a negative effect on the assimilation and political connectedness of first-generation Latino immigrants to the United States: 
The study also noted that although dual nationality is likely to disconnect immigrants from the American political system and impede assimilation, the initial signs suggest that these effects seem to be limited almost exclusively to the first generation (although it is mentioned that a full assessment of dual nationality beyond the first generation is not possible with present data). 
Concern over the effect of multiple citizenship on national cohesiveness is generally more acute in the United States. The reason for this is twofold: 
The degree of angst over the effects of dual citizenship seemingly corresponds to a country's model for managing immigration and ethnic diversity: 
People with multiple citizenship may be viewed as having dual loyalty, having the potential to act contrary to a government's interests, and this may lead to difficulties in acquiring government employment where security clearance may be required. 
On the other hand, Israel may view some dual citizens as desirable candidates for its security services due to their ability to legitimately enter neighbouring states which are closed to Israeli passport holders. The related case of Ben Zygier has caused debate about dual citizenship in Australia. 
This perception of dual loyalty can apply even when the job in question does not require security clearance. In the United States, dual citizenship is common among politicians or government employees. For example, Arnold Schwarzenegger retained his Austrian citizenship during his service as a Governor of California while US Senator Ted Cruz renounced his Canadian citizenship birthright on May 14, 2014. 
In 1999, the US Attorney General's office issued an official opinion that a statutory provision that required the Justice Department not to employ a non-"citizen of the United States" did not bar it from employing dual citizens. 
In Germany, politicians can have dual citizenship. David McAllister, who holds British and German citizenship, was minister president of the State of Lower-Saxony from July 1, 2010, to February 19, 2013. He was the first German minister president to hold dual citizenship. 
In some cases, multiple citizenship can create additional tax liability. Almost all countries that impose tax normally base tax liability on source or residency. A very few countries tax their non-resident citizens on foreign income; examples include the United States, Eritrea, and the Philippines 
Under Spanish tax law, Spanish nationals and companies still have tax obligations with Spain if they move to a country that is in the list of tax havens and cannot justify a strong reason, beside tax evasion. They are required to be residents of that country for a minimum of 5 years; after which they are free from any tax obligations. 
A person with multiple citizenship may have a tax liability to his country of residence and also to one or more of his countries of citizenship; or worse, if unaware that one of his citizenships created a tax liability, that country may consider the person to be a tax evader. Many countries and territories have signed tax treaties or agreements for avoiding double taxation. 
In accordance with the European Travel Information and Authorisation System (ETIAS), the EU citizens who have multiple nationalities will be obliged to use the passport issued by an EU Member State for entering the Schengen area. 
Most countries in Asia restrict or forbid dual citizenship.[citation needed] In some of these countries (e.g. Iran, North Korea, Thailand), it is very difficult or even impossible for citizens to renounce their citizenship, even if a citizen is naturalized in another country.[citation needed] 
EU and EFTA countries have varying policies regarding dual citizenship. Under EU rules, a citizen of one EU or EFTA country can live and work indefinitely in the other EU and EFTA countries. However, countries can limit the right to vote and work in certain sensitive fields (such as government, police, military) to local citizens only. However, an immigrant from another EU or EFTA country can be refused welfare benefits. 
Within the EU, mandatory military service exists, at least in peacetime, only in Austria, Cyprus, Estonia, Finland, and Greece (In all countries but Cyprus, alternative service is available). Within the EFTA countries, only Switzerland requires it (alternative service is available); Iceland and Liechtenstein have no armed forces; in Norway, military service is de jure mandatory, but the enforcement is limited, so some sources claim it is de facto voluntary.[citation needed] 
For details, see the nationality law of the country concerned and Citizenship of the European Union. 
The Nordic Passport Union allows citizens of Denmark (including the Faroe Islands), Sweden, Norway, Finland and Iceland to travel and reside in other Nordic countries without a passport or a residence permit. 
Jumbles are simple butter cookies made with a basic recipe of, flour, sugar, eggs, and butter. They can be flavored with vanilla, anise, or caraway seed used for flavoring, or other flavoring can be used like almond. They were formerly often made in the form of rings or rolls. 
Jumbles were widespread, specifically because they travelled well, thanks to their very dense, hard nature. They could be stored for up to a year without becoming too stale. Because of their density, they were sometimes twisted into knots before baking, in order to make them easier to eat, generating knots as another common name. 
Jumbles were traditionally shaped in intricate loop or knot patterns, usually of rolled out dough. Early flavouring agents were aniseed, coriander, caraway seeds and rosewater. Later, especially in the United States, jumbles referred to a  thin crisp cake or cookie using lemon-peel as a flavoring agent. 
Jumbles and cookies are very similar, and sometimes a jumble may be called a cookie, but cookie is a broader term for any small flat cake, used for small cakes as well as crisp ones, while jumbles are usually of the crisp variety. 
A 1907 recipe for jumbles describes their texture as "crisp like snaps". The dough should be "so thin after rolling and cutting out, that one can almost see through them". The only moisture in the recipe is the creamed butter and "a scant cupful of milk or enough to make a stiff dough about like pie crust". 
A recipe for "Almond Jumballs" is known from 1694, made by combining ground almond with orange flower water or rose water, then adding sugar syrup, dry sugar and egg whites. The ingredients were pounded to make a paste and could be colored with chocolate or cochineal. They were brushed with lemon juice or rose water for enhanced flavor and very gently baked, with the caution that "it is best to sett them on something that they may not touch ye bottome of ye Oven." 
Jumbles were widespread in Europe by the 17th century, but possibly originated in Italy as the cimabetta.[citation needed] A very common cookie for travelers, they were probably brought to America on the Mayflower, if not Jamestown previously. There is even a famous recipe for this type of cookie that is credited to Martha Washington. 
An 18th-century recipe from The Compleat Housewife is made by beating three egg whites with milk. flour, sugar and caraway seeds into a stiff paste. They could be made in any shape and baked on baking parchment. 
Originally, jumbles were twisted into various pretzel-like shapes and boiled. By the late 18th century, jumbles became rolled cookies that were baked, producing a cookie very similar to a modern sugar cookie, although without the baking powder or other leavening agents used in modern recipes. 
Victorian cookbooks contain recipes for many variations on the basic recipe with candied fruits, coconut, lemon, and other flavorings added. 
Night Is the New Day sold more than 2,000 copies in the United States in its first week of release. "Day and Then the Shade" was the first single, released in late 2009. The promotional video for this song was directed by Lasse Hoile. 
The album was generally well received by critics. The album was deemed the second best metal album of 2009 by Popmatters. 
All lyrics by Jonas Renkse except where noted, all music by Renkse, except where noted. Writing credits taken from ASCAP. 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a forward born in the 1970s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Abtaha Maqsood (born 11 June 1999) is a Scottish cricketer. The daughter of immigrants from Pakistan, she was educated at Eastwood High School, Newton Mearns, and plays club cricket for Poloc, having joined them at the age of 11. After only four months at Poloc, she was called up to the Scotland under-17 squad and debuted for them aged 12. 
Maqsood played for the Scotland women's national cricket team in the 2017 Women's Cricket World Cup Qualifier in February 2017. 
In June 2018, she was named in Scotland's squad for the 2018 ICC Women's World Twenty20 Qualifier tournament. She made her Women's Twenty20 International (WT20I) debut for Scotland against Uganda in the World Twenty20 Qualifier on 7 July 2018. 
In May 2019, she was named in Scotland's squad for the 2019 ICC Women's Qualifier Europe tournament in Spain. In August 2019, she was named in Scotland's squad for the 2019 ICC Women's World Twenty20 Qualifier tournament in Scotland. Ahead of the inaugural season of The Hundred, Maqsood was signed by the Birmingham Phoenix. 
Maqsood plays cricket wearing a hijab. She has a black belt in taekwondo and was a flag bearer at the 2014 Commonwealth Games in Glasgow. 
Happy Ever After is a song by English singer-songwriter Julia Fordham, included on her self-titled debut album. Released as a single in 1988, it reached #27 in the UK Singles Chart and number 1 in the Japan Singles Chart. "Happy Ever After" was inspired by Nelson Mandela's struggle through apartheid in South Africa and his imprisonment. The song was re-recorded for Fordham's 1998 compilation album, The Julia Fordham Collection, and given the subtitle "Rain Forest Mix '98". 
Scott Putesky was born in Los Angeles, California, and was adopted and raised in New Jersey. His family is Jewish, but he described himself as atheist. Putesky's first instruments were the flute and the snare drum, and in 6th grade joined the school's chorus, for which he apparently had a talent. He started playing the guitar when he was 15. His early loves were drawing, movies and Star Wars. 
Putesky and Marilyn Manson met at a Fort Lauderdale club called The Reunion Room and later at a local after-party in December 1989. The two created the concept of Marilyn Manson & the Spooky Kids poking fun at American media hypocrisy and its obsessions with serial killers and beautiful women. For this act, he took the stage name of Daisy Berkowitz, devised by mixing the names of The Dukes Of Hazzard character Daisy Duke and serial killer David Berkowitz. 
In July 2010 Putesky officially joined electro-punk band Kill Miss Pretty after collaborating with them on their single "Judy Garland". Following this the band began working on new material including a cover of the Spooky Kids' song "She's Not My Girlfriend". 
Putesky revived Three Ton Gate shortly afterward to play live under that name in a 2011 series of dates across America starting in New York City on October 15. 
The men's 1500 metres competition of the Short track speed skating at the 2015 Winter Universiade was held at the Universiade Igloo, Granada on February 11. 
Abraham Low Self-Help Systems (ALSHS) is a non-profit organization formed from the merger of Recovery International and the Abraham Low Institute. ALSHS facilitates the estimated 600 worldwide Recovery International meetings and all projects formerly run by the Abraham Low Institute including the Power to Change program. The organization is named after Abraham Low, founder of the mental health self-help organization now known as Recovery International. 
The Abraham Low Institute was founded in 1989 to develop programs, in addition to Recovery, based on Low's self-help principles. The Institute awarded grants to further scholarly research on Low's work, provided research resources for people interested in Low's methods, and developed the Power to Change program and The Relatives Project. 
Power to Change is a cognitive-behavioral peer-to-peer program based on Low's self-help principles. Power to Change primarily teaches at-risk students and ex-prisoners principles of Low's Self-Help system in peer-to-peer groups. Power to Change groups generally consist of 8-12 members, meeting weekly, who learn the principles of the Low Self-Help System by describing their personal experience of disturbing events and commenting on each other's experiences using a highly structured format. 
The W. K. Kellogg Foundation has provided grants for Power to Change since 2003. The most recent grant was awarded in November 2008, and will provide funding until November 2010. 
Tajikistan participated in the 2014 Asian Beach Games in Phuket, Thailand from 14 to 23 November 2014. 
Liebing (Hungarian Rendek) is a village in the district of Oberpullendorf in Burgenland in Austria. It is part of the municipality of Mannersdorf an der Rabnitz. 
The town was the site of iron smelting from the ancient times; the name of the town originates from the Slavic word for 'ironworker', rednek. The first written mention in the form Lennek comes from a document by Emperor Sigismund dated 1390. The town belonged to the estate of Lockenhaus castle. It was destroyed by the Ottomans in 1529 and 1532, but it was subsequently rebuilt. 
Maya Stepney, played by Louisa Clein, made her first appearance on 8 March 2018. She was introduced as the wife of Dr Liam Cavanagh. She later begins a relationship with David Metcalfe (Matthew Wolfenden) and begins to groom his son, Jacob Gallagher (Joe-Warren Plant). 
On 20 June 2019, Maya is sentenced to 12 months imprisonment for her inappropriate relationship with Jacob. However, she is released on 19 November and it is revealed that she is pregnant. In December 2019, she gives birth, abandons the baby on David's doorstep and flees abroad. 
Misty's pairing with Rodney was nominated for "Most Bizarre Soap Storyline" at the 2018 Digital Spy Reader Awards; it came in eighth place with 6% of the total votes. 
Terry, played by Daniel Casey, made his first appearance on 24 May 2018. Casey is one of a few actors to have made appearances in the three British soap operas Emmerdale, Coronation Street and EastEnders. Terry was introduced as the uncle of deceased character Gerry Roberts (Shaun Thomas). 
Aiesha Richards, played by Shila Iqbal, made her first appearance on 10 July 2018 for a guest stint. She is introduced as the daughter of Manpreet Jutla (Rebecca Sarker) and potential love interest for Jai Sharma (Chris Bisson). She is reintroduced as a regular character in March 2019. On 11 April 2019, it was announced that Iqbal had been dismissed due to offensive historical social media posts. 
Manpreet and Rishi Sharma (Bhasker Patel) set Aiesha up on a date with Rishi's son, Jai Sharma (Chris Bisson). Jai does not want to go the date and attempts to leave, until he sees Aiesha. They get along well, but Jai dislikes Aiesha's laugh and is reluctant to accept another date. However, he and Rishi agree to a double date with Aiesha and Manpreet. Jai later informs Aiesha that he does not want a relationship with her. 
On 11 September 2019, N'Jie was fired from Emmerdale due to threatening behaviour towards Hollyoaks actor Jamie Lomas at the 2019 TV Choice Awards where N'Jie was nominated for Best Soap Newcomer. His final scenes aired in the episode broadcast on 17 October 2019 with the character heading to Dubai. It was announced on 8 November 2019 that the character had been recast by soap bosses and he would now be played by Aaron Anthony. Anthony made his first appearance in the role on 12 December 2019. 
Marc Abrahams is the editor and co-founder of Annals of Improbable Research, and the originator and master of ceremonies of the annual Ig Nobel Prize celebration. He was formerly editor of the Journal of Irreproducible Results. 
Abrahams is married to Robin Abrahams, also known as "Miss Conduct", a columnist for the Boston Globe. 
This article about a United States writer of non-fiction is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
While the first investment club on record dates back to the 1800s in Western America, Various online communities devoted to this type of investing have recently emerged and have contributed to the personal investing boom in the United States. One of the reasons that people come together in investment clubs is to learn how to invest. In Britain investment clubs took off in the 1950s, but the rate of formation fell at the time of the 2008 financial crisis. 
This form of investment club usually meets to develop interest in investing and the intricacies of investing for minors, usually high school students. They typically are led by an adult who has vast experience in professional investing. 
These clubs are groups of people that pool their money to purchase stocks, stock options, mutual funds or bonds. Many clubs are educational in nature with objectives in line with learning how to make smart long-term investments. The National Association of Investors Corporation is a non-profit organization of many investment clubs with this purpose. These clubs may decide to buy or sell investments typically based on a majority votes. 
Club objectives do vary and in the U.S. the Securities and Exchange Commission may require that a club be registered depending on the intent of investment. The SEC distinguishes between clubs on the basis of several laws including the Securities Act of 1933 and the Investment Company Act of 1940, which are concerned with whether the club issues membership interests that are effectively securities. 
These clubs are often called incubators and are formed to purchase businesses that generate cash flow and equity. Investment types range from a group of people buying lower risk franchises with at least two years of significant revenues and positive cash flow like major fast food franchises, gas stations and hotels to higher risk businesses without an income history like start-ups, inventions, or product patenting and prototype development. 
A self-directed investment club is a type of investment club in which members do not make financial contributions, but rather meet on a regular or informal basis to share stock tips and advice, and then invest in their individual portfolios, not in a common club portfolio (as is more typical of investment clubs). The phrase was coined by financial author and investment club expert Douglas Gerlach in Investment Clubs for Dummies. 
Investment club accounting software can facilitate the management of a club's books and the preparation of tax filings. 
In the United States Investment club partnerships may have to file Form 1065 and Schedule K-1s with the IRS each year, and with States that require partnership filings. 
In the United Kingdom investment clubs and their members are required to submit form 185(new) to HMRC each year. 
Dmitry Titov (born 1950) was the United Nations Assistant Secretary-General for the Rule of Law and Security Institutions in the Department of Peacekeeping Operations until April 19, 2017. He was appointed by UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon on July 27, 2007. 
He studied international relations and graduated from the Moscow State Institute of International Relations (MGIMO). 
In 1992, the 14th title was added to Dinamo's record. It was a triumphal march, with 34 matches and no defeat. 
After a disappointing defeat against Vorskla Poltava in the Europa League Play-Off, Dinamo is leading the Romanian Championship after 10 rounds with the best offense and defense in the championship despite selling Gabriel Torje to the Italian team Udinese with only Dorel Stoica and Srdjan Luchin completing the squad for the new season. 
On 24 September 2015, the Bucharest Municipal Court ruled that Dinamo met the criteria to end the insolvency process. But the club wasn't able to enter the European competitions, thus, despite ending the season on the 4th position, Dinamo didn't participate in the Europa League. 
The following two seasons in Liga I, Dinamo failed to qualify for the play-off and missed the European cups. 
Dinamo was again affected by coronavirus. Six players tested positive on 16 July and the entire team was again quarantined for five days, until the next set of tests. Other four players tested positive the next two days. On 22 July, the number of infected players rose to 18. 
On 6 August, the Liga I season was frozen and Dinamo didn't play all its postponed games, finishing the season in 13th place. But the club was spared from relegation after the Romanian Federation decided to increase the number of teams in Liga I from 14 to 16. Thus, only the 14th place played a relegation/promotion play-off against the third place in Liga II. 
On 13 August 2020, the club was purchased by Benel International SA, a Spanish company represented by Pablo Cortacero. The new owners promised to bring back Dinamo Bucharest to the European cups. 
The original concept for Gus was created by MARC USA, an advertising agency based in Pittsburgh, PA. The concept was brought to life as an animatronic groundhog, created in 2004 by The Character Shop, Inc., a Hollywood creature effects company. 
Gus is billed as the "second most famous groundhog in Pennsylvania", as a nod to Punxsutawney Phil.  His tag line is "keep on scratchin'!" 
Gus, with his lovable, wise-cracking personality, gained some popularity with Pennsylvanians; however, the Pennsylvania Lottery would not offer plush replicas of Gus for sale despite customer requests because that organization believes that such a toy would advertise the lottery (a game which is restricted to adult play) to children. 
Gus has also appeared dressed in both Philadelphia Eagles and Pittsburgh Steelers uniforms with other similarly uniformed men in a licensed co-branding with those two National Football League teams, as certain instant games are branded for those teams. 
On February 22, 2012, the Pennsylvania Lottery announced that the campaign with Gus would be discontinued, so they could focus on a new campaign explaining how the PA Lottery benefits older Pennsylvanians, but after a nearly four-year hiatus, he returned on November 1, 2015 onwards. 
General elections were held in Mauritius on 11 September 2000 to elect the members of the National Assembly. 
There were 43 parties putting forth 535 candidates but the main contest was between the two main coalitions that campaigned on similar platforms with the economy being the dominate election issue. The governing Mauritian Labour Party promised to raise civil servants' wages and reduce the prices of drinks while the main opposition attacked corruption. Both the government and opposition parties pledged to create 70,000 jobs. 
Tim Alioto is a retired American soccer defender who spent most of his career with the amateur Milwaukee Bavarians.  He played professionally for four years in the American Indoor Soccer Association. 
In a Fix is an American television series involving a team of construction workers and a designer who "rescue" homeowners from stalled "do it yourself" renovation projects. Original episodes of In a Fix, which was produced by NorthSouth Productions, aired on TLC in 2004 and 2005. The program has been shown in reruns on the Discovery Home Channel in the United States, TLC in Canada and Discovery Real Time in Asia. 
This article about a television show originating in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paul 'Charlo' Johnson (born 1986) is an Irish retired dual player who lined out at midfield for Moyle Rovers and the Tipperary Gaelic football team. 
Sarah Choi Lee (born 1971) is a Korean American reporter for CNN. Prior to working at CNN, Lee was a reporter for WJLA-TV, an ABC affiliate in Washington, D.C. from 2003-2009. She appeared on NewsChannel 8, which is owned by the same company, Allbritton Communications. 
Prior to her position at WJLA, she worked as a national correspondent for the Washington Bureau of NBC News and as a reporter for WRC-TV in Washington, DC. 
She was named one of Korea's Future Leaders by the JoongAng Ilbo, one of Korea's "big three newspapers". 
Sarah Lee is a native of Manhattan, New York. She attended Colby College where she received a Bachelor of Arts degree in Government and History.  She has studied abroad in South Korea, France, and Ireland. Married to H.K. Park, a Vice President of The Cohen Group, a consulting firm headed by former Senator and Defense Secretary William Cohen. Their engagement in Bermuda was described in The Baltimore Sun and their wedding was profiled in The New York Times. 
Sarah Lee began her career behind the scenes at Dateline NBC where she helped investigate stories undercover and on-camera.  She has since reported on-air in Greenville, North Carolina and at WTVR-TV in Richmond, Virginia prior to her work in the Washington, DC area. 
As a correspondent for the Washington bureau of NBC and MSNBC, she was the on-scene reporter for the 2002 Quecreek Mine Rescue, where nine coal miners were trapped and subsequently rescued from a Pennsylvania mine. She reported on the DC Sniper investigation and from The Pentagon on September 11th and in the ensuing days. She has also covered Hurricanes Bertha (1996), Fran (1996), Bonnie (1998), Dennis (1999), and Floyd (1999). 
Her work has earned her an Emmy nomination and three Virginia Associated Press Awards. She has served as the Broadcast Vice President for the DC Chapter of the Asian American Journalists Association and has been honored by the JoongAng Ilbo as one of Korea's Future Leaders. She was named a Knight Fellow in Specialized Journalism. Her focus was on the American military. 
She was one of 26 WJLA employees laid off on January 23, 2009 as a result of what station officials characterized as "a financial necessity in light of economic straits". 
She and her husband H.K. Park have two children who published a Guide to the Playgrounds of Arlington County, Virginia. In June 2016, their children published a second book called "How Your City Works: Behind the Scenes in Arlington, VA". 
Christopher Bartolone (born 24 January 1970) is an Italian ice hockey player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1998 Winter Olympics. 
This Italian biographical article relating to ice hockey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Carolly Erickson (born January 1, 1943) is an American author of historical fiction and non-fiction. She lives in Hawaii. In 2008, her book The Tsarina's Daughter won the RT Reader's Choice Award for best Historical Fiction. 
This article about a fiction writer from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He graduated from Kyiv National Economic University having completed graduation programs in International Economics and Law. 
In 2004 he founded and became Director General of IC Concorde Capital. Many years the company retains the position of one of three best investment banks of Ukraine (according to the largest international information agency Thomson Reuters). 
In 2008 he was elected as Chairman of the exchange committee of the Ukrainian Exchange,  and at present he continues to act in this capacity. 
Awad was born in Syria and was ordained to the priesthood in 1957. He served as titular bishop of 'Zeugma in Syria' and as apostolic exarch of the Syriac Catholic Apostolic Exarchate of Venezuela from 2003 to 2011. 
Dichomeris pladarota is a moth in the family Gelechiidae. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1921. It is found in Zimbabwe. 
Blair Brandt (born January 11, 1988) is an American political advisor and real estate entrepreneur. Brandt is also a former reality television personality and an animal welfare advocate. He is the co-founder of Next Step Realty. Forbes listed Brandt in their annual 30 under 30 list, at the age of 23. 
In August 2015, Brandt began his role in ABC Family's docu-series Next Step Realty: NYC. In 2020, Brandt founded his own political consulting firm, The Brandt Group. 
Brandt was born in Manhattan, New York.  He grew up in Palm Beach, Florida and attended Deerfield Academy in Massachusetts. Brandt completed his undergraduate education at the University of Richmond. 
A prominent ally of the Trump Administration, Brandt is a leading Republican strategist and top GOP fundraiser. Brandt served as the Florida Co-Chair for the Trump Victory Finance Committee 2020. Brandt has also served as an advisor to Lara Trump. Brandt has routinely weighed in on US-China relations, specifically as an advocate for a fundamental re-alignment or decoupling of economic ties. 
Brandt's first job was working for Budweiser in the breakage (broken bottle re-assembly) room and while he studied at University of Richmond he also ran a laundry business. 
In July 2011, shortly after the foundation of the company, it was listed by CNN as one of the most promising dorm room startups. 
After the initial success of his company, Brandt acquired competitor Post Graduate Apartments in 2012. At 23, Brandt was included in the Forbes 30 under 30 list for his work in the real estate market. 
With a seed infusion of $100,000 from Nantucket & Palm Beach based angel investor Jason Briggs, Brandt moved to New York City in 2012 to turn his idea, then a website matching graduates with various approved realtors, into a full-service brokerage in the city. 
According to the Next Step Realty website, Brandt now serves as Non-Executive Chairman of the Board. 
Amidst the Coronavirus pandemic, Brandt advocated in the Washington Examiner on April 6, 2020 for the closures of Chinese wet markets and the dog and cat meat trade alongside voices including Lara Trump, Dr Anthony Fauci, Senator Lindsey Graham, and Kevin McCarthy. On April 8, 2020, The Chinese Ministry of Agriculture announced a plan to end dog and cat meat trade on May 8, 2020, citing public concern following COVID-19. 
The Givers: Wealth, Power, and Philanthropy in a New Gilded Age is a 2017 non-fiction book by David Callahan published by Alfred A. Knopf. 
In his April 14, 2017  The New York Times  review, author and  Wealth Matters columnist, Paul Sullivan, described The Givers as a book that investigates the "power of philanthropists to shape America." It reveals the private world of high-profile philanthropists who hold great influence in American life and politics." 
Callahan cautions that everyone should be at "least a teensy bit nervous" about the rise of this "new breed of megadonors", according to Michelle Cottle,  her April 28, 2017 Times review. Cottle, who is a contributing editor at The Atlantic wrote that these donors are "more numerous, more aggressive and vastly richer than their forebears" and that their ability to "reshape American society" is "unprecedented". ' 
The Time review cites Callahan saying, that an unintended consequence of "megafoundations" spending "massive amounts of money" to cure disease or to redesign public education, is that it can undermine the democratic process. Callahan says that "government incentives" related to philanthropy and advocacy, are "outdated" which means that the wealthiest people have a greater influence than ordinary citizens in public policy making. 
The Atlantic March 28, 2017 review reiterated Callahan's point, that philanthropists are replacing and supplanting government in decision-making, regarding which "scientific issues are researched, what types of schools exist in communities, and what initiatives get on ballots." 
The Wall Street Journal called it a war on philanthropy with the Kochs, Waltons, Bill Gates, Eli Broad and others "treated as punching bags for ideological reasons." 
Callahan's book tours included events held at the New York Public Library, and the Commonwealth Club of San Francisco. 
In his NPR Weekend Edition interview, Callahan noted that the number of billionaires on Forbes 400 richest Americans, had increased from 13 in 1982 to 400 by 2017. 
The Women's Peace Crusade was among the largest peace movements in Glasgow during the First World War, and it was also the one with the most working class, grassroots support. 
Madhogarh is a village in Mahendragarh district, Haryana, India. It is located at the foot of Madhogarh Hill of Aravalli Mountain Range. Madhogarh Fort is on top of the hill. 
Rao Shekha, a Shekhawat rajput  (sub-branch of Kachwaha or Kushwaha), was the founder of Shekhawati, who originally divided Shekhawati into 33 Thikana (also called a Pargana), each styled as Thakur with at least a 'kutcha' mud fort, some of which were fortified further with stone. After him, additional thikanas were granted to the descendants of subsequent generations. 
Madhogarh faced water scarcity since 1978, in 2017 BJP government ensured water supply in the canal after a gap of 29 years. 
The first part of the encyclical reviews the contributions of the papacy to the veneration in Lourdes. 
The encyclical recalls that in 1892 Leo XIII granted the proper Office and Mass of the feast "In apparitione Beatae Mariae Virginis Immaculatae", which his successor was to extend to the universal Church a short time later. He installed and blessed a reproduction of the 'Grotto of Massabielle' in the Vatican gardens, and prayed: 
In her power may the Virgin Mother, who once cooperated through her love with the birth of the faithful into the Church, now be the means and guardian of our salvation; may she return the tranquillity of peace to troubled souls; may she hasten the return of Jesus Christ in private and public life.
On 3 July 1876, Pius IX crowned the statue of Our Lady of the Rosary at the Rosary Basilica in Lourdes. 
Pius XII concludes: "It could not have been otherwise. Everything about Mary directs us to her Son, our only Savior, in anticipation of whose merits she was immaculate and full of grace. Everything about Mary raises us to the praise of the adorable Trinity." The encyclical adds that Saint Pius X viewed the shrine of Lourdes as surpassing in glory all others in the Catholic world. 
The encyclical states that Benedict XV added new indulgences, but was unable to do much more because of the First World War. Pius XI, who had been to Lourdes himself as a pilgrim, continued the work of Benedict XV. He canonized Bernadette, Sister Marie Bernard, and described Lourdes as "now justly considered one of the principal Marian shrines in the world". Pius XII recalls his own previous encyclical, Fulgens corona, in which he wrote about Lourdes: 
The Blessed Virgin Mary herself wanted to confirm by some special sign the definition which the Vicar on earth of her Divine Son had pronounced amidst the vigorous approbation of the whole Church.
The second part of the encyclical deals with conversion, specifically a Marian conversion of heart and society, with Pius XII emphasizing the Marian invitation to the conversion of hearts and the hope of forgiveness, with the emphasis that individual conversion would not be enough; instead, Pius XII appeals for Christian renewal of society in answer to Mary's appeal. 
In the school of Mary one can learn to live not only to give Christ to the world, but also to await with faith the hour of Jesus, and to remain with Mary at the foot of the cross. Wherever providence has placed a person, there is always more to be done for God's cause. 
Pius XII teaches that Mary looks upon some of her children with a special affection, the lowly, the poor, and the afflicted whom Jesus loved so much. 
Go to her, you who are crushed by material misery, defenseless against the hardships of life and the indifference of men. Go to her, you who are assailed by sorrows and moral trials. Go to her, beloved invalids and infirm, you who are sincerely welcomed and honored at Lourdes as the suffering members of our Lord. Go to her and receive peace of heart, strength for your daily duties, joy for the sacrifice you offer.
The Pontiff states that the Immaculate Virgin knows the secret ways by which grace operates in souls. She also knows the great price which God attaches to sufferings, united to those of the Savior. These sufferings can greatly contribute. The encyclical closes with a quote of Saint Bernard of Clairvaux: 
Amid dangers, difficulties, and doubts, think of Mary, invoke Mary's aid. ...If you follow her, you will not stray; if you entreat her, you will not lose hope; if you reflect upon her, you will not err; if she supports you, you will not fall; if she protects you, you will not fear; if she leads you, you will not grow weary; if she is propitious, you will reach your goal.
Pope Pius XII declares himself fully convinced that Mary will hear all prayers. In this his last Marian encyclical, he imparts to the faithful, the shrine of Lourdes and its pilgrims, "the most bounteous outpouring of grace with all Our heart, and with Our constant and paternal best wishes, the Apostolic Benediction." 
Swansons Landing is a settlement and former inland port in Harrison County, Texas, United States, south of Caddo Lake. 
This article about a location in Harrison County, Texas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1977, Smith was selected as Conservative candidate for the Labour seat of Ashfield in Nottinghamshire at the by-election that had been called following the resignation of David Marquand. Ashfield was regarded as a 'safe' Labour seat, but on 28 April, in an amazing result, Smith overturned Marquand's October 1974 majority of 22,915 to win by 264 votes over Labour's Michael Cowan. However, Smith was unable to hold the seat in the 1979 general election. 
He was subsequently selected to contest the 1982 Beaconsfield by-election, in which he defeated the Labour candidate, future Prime Minister Tony Blair. Smith was thereafter returned as MP by the constituency at each general election until 1997. 
On 3 July 1997, he was found guilty by Sir Gordon Downey of taking cash for questions from Al Fayed, along with Neil Hamilton. The report severely criticised the conduct of both Hamilton and Smith whilst they had been MPs, and said that had they remained MPs they would have faced a substantial suspension from the House of Commons. 
This article about a Conservative Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom representing an English constituency and born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Monochroa rebeli is a moth of the family Gelechiidae. It was described by M. Hering in 1927. It is found on the Canary Islands. 
The larvae feed on Rumex lunaria. They mine the leaves of their host plant. The mine has the form of a spiraling gallery, widening into a large blotch. The frass is deposited in a central line in the gallery, but dispersed in the blotch. Pupation takes place outside of the mine. 
In the mid-1980s, he teamed up with Mike Myers as 'Mullarkey and Myers'. They would perform sketches based on their shared love of cartoons, B-movies and bad TV. They played around the burgeoning London pub circuit, particularly at the George IV in Chiswick, where they often shared the bill with the young Hugh Grant, then plying his trade in the Jockeys of Norfolk revue. As their fame increased, Mullarkey and Myers toured the UK, ending in a sold-out season at the Edinburgh Festival. 
As a founding member of The Comedy Store Players, he is regularly performing on the UK comedy circuit. 
He is a founder member of The Comedy Store Players, and still appears with them regularly at London's Comedy Store. 
Don't Be Needy Be Succeedy won the Fringe Report Award for Best Satire of 2002. In it Mullarkey plays L. Vaughan Spencer, Life Coach, Self-Help Guru and Gangsta Motivator. The book Don't Be Needy Be Succeedy: The A to Z of Motivitality was published by Profile Books in November 2008. 
Mullarkey starred with Eddie Izzard in the sell-out West End run of One Word Improv and has guested with The Groundlings in Los Angeles and The Second City in Toronto. 
He was a writer on Tony Hawks's show Morris Minor's Marvellous Motors and co-wrote (with Greg Proops) The Amazing Colossal Show for BBC2. He hosted American Freak for America's Comedy Central network. 
Mullarkey has acted feature films, including Leon the Pig Farmer, Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery, Austin Powers in Goldmember, and Spiceworld.[citation needed] 
Mullarkey hosted Missed Demeanours for BBC Radio 4, was a regular performer on Bits from Last Week's Radio, co-wrote and starred in FAB TV and has appeared on Just a Minute, The News Quiz, Quote...Unquote, I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue, Loose Ends, In Touch and The Unbelievable Truth. He wrote and presented the documentary Ten Years of the Comedy Store Players. 
The 2nd Filipino Academy of Movie Arts and Sciences Awards Night was held in 1954 in Life Theater, Quezon Boulevard, Quiapo, Manila. Huk Sa Bagong Pamumuhay, produced by Narcisa de Leon and distributed by LVN Pictures, is the recipient of FAMAS Award for Best Picture. 
Jake Allen (born 11 August 1995) is an Australian speedway rider. He currently rides in the top tier of British Speedway, riding for the Ipswich Witches in the SGB Premiership. He began his British career riding for the Somerset Rebels in 2016, winning the Premier League and Premier League Cup. As of 2021, Allen rides for the Ipswich Witches in the SGB Premiership and the Redcar Bears in the SGB Championship. 
 John F Kennedy Catholic School is a voluntary aided Roman Catholic comprehensive secondary school located in Hemel Hempstead, Hertfordshire, England. It opened in 1967 and now has a student population of approximately 1100, aged 11 to 18. The headteacher is currently Mr Neves The school's motto is Pacem in terris (peace on Earth). 
The school is also part of a local partnership of secondary schools, offering a variety of subject choices for post-16 students, but as of 2020, this partnership is more limited. 
The school gained Technology College status in 1998, has received Ofsted inspection reports describing it as "outstanding", and appeared on Ofsted's "honours list". It has also received the following special recognitions: 
The secondary school currently has a student population over 170 in 6th form, which is its largest 6th form on record. 
The school has minimised the impact on the local environment by avoiding significant loss of trees. The project also involved the planting of new trees, and using trees which are required to be cut down as wood-chip paths and for the construction of the gazebo-type structure in the so-called 'spinney'. 
The arrests happened in the framework of the purge that the Turkish government enforced following the attempted coup of July 15 2016. 
Ali Gharavi and Peter Steudtner were moved between several prisons, one of the prisons they were detained in was  Silivri Prison, but they were not allowed to meet. Silivri prison is one of Turkeys most guarded prisons with thousands of political prisoners.  
The arrests of the ten activists sparked reactions in the countries of provenience of the activists as well as worldwide, both in the press and the political arena.   
As a response to the reporter's question of freedom of speech in Turkey and detained activists, Erdogan stated the following: 
Ali Gharavi was projected as a Swedish spy with Iranian origin, who marked Southeastern Turkey on a partition map and prepared encrypted information. According to this information, they were using back-up phones without name lists, they preferred disposable versions and the memory cleaner applications with timer settings.  
The Swedish government were working actively with the case together with Germany. They tried to raise the issue of the imprisonment of the two European citizens that was arrested on 5 July with the EU, and they continued to inform Turkey about the Swedish standpoint towards the development in Turkey, especially in regards of human rights and respect for rule of law. The government also called for the release of Ali Gharavi, if Turkey failed to share the accusations towards him. 
The arrests sparked a spate of reactions in Germany as one of the "Istanbul 10", Peter Steudneter, a German citizen. 
Right after the arrests, on July 5, German Green Party MP and Bundestag Vice President, Claudia Roth published a post on her Facebook page, condemning the arrests as an evidence of the failure of the rule of law and democracy in Turkey and as a sheer provocation by Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan towards Angela Merkel as they were both engaged in a G20 Summit in Hamburg during the days following the arrests. 
On July 7, another institutional reaction had come from the parliamentary group of the SPD published a statement calling for the release of the activists. From the statement we can read: "News like this shows that every day Turkey continues to move away from the rule of law and human rights. Where those who fight for human rights and freedom of the press are themselves so massively targeted, there can be no question of a resilient democracy." 
On July 18, the German publication Der Taggesspiegel reported a statement by German Chancellor Angela Merkel calling for the release of Peter Steudtner and his colleagues. "We are firmly convinced that this arrest is absolutely unjustified [...] We declare our solidarity with him and the other arrested [...] And we will do everything on the part of the Federal Government, at all levels, to obtain his release," Merkel reportedly said. 
The institutional reaction of condemnation was largely reflected into the German press. Some salient examples are reported below. 
Since the arrests, a number of initiatives have been launched to pressure the Turkish government to release the activists.  
The arrests of the "Istanbul 10" have sparked worldwide condemnation and reactions. Demonstrations were held in Belgium, Chile, Germany, Ireland, Hong Kong, Mali, the Netherlands, Paraguay, Portugal, Sweden, Switzerland, Venezuela and Slovakia.  
Dipterocarpus costulatus is threatened by logging and habitat loss, particularly in Borneo. The tree is logged for its hardwood. Forests where the species is present are being cleared for agricultural or plantation development. More frequent fires threaten lowland populations. 
The Beloved Brat is a 1938 American comedy-drama film directed by Arthur Lubin and starring Bonita Granville, Dolores Costello, and Donald Crisp. The screenplay was written by Lawrence Kimble from an original story by Jean Negulesco. 
Roberta Morgan has wealthy parents who give her plenty of material possessions but who basically ignore her. She acts out and torments the family butler Jenkins. The only person to take  notice of her thirteenth birthday is her father's secretary, Williams. 
She makes friends with a black boy, Pinkie White, and visits his home. She is impressed by the love Pinkie's mother, Mrs White, shows Pinkie and his sister Arabella. Roberta invites Pinkie to dinner to say thank you and Jenkins angrily throws out Pinkie. 
Roberta's parents go away and Roberta starts behaving even more badly. Jenkins locks her in her room. She sets fire to it and escapes. Jenkins tracks her to Pinkie's house. On the way home in the car, they argue and Roberta grabs the steering wheel causing the car to swerve into an oncoming car and kill the driver. 
Roberta tells the police that Jenkins was drinking and the butler is sentenced to prison for manslaughter. Guilt ridden she confesses that she made it up. 
Roberta is sentenced to a special girls' school run by Helen Cosgrove. Helen manages to reform Roberta by getting her to help with younger students. When Roberta is allowed to return home, she refuses to leave. Her parents hear about this and change their ways. 
The film was initially titled Too Much of Everything. Dolores Costello signed in September 1937. It was her comeback picture for Warners. In November the title was changed to Girls on Probation. Arthur Lubin directed in November 1937. The title was finally changed to Beloved Brat in January 1938. 
Traditionally, it was part of Walthamstow parish and municipal borough. It is primarily a residential area, with housing consisting of mainly Victorian and 1930s terraced houses. 
The whole of the Highams Park area was once known as Hale End, as evidenced by the name of Hale End Library, and the Halex factory. 
Although postcode areas are not intended to define districts, it might be said that Hale End approximates to the part of Highams Park which shares the postal district of IG8 with Woodford Green. The rest of Highams Park, which takes the Chingford postal district, E4. The park from which the area is (partially) named is located within the IG8 postcode area. 
There is another Tennis club (Whitehalls) situated on Larkshall Road. Highams Park Lake is used for Kayaking by members of The Scout Association. 
There are initial plans to build a velodrome in the grounds of Highams Park School. This would be used by the school and also local sports teams, it will be many years before any building work is undertaken.[citation needed] 
The park is known officially as "The Highams Park" but is often known locally as "Highams Park Field", "The Field", "The Park" or "The lake". Most of the park is on a hill with a gradual rise to the north end. It is frequented by dog walkers, runners and families. The park has a cafe and a playground. 
There is a small island in the lake which is inhabited by nesting swans. Near the top of the lake are some large rocks thought to have been placed there by Humphry Repton to improve the lake's appearance. A public toilet block used to be situated on the east side of the lake although it was demolished many years ago, and only the foundations remain. 
A recent campaign seeks to honour the men of Highams Park who worked in the Halex Factory and gave their lives in both world wars. The campaigners also wish to see the return of the local war memorial to its original site. 
Alophosoma emmelopis, the bicoloured crest, is a moth of the family Noctuidae. The species was first described by Turner in 1929. It is found in Australia. 
The name Dol pri Hrastniku literally means 'Dol near Hrastnik'. The name Dol is a common toponym in Slovenia. It is derived from the common noun dol 'small valley', referring to a local geographical feature. 
Dol pri Hrastniku has a small stone wayside shrine engraved with the years 1668 and 1671. Next to it is a masonry chapel-shrine with columns dating from 1808. Another chapel-shrine, dating from the mid-19th century and with the remnants of frescoes, stand next to the house at Dol pri Hrastniku no. 92. 
The Eighteenth Canadian Ministry was the cabinet chaired by Prime Minister John Diefenbaker.  It governed Canada from 21 June 1957 to 22 April 1963, including all of the 23rd, 24th, and 25th Canadian Parliaments.  The government was formed by the Progressive Conservative Party of Canada. 
The Wolverine Mine was a small copper mining operation in the Keweenaw Peninsula of Michigan, that was in operation from January 1882 until November 1884. In August 1890, possession of the company was obtained and reorganized as the Wolverine Copper Mining Company. It mined the Kearsarge lode until 1922 when it closed. 
Many repairs and additions had to be made in order to get the mine up and running including extensive repairs to the stamp mill, including the laying of a new steel roof and water-ways. In addition the mine was flooded up to the first level. Work to remove the water lasted from October 7 to December 1, 1890. By December 20, 1890, a few drills were put into operation and work increased from then on. The mine closed in 1925. 
This article about a copper-related corporation or company is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David L. Anderson (born May 14, 1956) is an American politician and a Republican member of the South Dakota House of Representatives representing District 16 since May 13, 2013.  He was appointed by Governor Dennis Daugaard after Patty Miller resigned. 
XHGEO-FM is a radio station on 91.5 FM in Guadalajara. The station is owned by Grupo Promomedios and carries a news/talk format known as Zona 3. 
Sebastian Heidinger (born 11 January 1986) is a German footballer who plays as a right back or right midfielder. 
In June 2017, Heidinger joined newly promoted 2. Bundesliga side Holstein Kiel on a one-year contract. Paderborn let him leave on a free transfer. 
On 25 August 2018, Haidinger joined FSV Wacker 90 Nordhausen. In October 2019, he was relegated to the club's reserve team alongside 4 other teammates. He left the club at the end of the year. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Michael Paul Ford (born 9 February 1966) is an English former professional footballer. His father, Tony Ford, was also a professional footballer. 
On 30 April 2014, Oxford City announced that Ford would no longer be their first-team manager. After a year out of the game, in May 2015 he was appointed manager of Banbury United in the Southern League Division 1 South & West. He earned promotion to the Southern Premier Division in his first season as manager via the playoffs. 
On 29 April 2020, Banbury United announced that Ford would cease to manage the club once his contract expired at the end of the month. 
Timpson Independent School District is a public school district based in Timpson, Texas (USA).  In 2009, the school district was rated "academically acceptable" by the Texas Education Agency. 
This biographical article related to a Czech athlete known for competing in triathlons is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The People's Park is a park in Halifax, West Yorkshire, England. It was given to the people of Halifax in 1857 by local carpet manufacturer Sir Francis Crossley. 
The park was originally designed by Joseph Paxton, but suffering neglect in the late 20th century until a major restoration project which started in 1995. It is listed as Grade II* in the Register of Historic Parks and Gardens of special historic interest in England, and the Crossley Pavilion, a building in the park, is a Grade II* listed building. 
Crossley had reportedly been impressed by the beauty of the scenery of New England on a visit and returned to Halifax eager "to arrange art and nature so that they shall be within the walk of every working man in Halifax; that he shall go to take his stroll there after he has done his hard day's toil, and be able to get home without being tired". 
Bingley: Bingley St Ives Bradford: Bowling Park, Bradford City Park, Harold Park, Horton Park, Lister Park, Northcliffe Park, Peel Park 
Floyd was born in Bartow County, Georgia in 1904. His family moved to Akins, Oklahoma in 1911, and he grew up there. He was arrested at age 18 after he stole $3.50 from a local post office. Three years later, he was arrested for a payroll robbery on September 16, 1925 in St. Louis, Missouri and was sentenced to five years in prison. He served three and a half years before being granted parole. 
In 1929, Floyd was wanted in numerous cases. On March 9, he was arrested in Kansas City on investigation, and again on May 7 for vagrancy and suspicion of highway robbery, but he was released the next day. Two days later, he was arrested in Pueblo, Colorado and charged with vagrancy. He was fined $50.00 and sentenced to 60 days in jail. 
Floyd was arrested in Akron, Ohio on March 8, 1930 under the alias Frank Mitchell and charged with the murder of an Akron police officer who had been killed during a robbery that evening. He was arrested in Toledo, Ohio on suspicion[clarification needed] on May 20. He was convicted of a Sylvania Ohio Bank Robbery and sentenced on November 24, 1930 to 12 to 15 years in Ohio State penitentiary, but he escaped. 
Floyd was a suspect in the deaths of Kansas City brothers Wally and Boll Ash who were rum-runners, found dead in a burning car on March 25, 1931. Members of his gang killed Patrolman R. H. Castner of Bowling Green, Ohio on April 23. On July 22, Floyd killed federal agent Curtis C. Burke in Kansas City, Missouri. 
The FBI named Floyd "Public Enemy No. 1" on July 23, 1934, following the death of John Dillinger. Local police and FBI agents led by Melvin Purvis shot Floyd on October 22, 1934 in a corn field in East Liverpool, Ohio. Accounts differ on who shot him and the manner in which he was killed.  
Floyd and Richetti had left Buffalo, New York on October 18, and their vehicle slid into a telephone pole in heavy fog. No one was injured, but the car was disabled, so they sent two female companions to get a tow truck. They planned to have the women accompany the tow truck driver into town and have the vehicle repaired while they waited by the roadside. 
Floyd's body was embalmed and briefly viewed at the Sturgis Funeral Home in East Liverpool, Ohio before being sent on to Oklahoma. His body was placed on public display in Sallisaw, Oklahoma. His funeral was attended by between 20,000 and 40,000 people and remains the largest funeral in Oklahoma history. He was buried in Akins, Oklahoma. 
Woody Guthrie wrote a protest song romanticizing Floyd's life in 1939 called "Pretty Boy Floyd" which recounted Floyd's supposed generosity to the poor. It compared foreclosing bankers to outlaws, calling both actions robbery. Guthrie's song has been subsequently covered by many recording artists. 
Dick Tracy's adversary Flattop Jones was based on Pretty Boy Floyd. Flattop claims to be a freelancer from the "Crookston Hills", a parody of Cookson Hills in Oklahoma, and the comic strip refers to Flattop's involvement in the Kansas City Massacre.[failed verification] 
Pretty Boy Floyd (1995) is a fictionalized account of Floyd's life by Larry McMurtry and Diana Ossana. 
Floyd is (along with Baby Face Nelson and Machine Gun Kelly) one of the main characters of the comic book series Pretty, Baby, Machine. 
Zimmermann immigrated to the United States from England in 1937 with her new husband, German brewery master Arnold Zimmermann. The Zimmermanns initially settled in New York and eventually moved across country, finally settling in Wisconsin in a converted schoolhouse which would become home to Schoolhouse Press, a mail-order knitting business still based in the schoolhouse and run by her daughter Meg Swansen. 
Zimmermann devised her "EPS" (Elizabeth's Percentage System) calculation for sizing garments based on gauge and desired body circumference.  Her "EPS" is still widely used by designers: it consists of a mathematical formula to determine how many stitches to cast on for a sweater, given that the sleeves and body are usually proportionate no matter what yarn or gauge is used. 
EPS was central to Zimmermann's mandate that knitters think for themselves, knit without patterns, make independent design decisions, and improvise as they knit, elevating their skills and work to that of a true craft. 
In 1974, Zimmermann founded a series of knitting camps that continue to this day under her daughter's direction. Her motto was: "Knit on with confidence and hope, through all crises."[citation needed] 
Elizabeth Zimmermann died in Marshfield, Wisconsin, on 30 November 1999 at the age of 89. In her obituary in The New York Times Douglas Martin wrote, "Mrs. Zimmermann chose to play down her influence on knitting, coining the term unventions for her woolly inventions." 
A retrospective exhibit, "New School Knitting: The Influence of Elizabeth Zimmermann and Schoolhouse Press," was presented at the University of Wisconsin-Madison Gallery of Design in 2006. 
Although there are other citrus species that are referred to as "limes", the Persian lime is the most widely cultivated lime species commercially, and accounts for the largest share of the fruits sold as limes. The fruit turns yellow as it ripens, but it is universally sold while still green. 
The trees are propagated clonally, by grafting or air layering. Persian limes are commercialized primarily in six sizes, known as 110s, 150s, 175s, 200s, 230s and 250s. Large numbers of Persian limes are grown, processed, and exported every year primarily from Mexico to the American, European and Asian markets. In 2014, Brazil was the major exporter of fresh limes to Europe (about 70%) with Mexico supplying most of the remainder. 
Norway competed at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, from 5 to 21 August 2016. Since the nation's debut in 1900, Norwegian athletes have appeared in every edition of the Summer Olympic Games, except for two occasions: the 1904 Summer Olympics in St. Louis and the 1980 Summer Olympics in Moscow, due to the country's support for the United States-led boycott. 
The following is the list of number of competitors participating in the Games. Note that reserves in handball are not counted as athletes: 
One Norwegian archer has qualified for the men's individual recurve at the Olympics by virtue of a top five national finish at the 2016 Archery World Cup meet in Antalya, Turkey. 
Norwegian athletes have so far achieved qualifying standards in the following athletics events (up to a maximum of 3 athletes in each event): 
Norwegian riders qualified for five quota places in the men's Olympic road race by virtue of their top 15 national finish in the 2015 UCI World Tour. One additional spot was awarded to the Norwegian cyclist in the women's road race by virtue of her top 100 individual placement in the 2016 UCI World Rankings. 
Norway has qualified one mountain biker for the women's Olympic cross-country race, as a result of her nation's tenth-place finish in the UCI Olympic Ranking List of May 25, 2016. 
Norwegian riders qualified for one men's quota place for BMX at the Olympics, as a result of the nation's top four finish in the UCI BMX Individual Ranking List of May 31, 2016. BMX rider Tore Navrestad were named as part of the second batch of nominated athletes to the Olympic roster on June 19, 2016. 
Norway has entered three golfers into the Olympic tournament. Espen Kofstad (world no. 291), Suzann Pettersen (world no. 18), and Marianne Skarpnord (world no. 155) qualified directly among the top 60 eligible players for their respective individual events based on the IGF World Rankings as of 11 July 2016. 
Norway has entered one artistic gymnast into the Olympic competition for the first time since 2000. Stian Skjerahaug had claimed his Olympic spot in the men's apparatus and all-around events at the Olympic Test Event in Rio de Janeiro. 
The Norwegian women's handball team qualified for the Olympics by winning the 2015 World Championships in Denmark. 
 The following is the Norwegian roster in the women's handball tournament of the 2016 Summer Olympics. 
Qualification Legend: FA=Final A (medal); FB=Final B (non-medal); FC=Final C (non-medal); FD=Final D (non-medal); FE=Final E (non-medal); FF=Final F (non-medal); SA/B=Semifinals A/B; SC/D=Semifinals C/D; SE/F=Semifinals E/F; QF=Quarterfinals; R=Repechage 
Norwegian sailors have qualified one boat in each of the following classes through the 2014 ISAF Sailing World Championships, the individual fleet Worlds, and European qualifying regattas. 
On May 30, 2016, returning Olympian Kristian Ruth (Laser), along with Finn yachtsman Anders Pedersen and skiff sisters Ragna and Maia Agerup, were the first Norwegian sailors to be officially selected to the Olympic roster. Meanwhile, windsurfer Maria Mollestad and Laser Radial sailor Tiril Bue rounded out the crew selection as part of the second batch of nominated athletes on June 19, 2016. 
Norwegian swimmers have so far achieved qualifying standards in the following events (up to a maximum of 2 swimmers in each event at the Olympic Qualifying Time (OQT), and potentially 1 at the Olympic Selection Time (OST)): 
Norway has entered one triathlete to compete at the Games. Kristian Blummenfelt was ranked among the top 43 eligible triathletes in the men's event based on the ITU Olympic Qualification List as of May 15, 2016. 
Joshua Tui Tapasei (born 30 May 1979) is a Tuvaluan retired footballer. Joshua is also the coach of the Tuvalu national under-15 football team. 
He has played for Nauti FC. Since 2012 Joshua is the coach of the Tuvalu national under-15 football team. 
Joshua made his debut for the Tuvalu national football team at the South Pacific Games 2003. He made his debut in the match against Kiribati on June 30, 2003. 
In 2011, he played four games at the Pacific games 2011 as Defender: against Vanuatu, New Caledonia, Solomon Islands, and Guam. He was the captain of the team in the game against the Solomon Islands. 
This biographical article relating to Tuvaluan association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pierre Cousin (born 14 June 1913, date of death unknown) was a French long-distance runner. He competed in the marathon at the 1948 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article about a French long-distance runner is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Johannes "Jan" Nicolaus Ignacius Keizer (born 6 October 1940 in Volendam, North Holland) is a retired Dutch referee. He is known for having refereed two matches in the 1986 FIFA World Cup in Mexico. He also refereed one match in the 1984 UEFA European Football Championship in France. 
Keizer is known to have been a FIFA referee during the period from 1974 to 1987. He officiated the final at the 1984 Olympic tournament between France and Brazil, and served as a referee in the 1983 FIFA World Youth Championship, UEFA Euro 1980 qualifying, UEFA Euro 1984 qualifying, UEFA Euro 1988 qualifying, 1978 FIFA World Cup qualification, 1982 World Cup qualification, and 1986 World Cup qualification. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Bulgaria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stephen Buckley (born 23 April 1959) is a former Australian rules footballer who played with Carlton and North Melbourne in the Victorian Football League (VFL). His father, Brian Buckley, and brother, Mark Buckley, also played in the VFL. 
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ranskill railway station served the village of Ranskill, Nottinghamshire, England from 1849 to 1964 on the East Coast Main Line. 
The station opened on 4 September 1849 by the Great Northern Railway. During the Second World War, there was a Royal Ordnance Factory located on the up side with its own factory station. The station was closed to passengers on 6 October 1958 and was closed completely on 7 December 1964. 
This article on a railway station in the East Midlands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"How R U Doin?" is a song by Danish-Norwegian pop group Aqua from their third studio album, Megalomania. It was released as the album's lead single on 14 March 2011. The song peaked at number four in Denmark, becoming the group's tenth top-ten single. It has since been certified gold by the International Federation of the Phonographic Industry (IFPI) for sales of 15,000 copies. 
On 9 March 2011 Aqua posted the single artwork to "How R U Doin?" on their Facebook page with the date "14.03.2011". 
^ Shipments figures based on certification alone. Streaming-only figures based on certification alone. 
The Rans S-16 Shekari is an American single-engined, two-seat, low-wing, aerobatic monoplane designed by Randy Schlitter, built by Rans Inc and sold as a kit for amateur construction. 
Conceived as a new generation of Rans aircraft focusing on quicker built times and higher performance, the Shekari is stressed for dual aerobatics. 
Production of the S-16 was ended as part of Rans' extensive reorganization of its product line on 1 June 2006, after the kit had been available for 8 years. Twenty-two had been completed and flown by the end of 2005. 
William H. Winsborough is an American computer scientist, having taught at University of Texas at San Antonio and an Elected Fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science. 
This biographical article relating to a computer specialist in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Trichinella nativa is a nematode worm, one of the species of the genus Trichinella, found in arctic and subarctic regions. 
It is highly pathogenic and has a high resistance to freezing. It is encapsulated, and infects a wide variety of mammals and birds. Its lifecycle and pathogenesis are similar to Trichinella spiralis; T. nativa also can cause trichinosis. In Northern Europe T. nativa is a species commonly found in omnivores and carnivores such as wild boars, foxes, raccoon dogs and bears.  
This Enoplea nematode (or roundworm-) related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ash was born in Henley-on-Thames, Oxfordshire, and first appeared on British television in 1964 at the age of four asking "Mummy, why are your hands so soft?" in an advertisement for the washing-up product Fairy Liquid. She was educated at the independent Italia Conti Academy stage school, and then started a career as a fashion model appearing on the cover of a number of teenager magazines, including Pink, and Jackie, for which she was photographed by David Bailey.[citation needed] 
In 1987, Ash appeared in the first episode of the third series of the ITV Home to Roost. The episode was entitled Human Interest, and Ash played the role of the flamboyant cleaner, Susie Perkins. 
Ash's best known role was playing Neil Morrissey's romantic interest Deborah (Debs) in the situation comedy Men Behaving Badly. She continued in the role for six series. She subsequently acted in BBC police drama Merseybeat and the ITV drama Where the Heart Is. 
In 1996, during her time on Men Behaving Badly, Leslie released a single "Tell Him" with co-star Caroline Quentin, under the name of "Quentin & Ash". It reached number 25 in the UK singles chart. 
Ash appeared in BBC Radio 4's comic radio series, Vent (2007), alongside Neil Pearson, Fiona Allen and Josie Lawrence. 
In May 2008, Ash worked with Transparent Television to make a documentary about the unregulated cosmetic beauty industry whilst exploring her own experiences. The programme, Leslie Ash: Face to Face was broadcast on ITV on 23 September 2008. 
In 2009, Ash appeared on daytime TV panel programme Loose Women to discuss her new role in Holby City and her previous health problems. Leslie reappeared on Loose Women on 17 February 2012 where she discussed her on stage tour of All the Single Ladies. 
In 2014, Leslie was a contestant on the BBC programme, Celebrity Masterchef. In 2020, she appeared opposite many of her Quadrophenia co-stars in the unofficial semi-sequel To Be Someone. In 2021, it was announced that she would be reprising her role as Vanessa Lytton in an episode of Holby City's sister series Casualty. In the same year, she also appeared in an episode of the BBC soap opera Doctors as Mary McRae. 
Ash contracted toxoplasmosis two months into her pregnancy in France, where it is more common than the United Kingdom. She told the BBC that she wished to raise awareness of the issue in Britain. 
Ash was hospitalised at the Chelsea and Westminster Hospital in April 2004 after suffering two cracked ribs. She was discharged after a few days, but was readmitted after losing all feeling in her legs. In June 2004 while she was still in hospital, it was announced that a Staphylococcus aureus infection might have rendered her permanently unable to walk. 
Ash and Chapman sued the News of the World for breach of privacy over suspicions that their voicemails, and those of their two sons, were illegally accessed by private investigator Glenn Mulcaire. They wrote to the police over their suspicions, and the police informed them that there were four pieces of paper referring to Ash in Mulcaire's notebooks, and five items relating to Chapman. There were further items relating to their children. 
In August 2011, Ash and Chapman settled a claim against the paper and Mulcaire for an undisclosed sum and received an apology. They planned to take action against other newspapers. 
It was made available digitally in the U.S. on March 12, 2013 and was released across Europe both digitally and in CD format on June 3, 2013. The box set includes the band's three studio albums released under Roadrunner Records between 1997 and 2002, as well as the rarities album Giving the Devil His Due. 
Theia Mons is a large shield volcano on Venus. Its name is derived from the titan of Greek mythology. 
This article about an extraterrestrial geological feature is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2016 iHeartRadio Music Awards was the third music award show presented by iHeartMedia's platform iHeartRadio and was televised live on TBS, TNT and truTV. The awards was held on April 3, 2016, at The Forum in Inglewood, California, and was hosted by American singer Jason Derulo. 
Taylor Swift and The Weeknd led the nominations with seven categories, followed by Adele with five nominations. 
The nominees were announced on February 9, 2016. Winners are listed first and highlighted in boldface. 
Taylor Swift and The Weeknd were nominated for the inaugural Female and Male Artist of the Year categories (the previous two years featured simply Artist of the Year). Swift was the big winner of the night with four awards, including Best Tour and Album of the Year. 
Out of the 29 categories, the awards also feature 7 fan-voted categories including Best Fan Army, Best Lyrics and Best Collaboration, as well as four new categories: Best Cover Song, Best Song from a Movie, Biggest Triple Threat and Most Meme-Able Moment. Voting took place via the iHeartRadio website from February 9 through March 25, except for Fan Army and Meme-Able Moment, which continued through the evening of the awards on April 3. 
Glaphyria basiflavalis, the basal-dash glaphyria moth, is a moth in the family Crambidae described by William Barnes and James Halliday McDunnough in 1913. It is found in North America, where it has been recorded from Alabama, Florida, Mississippi and Texas. 
WEC 36: Faber vs. Brown was a mixed martial arts event held by World Extreme Cagefighting that took place on November 5, 2008 at the Seminole Hard Rock Hotel and Casino in Hollywood, Florida. The event aired live on the Versus Network. 
Danillo Villefort was supposed to make his WEC debut against Jake Rosholt at this event, but was pulled from the bout after his visa expired. He was replaced by fellow WEC newcomer Nissen Osterneck. 
This event was originally scheduled for September 10, 2008 but was postponed due to the threat of Hurricane Ike.  
The following is the reported payout to the fighters as reported to the Florida State Athletic Commission. It does not include sponsor money or "locker room" bonuses often given by the WEC. 
^ Filho was forced to surrender 25 percent of his base pay to Sonnen after failing to make weight for the fight. 
Theft is the name of a statutory offence in California, Canada, England and Wales, Hong Kong, Northern Ireland, the Republic of Ireland, and the Australian states of South Australia and Victoria.  
The actus reus of theft is usually defined as an unauthorized taking, keeping, or using of another's property which must be accompanied by a mens rea of dishonesty and the intent to permanently deprive the owner or rightful possessor of that property or its use. 
Theft is defined in section 134 of the Criminal Consolidation Act 1935 (SA) as being where a person deals with property dishonestly, without the owner's consent and intending to deprive the owner of their property, or make a serious encroachment on the proprietary rights of the owner. 
Under this law, encroachment on proprietary rights means that the property is dealt with in a way that creates a substantial risk that the property will not be returned to the owner, or that the value of the property will be greatly diminished when the owner does get it back. Also, where property is treated as the defendant's own property to dispose of, disregarding the actual property owner's rights. 
For a basic offence, a person found guilty of this offence is liable for imprisonment of up to 10 years. 
For an aggravated offence, a person found guilty of this offence is liable for imprisonment of up to 15 years. 
Whether a person's conduct is dishonest is a question of fact to be determined by the jury, based on their own knowledge and experience. As with the definition in Victoria, it contains definitions of what is not dishonesty, including a belief in a legal claim of right or a belief the owner could not be found. 
322. (1) Every one commits theft who fraudulently and without colour of right takes, or fraudulently and without colour of right converts to his/her use or to the use of another person, anything, whether animate or inanimate, with intent 
In the general definition above, the Supreme Court of Canada has construed "anything" very broadly, stating that it is not restricted to tangibles, but includes intangibles. To be the subject of theft it must, however: 
For the purposes of punishment, Section 334 divides theft into two separate offences, according to the value and nature of the goods stolen: 
Where a motor vehicle is stolen, Section 333.1 provides for a maximum punishment of 10 years for an indictable offence (and a minimum sentence of six months for a third or subsequent conviction), and a maximum sentence of 18 months on summary conviction. 
Theft is a criminal activity in India with punishments which may lead to jail term. Below are excerpts of laws of Indian penal Code which state definitions and punishments for theft. 
Theft is a statutory offence, created by section 4(1) of the Criminal Justice (Theft and Fraud Offences) Act, 2001. 
According to the Romanian Penal Code a person committing theft (furt) can face a penalty ranging from 1 to 20 years. 
In England and Wales, theft is a statutory offence, created by section 1(1) of the Theft Act 1968. This offence replaces the former offences of larceny, embezzlement and fraudulent conversion. 
The marginal note to section 1 of the Theft Act 1968 describes it as a "basic definition" of theft. Sections 1(1) and (2) provide: 
Sections 2 to 6 of the Theft Act 1968 have effect as regards the interpretation and operation of section 1 of that Act. Except as otherwise provided by that Act, sections 2 to 6 of that Act apply only for the purposes of section 1 of that Act. 
"Property" includes money and all other property, real or personal, including things in action and other intangible property.
Edward Griew said that section 4(1) could, without changing its meaning, be reduced, by omitting words, to: 
The words "other intangible property" include export quotas that are transferable for value on a temporary or permanent basis. 
Electricity cannot be stolen. It is not property within the meaning of section 4 and is not appropriated by switching on a current. Cf. the offence of abstracting electricity under section 13. 
Section 5 "belonging to another" requires a distinction to be made between ownership, possession and control: 
So if A buys a car for cash, A will be the owner. If A then lends the car to B Ltd (a company), B Ltd will have possession. C, an employee of B Ltd then uses the car and has control. If C uses the car in an unauthorized way, C will steal the car from A and B Ltd. This means that it is possible to steal one's own property. 
In R v Turner, the owner removed his car from the forecourt of a garage where it had been left for collection after repair. He intended to avoid paying the bill. There was an appropriation of the car because it had been physically removed but there were two issues to be decided: 
Section 6 "with the intent to permanently deprive the other of it" is sufficiently flexible to include situations where the property is later returned.[citation needed] 
The offense created by section 12(1) of the Theft Act 1968 (TWOC) is available an alternative verdict on an indictment for theft. 
Theft is triable either way. A person guilty of theft is liable, on conviction on indictment, to imprisonment for a term not exceeding seven years, or on summary conviction to imprisonment for a term not exceeding six months, or to a fine not exceeding the prescribed sum, or to both. 
For the purposes of the provisions of the Theft Act 1968 which relate to stolen goods, goods obtain in England or Wales or elsewhere by blackmail or fraud are regarded as stolen, and the words "steal", "theft" and "thief" are construed accordingly. 
The offence of handling stolen goods, contrary to section 22(1) of the Theft Act 1968, can only be committed "otherwise than in the course of stealing". 
According to its title, the Theft Act 1968 revises the law as to theft and similar or associated offences. See also the Theft Act 1978. 
In Northern Ireland, theft is a statutory offence, created by section 1 of the Theft Act (Northern Ireland) 1969. 
In the United States, crimes must be prosecuted in the jurisdiction in which they occurred. Although federal and state jurisdiction may overlap, even when a criminal act violates both state and federal law, in most cases only the most serious offenses are prosecuted at the federal level. 
Although many U.S. states have retained larceny as the primary offense, some have now adopted theft provisions. 
Grand theft, also called grand larceny, is a term used throughout the United States designating theft that is large in magnitude or serious in potential penological consequences. Grand theft  is contrasted with petty theft, also called petit theft, that is of smaller magnitude or lesser seriousness. 
In some states, grand theft of a vehicle may be charged as "grand theft auto" (see motor vehicle theft for more information). 
When stolen property exceeds the amount of $500 it is a felony offense. If property is less than $500, then it is a Class A misdemeanor. Unlike some other states, shoplifting is not defined by a separate statute but falls under the state's general theft statute. 
The Alaska State Code does not use the terms grand theft or grand larceny.  However, it specifies that theft of property valued at more than $1,000 is a felony whereas thefts of lesser amounts are misdemeanors.  The felony categories (class 1 and class 2 theft) also include theft of firearms; property taken from the person of another; vessel or aircraft safety or survival equipment; and of access devices. 
Felony theft is committed when the value of the stolen property exceeds $1000. Regardless of the value of the item, if it is a firearm or an animal taken for the purpose of animal fighting, then the theft is a Class 6 Felony. 
The Theft Act of 1927 consolidated a variety of common law crimes into theft.  The state now distinguishes between two types of theft, grand theft and petty theft. The older crimes of embezzlement, larceny, and stealing, and any preexisting references to them now fall under the theft statute. 
Grand theft is punishable by up to a year in jail or prison, and may be charged (depending upon the circumstances) as a misdemeanor or felony, while petty theft is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine or imprisonment not exceeding six months in jail or both. 
In general, any property taken that carries a value of more than $750 can be considered grand theft in certain circumstances. 
In Georgia, when a theft offense involves property valued at $500 or less, the crime is punishable as a misdemeanor. Any theft of property determined to be exceeding $500 may be treated as grand theft and charged as a felony. 
Theft in the first or second degree is a felony. Theft in the first degree means theft above $20,000 or of a firearm or explosive; or theft over $300 during a declared emergency. Theft in the second degree means theft above $750, theft from the person of another, or agricultural products over $100 or aquacultural products from an enclosed property. 
Theft is a felony if the value of the property exceeds $300 or the property is stolen from the person of another. Thresholds at $10,000, $100,000, and $500,000 determine how severe the punishment can be. The location from which property was stolen is also a factor in sentencing. 
In Massachusetts, theft may generally be charged as a felony if the value of stolen property is greater than $250. 
Theft of goods valued between $750 and $5000 is second-degree theft, a Class C felony.  Theft of goods valued above $5000, of a search-and-rescue dog on duty, of public records from a public office or official, of metal wire from a utility, or of an access device, is a Class  B felony, as is theft of a motor vehicle  or a firearm. 
In the British West Indies, especially Grenada, there have been a spate of large-scale thefts of tons of sand from beaches.  Both Grenada and Jamaica are considering increasing fines and jail time for the thefts. 
In parts of the world which govern with sharia law, the punishment for theft is amputation of the right hand if the thief does not repent. This ruling is derived from sura 5 verse 38 of the Quran which states As to the thief, Male or female, cut off his or her hands: a punishment by way of example, from Allah, for their crime: and Allah is Exalted in power. This is viewed as being a deterrent. 
The most common reasons for shoplifting include participation in an organized shoplifting ring, opportunistic theft, compulsive acts of theft, thrill-seeking, and theft due to need. Studies focusing on shoplifting by teenagers suggest that minors shoplift for reasons including the novelty of the experience, peer pressure, the desire to obtain goods that a minor cannot legally purchase, and for economic reasons, as well as self-indulgence and rebellion against parents. 
Nazim Uddin's father's name was Arab Ali and his mother's name Misri Begum. He was in East Pakistan Rifles in 1971. After the declaration of independence of Bangladesh he decided to take part in the Liberation War of Bangladesh. He was appointed in Sholoshahar, Chittagong at that time. 
Nazim Uddin and other freedom fighters joined with other freedom fighters of East Bengal Regiment in Brahmanbaria in April. They were in Ashuganj Upazila to protect the place from Pakistanis. He also attacked Dharampasha Thana of Sunamganj in guerrilla style along with other freedom fighters in May and got success. Later, he crossed the border and went to India. He trained new freedom fighters in India. 
In November Nazim Uddin and other freedom fighters went to Golapganj, Sylhet from India. They destroyed the defence of Pakistanis in Komolpur, Golapganj. After independence he was awarded Bir Protik from Bangladesh Government for his contribution to the Liberation War of Bangladesh. 
Simple Sum is the first studio album by Australian singer-songwriter, Wes Carr. Carr recorded the album in 2007 at Sydney's Electric Avenue Studios. The album was released independently and features tracks that were written by Carr, including many at the age of fourteen and fifteen. The album was released digitally on 11 June 2008 and peaked at number 12 on the iTunes Album Chart shortly after Carr was crowned the winner of Australian Idol in 2008. 
"Cherrokee Dream" was written about the nightmares Carr used to suffer as a child. In fact, his song choice for Australian Idol's top 4 American Hits night, "What A Wonderful World", was inspired by this very fact. Carr listened to the song as a child frequently, and on repeat, to help him sleep.[citation needed] 
The song "Elsie Brown (Simple Sum)" was written by Carr in 2003, inspired by a news story he read about a lady of that name, who died alone in her Sydney home and was speculated to have been left undiscovered for up to 22 months. She was elderly and neighbours claimed she rarely left her house or had visitors. 
Meher Baba was born on 2 January 1950 in Kakinada, East Godavari District, Andhra Pradesh in India, he was the only son of Shri. Danthala Ramayya Naidu and Smt. Danthala Padmamma. He was named after Avatar Meher Baba.  
Venkata Meher started to play cricket at an age of 17, where he was selected to represent East Godavari District in the Junior State selection Championship in 1967 in Kakinada. He showed exceptional skill in his left arm orthodox spin bowling and left hand batting, his consistent performance in the Junior State Cricket Championship got him selected to represent the Andhra Ranji Trophy Team in 1971. 
Meher Baba made his debut against Mysore (now Karnataka) held on 8,9,10 January 1972 (3-day match) in Vijayawada. Meher Baba took his first wicket on 27 October 1972, against Kerala at Kurnool, this was his 4th first class match. Because of inconsistent debutant performances in the first 5 matches, Andhra's Captain B. Mahendra Kumar dropped Meher Baba from the playing 11, against Tamil Nadu in Madras on 3 December 1972. Andhra however lost this match by 105 runs. 
His wife Smt. Danthala Uma Maheshwari retired as Section Officer, Andhra Pradesh Secretariat. His daughters Archana and Padmaja represented the AP Women's cricket team, Archana also played for Inter State south zone while his son Srikkanth represented Andhra Under-19 and South India Under 19 Teams. 
Meher baba played for Andhra Bank for 25 years and retired from the institutional cricket after 4 years of his first class cricket retirement in 1989. As a Zonal Manager, he took voluntary retirement from Andhra Bank in 2001. Meher Baba later worked for Jagruti Bank in Sainikpuri as a Branch Manager for 2 years and later resigned his post. 
In 1992, BCCI honoured Meher Baba with a benefit match, as a gesture of his contributions to India cricket. The benefit match was conducted between Gavaskar XI and Mohammad Azharuddin XI at Srikakulam. Andhra Cricket Association honoured Meher Baba in 2007, at his home town in Rajamundry. 
Meher Baba battled against Lung Cancer for 2 years, and died on 16 January 2008 at his residence in Sainikpuri, Secunderabad, AP. His death was condolenced by the media, the Hyderabad Cricket Association as well the Andhra Cricket Association. 
Philomena Chelagat Mutai (1949-2013) was a Kenyan activist and politician, known for her stands on political assassinations, land grabs and corruption. She championed the inclusion of women in Kenyan politics and society, and as a lifelong activist for better governance. 
Her social and political activism got her expelled from Highlands Girls School, now known as Moi Girls Eldoret, for leading a student strike. 
She enrolled in University of Nairobi to study political science. She was a student leader and the editor of the student newspaper, The Platform. Because of her radical ideas and firm political stands, she was repeatedly suspended. 
Six months after graduating, Chelagat Mutai contested for the Eldoret North Parliamentary seat. The seat had become vacant after the incumbent, William Saina, was imprisoned for incitement. Although she had shown an interest in elective politics, her first choice had been the Eldoret South seat. She changed her mind after consulting with her mentor, Jean-Marie Seroney. 
At age 24 she defeated a field of more male experienced opponents, becoming Parliament's youngest member at the time. 
Chelagat and Seroney fought for good governance, and were interested in going beyond Nandi Nationalism. Chelagat used her platform to criticize Jomo Kenyatta's government, speaking out against his decision to make land pacts with the British. 
She joined a small group of vocal legislators, derisively called "The Seven Bearded Sisters" by then Attorney General Charles Njonjo. Her colleagues included Martin Shikuku, Dr. Chibule wa Tsuma, Lawrence Sifuna, Abuya Abuya, George Anyona, James Orengo, and Koigi wa Wamwere. 
In 1976 she was prosecuted for inciting squatters to invade a sisal farm in Ziwa. She served two and a half years in prison, losing her parliamentary seat in the same way as her predecessor. 
She was released from prison in September 1978. In the next election in 1979, she ousted Sirma. In her second term, she was vocal about the government's inadequate response during the 1980 famine. 
Chelagat fled from Kenya to Tanzania in 1981 after learning of a plot to detain her again, this time over alleged false mileage claims. She returned three years later to check on her ailing mother, but kept away from politics. 
After her return to Kenya in 1984, Chelagat Mutai reconciled somewhat with the KANU government. She was appointed to a senior position at Kenya Commercial Bank. She worked within KANU headquarters, and for the Standing Committee on Human Rights. She was fired from the human rights body through a radio bulletin in June 1999, and withdrew to her father's farm in Terige. 
In 2006, Chelagat Mutai was involved in a road accident that left her using a wheelchair. She spent the next years of her life in near destitution, at one point living in a friend's one-room house in a Nairobi estate. Her plight was highlighted by a 2011 visit by then Prime Minister Raila Odinga. 
The East Orange Oval was an athletic field located at Brick Church in East Orange, New Jersey. It was also the first known field used by the Orange Athletic Club football team. The field was also used for track and field events by the Old Brick Church of Orange, among other groups. 
Jannat is a 2018 Bangladeshi crime and drama  film. The film Story by Sudipto Saeed Khan and Directed by Mostafizur Rahman Manik. It features Symon Sadik, Mahiya Mahi, Ali Raj and Misha Sawdagor. The film was released worldwide on 5 January 2018. The film won 5 awards including Best Director and Best Actor at the 43rd Bangladesh National Film Awards. 
Anthony Michael Kielkucki (born July 11, 1951) is an American politician in the state of Minnesota. He served in the Minnesota House of Representatives. 
 Madhugiri Lok Sabha constituency was a former Lok Sabha constituency in Mysore State (Karnataka from 1967 to 1977).  This seat came into existence in 1967 and ceased to exist in 1976, before 1977 Lok Sabha Elections. This constituency was later merged with Tumkur Lok Sabha constituency. 
Sikron  is a village development committee in Siraha District in the Sagarmatha Zone of south-eastern Nepal. At the time of the 1991 Nepal census it had a population of 2862 people living in 559 individual households. 
This article about a location in Siraha District, Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ilham Mahdi al Assi was a 13-year-old Yemeni girl who died as a result of bleeding following her first sexual intercourse with her husband,  23-year-old  Abed al-Hikmi, who was later detained by police. The practice of marrying young girls was condemned by an NGO as "child rape condoned under the guise of marriage." 
Yemen has a tribal culture, and the marriage of young girls is common; most Yemeni girls are married before they reach puberty. A proposed law setting a minimum age of 17 for women and 18 for men to marry was opposed by conservative Yemenis, including women. 
This biographical article about a Norwegian religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Norwegian politician born in the 1810s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The name Sean has been used for two tropical cyclones worldwide, one in the Atlantic Ocean and one in the Australian Region of the Pacific Ocean. In the Atlantic, the name replaced Stan, which was retired after the 2005 season. 
The Yakovlev Yak-4 (Service names Yak-4, BB-22bis (Blizhnij Bombardirovschik, "short-range bomber")) was a Soviet light bomber used during World War II. It was developed from the Ya-22/Yak-2. 
 This page lists public opinion polls conducted for the 2012 French legislative elections, which were held in two rounds on 10 and 17 June 2012. 
Unless otherwise noted, all polls listed below are compliant with the regulations of the national polling commission (Commission nationale des sondages) and utilize the quota method. 
The averages in the graphs below were constructed using polls listed below conducted by the nine major French pollsters. The graphs are smoothed 14-day weighted moving averages, using only the most recent poll conducted by any given pollster within that range (each poll weighted based on recency). 
The comparison for the Left Front with 2007 is made against the French Communist Party and the New Centre against "presidential majority" candidates. Hunting, Fishing, Nature and Traditions and the Movement for France, which were counted individually in 2007, are included in the miscellaneous right total for that year, which would otherwise be 2.47%. 
Projections marked with an asterisk (*) were calculated based only on the first round results, not surveys before the second round. 
The Ipsos survey conducted from 13 to 14 June consisted of 1,015 respondents in 157 constituencies with left-right duels, 775 respondents in 36 constituencies EELV-right duels, and 685 respondents in 27 constituencies in constituencies with a left-right-FN triangulaire. 
The comparison for the Left Front with 2007 is made against the French Communist Party. Movement for France, which was counted individually in 2007, is included in the miscellaneous right total for that year, which would otherwise be 9 otherwise. 
The TNS Sofres poll tested Jean-Pierre Nadal as the candidate of the FN; Laure-Emmanuelle Philippe was ultimately invested by the party. 
After the first round, Alain Fillola, though eligible to continue to the second round, withdrew his candidacy. 
Bernard Hanks (September 19, 1884 - December 12, 1948) was a founder of Harte Hanks. After attending Baylor University, Hanks worked for a time in the grocery business, but was soon working for the Abilene Daily Reporter. Hanks began managing the newspaper sometime in the 1920s. Around that time Hanks met San Angelo Standard-Times owner, Houston Harte. The two would go on to found what would become Harte Hanks. 
Victoria River Downs Station, also known as Victoria Downs and often referred to as The Big Run, is a pastoral lease that operates as a cattle station in the Northern Territory of Australia. 
Several watercourses pass through the property including the Wickham River, Camfield River, Townsend River, Humbert River, Gill Creek, Blackskin Creek, Depot Creek, Jasper Creek and Battle Creek. 
The property is composed of several land types including ridges and plateaus on sandstone or dolomite, gently undulating plains of dolomite overlaid with loamy soils, limestone outcrops and alluvial floodplains with cracking clays. Vegetation includes wire grass, white grass and black spear grass on the red earth country with stands of ribbon grass, flinders grass, blue grass and feathertop wire grass on the clay country. 
Pigeon Hole Station (181,100 hectares (448,000 acres)) was until 2000 an outstation of Victoria River Downs. 
Watson died in the Katherine River in 1896 and his brother, Robert Molesworth Watson, took over the management of Victoria River Downs. 
By 1901 the station was carrying about 30,000 head of cattle. and by 1907 Victoria River Downs was stocked with an estimated 69,350 head of cattle. 
Sherwin was subject to a takeover bid by Elders in 1988 and Elders gave a 17.4% share in the property to Robert Holmes a Court, by 1989 Holmes a Court owned all of Victoria River Downs which today trades as Heytesbury Beef. 
Kambaldaite crystallizes in the hexagonal system, is light green to blue, and forms drusy to mammilla encrustations on the matrix.  
Kambaldaite was first described in 1985 from the gossan of the Otter Shoot nickel orebody, Kambalda, during mining of the gossans material. Kambaldaite, though in lesser and rarer amount, is also found in the Widgiemooltha nickel gossans, probably discovered there in the early to mid-1990s.  
Kambaldaite is formed in the regolith as a supergene alteration mineral of nickel sulfide minerals, in arid or semi-arid environments which produce conditions amenable to a concentration of calcareous or carbonate minerals in the weathering profile. 
Kambaldaite from Kambalda and Widgiemooltha is associated with komatiite-associated nickel sulfide gossans and is probably formed by substitution of nickel into carbonates such as magnesite which are formed by oxidation of the lithology, and oxidation of primary and supergene nickel sulfide minerals. 
Kambaldaite is formed from a similar process to the weathering of other sulfide minerals to form carbonate minerals. The sulfide minerals which are weathered to produce kambaldaite are pentlandite, violarite, millerite and rarely nickeline. 
Kambaldaite is associated with goethite, malachite, annabergite, gaspeite and magnesite in the nickel sulfide gossans of Kambalda and Widgiemooltha. It is not known from other nickel sulfide gossans within the Yilgarn Craton, potentially due to many of these existing within areas of laterite cover, deeper regolith development, or less favorable rainfall conditions. 
Kambaldaite has not reported from the Tasmanian or New South Wales nickel carbonate occurrences because it is a supergene carbonate mineral and not a hydrothermal mineral. 
Kambaldaite is also reported from the Inn valley, North Tyrol, Austria, and from Linopolis, Minas Gerais, Brazil. 
Broad Left Front (in Spanish: Frente Amplio de Izquierda)  is a political coalition of leftist parties and movements in Peru. 
Initially, the organization was known as National Coordination of Left-wing and Progressive Parties (Coordinadora Nacional de Izquierda y Partidos Progresistas). It took the name Frente Amplio de Izquierda in November 2005. 
In the elections of 2006, the FAI decided to withhold support for the presidential candidacy of Ollanta Humala and his Peruvian Nationalist Party, and nominated Alberto Moreno, chairman of Peru's communist party, as its own presidential candidate. Subsequently, some long-time leftists, such as  Ricardo Letts Colmenares, left the FAI. 
Porter Consolidated Schools is a school district headquartered in Porter, Oklahoma. It serves portions of Wagoner County, including Porter, Redbird, and Tullahassee. 
Beris chalybata, the murky-legged black legionnaire, is a European (Northern and middle Europe from the northern Sweden down into France. European Russia) species of soldier fly. 
Female. Fronsin the female broad, occupying the third part of the breadth of the head. Eyes sparingly and short hairy. Front broad, black. Thorax more greenish or bluish than in the male, with short, pale brown pubescence. Abdomen dark brown, shining. Wings not brown but distinctly yellowish, with light brown veins, stigma brown. Halteres yellow.   
The habitat is moist or shaded locations with trees and hedgerows. Adults are found from April  to September. The saproxylic larvae found in decaying dead leaves and wood debris. 
This article related to members of the insect family Stratiomyidae, the soldier flies, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"True Disaster" is a song by Swedish singer and songwriter Tove Lo released as the second single from Lady Wood (2016), her second studio album. The song was written by Lo and Oscar Holter, and produced by Holter.  It was released for US radio on 15 November 2016 by Republic Records.  On 3 February 2017, Lo released the remixed version of the song called "True Disaster (Cut Snake Remix)". 
"Come on, zero fucks about it / Come on, I know I'm gonna get hurt", and "Keep playing my heartstrings faster and faster / You can be just what I want, my true disaster."
The music video for "True Disaster" is a part of the short film Fairy Dust, which was directed by Tim Erem and premiered on 30 October 2016 via Lo's Vevo channel. The standalone video debuted on 29 November 2016 on her YouTube and Vevo channels. The video was filmed as a one-shot. 
The video starts with the singer driving a car and having a normal conversation with the character named Lorna, played by Lina Esco, who plays the role of Lo's self-destructive alter ego. She suddenly bangs Lo's head against the car, causing an accident. Another scene shows Lorna pouring gasoline on the car. The singer wakes up, getting herself out of the car. She starts walking on a neon-lit street in a choreographed dance. 
"True Disaster" was first performed at a pre-Video Music Awards concert in August 2016. On 19 November, Lo performed "True Disaster" on the French television show Quotidien. On 22 November, she performed the song for iHeartRadio, along with "Cool Girl", "Talking Body", "Keep It Simple", and "Habits (Stay High)" at The X Studio in Sydney. 
In 2004 he obtained the "Knight Medal of Art and Literature" awarded by the French government. In 2006 he obtained the "Knight Medal" awarded by the President of Italy. In 2013 he obtained the "Beijing best educator" awarded by the Beijing government. 
The Universe series of works has not only the elegant style and the stretch of spirits, but also portraying the classical tradition and fantasy lyrical modern expression temperament; the series of works express the magnificent Chinese culture. You can feel the universe in the cup and how broad-minded the artist is. 
The series of Lines Visions series is a brave attempt for Wang Huangsheng to think about the ink creation and social intervention. The series were drawn on newspaper media of Southern Weekly and Reference News to reflect on the current social situation. By applying ink lines on the newspaper, Wang Huangsheng redefined how we read and also integrated his artist practice with social reality. 
In painting series Trace Vision, Metaphor Vision and The Wall Wang experiments with gauze, bandage and rubbing. The traces gauze residues leave and the ink as well as the reality and cultural information between the newspaper and the rice paper become a metaphor for harm and protection, restoration and sublimation. The fine, delicate, sensitive imprints form a rich and subtle contrast with the rich and wild lines and shapes and ink stains. 
The Wall features a visible or invisible wall of gauze imprints of isolation and self-protection to imply injury, pain, separation, blood, care, and cure. The texture of gauze rubbing and the shades and humidity of ink echo the delicate and fine rubbing traces on a large-size tableau, also including the imprints of randomly scattered gauze bits, so as to give embodied expression on the visual and psychological levels. 
Metaphor Vision, a new series in 2017, is a rubbing on gauze painted red. There are also biblical quotes about human self-reflection to express a complex feeling of harm and atonement. 
Wang's installations are derivative of his paintings. These installations often use barbed wires to imitate the movement of ink lines. Barbed wires, as ready-made material for art, are sharp, pliable and tough, so they are metaphoric of ink as well as social violence. 
Division of Space builds an enclosed space with curtains in which the barbed wires, glinting in the light, create a poetic atmosphere of ink painting, both imaginary and real. Seeing the moving and poetic light and shadow replaced by barbed wires, viewers may experience an inspiring visual and perceptual shock. 
Haunts 2 continues to make use of barbed wires wrapped in gauze for a sense of trauma. The artists aims to lend more extensive social significance to the interaction between the property of material and human beings. 
2017: A Fine Line (ART100 New York, New York, U.S.A); Annual Review of China Contemprorary Ink Painting 2016-2017 (Ucity Art Museum of GAFA, Guangzhou, China) 
2016: The Exhibition of Annual of Contemporary Art of China, 2015 (Beijing Minsheng Art Museum, Beijing, China) 
2015: The Civil Power (Beijing Minsheng Art Museum, Beijing, China); CHINA 8: Chinese contemporary art in Rhine ruhr (Rhine ruhr, Germany); Calligraphic time and space: Abstract Art in China (Power Station of Art, Shanghai, China) 
From 1994 to 2009, Wang Huangsheng's paintings were selected for The 8th, 9th and 11th National Art Exhibition in China. 
Wang Huangsheng: New Experience on Art Museum, No.1 of the Art Museum as Knowledge Production series (Central Compilation & Translation Press, 2012) 
A History of Traditional Chinese Painting: Section of Landscape Painting (One of the Authors; Jiangxi Art Publishing House, 2008) 
Series of Research regarding Chinese Master painters in Ming and Qing Dynasties: Chen Hongshuo (Jilin Art Publishing House, 1995) 
Fondazione Unione Sportiva Petrarca is an Italian amateur sports club based in Padua. The club was formed in 1912 by the Jesuits. 
Although nationally and internationally the U.S. Petrarca is known mainly for its association with rugby, the club is involved with a number of other sports as well: 
Threapland is a hamlet in the Allerdale district, in the county of Cumbria, England. Nearby settlements include the village of Bothel and the village of Plumbland. 
A Treatise on the Circle and the Sphere is a mathematics book on circles, spheres, and inversive geometry. It was written by Julian Coolidge, and published by the Clarendon Press in 1916. The Chelsea Publishing Company published a corrected reprint in 1971, and after the American Mathematical Society acquired Chelsea Publishing it was reprinted again in 1997. 
This biographical article related to an Italian cycling person born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a CONMEBOL/South American association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The publication of Copernicus' model in his book De revolutionibus orbium coelestium (On the Revolutions of the Celestial Spheres), just before his death in 1543, was a major event in the history of science, triggering the Copernican Revolution and making a pioneering contribution to the Scientific Revolution. 
Copernicus's father married Barbara Watzenrode, the astronomer's mother, between 1461 and 1464. He died about 1483. 
Copernicus is postulated to have spoken Latin, German, and Polish with equal fluency; he also spoke Greek and Italian, and had some knowledge of Hebrew.[k][l][m][n] The vast majority of Copernicus's extant writings are in Latin, the language of European academia in his lifetime. 
One of the subjects that Copernicus must have studied was astrology, since it was considered an important part of a medical education. However, unlike most other prominent Renaissance astronomers, he appears never to have practiced or expressed any interest in astrology. 
With Novara, Copernicus observed an occultation of Aldebaran by the moon on 9/3/1497. Copernicus also observed a conjunction of Saturn and the moon on 4/3/1500. He saw an eclipse of the moon on 6/11/1500. 
The Prince-Bishopric of Warmia enjoyed substantial autonomy, with its own diet (parliament) and monetary unit (the same as in the other parts of Royal Prussia) and treasury. 
That same year (before 8 November 1512) Copernicus assumed responsibility, as magister pistoriae, for administering the chapter's economic enterprises (he would hold this office again in 1530), having already since 1511 fulfilled the duties of chancellor and visitor of the chapter's estates. 
Some people believe that it is excellent and correct to work out a thing as absurd as did that Sarmatian [i.e., Polish] astronomer who moves the earth and stops the sun. Indeed, wise rulers should have curbed such light-mindedness.
Nevertheless, in 1551, eight years after Copernicus's death, astronomer Erasmus Reinhold published, under the sponsorship of Copernicus's former military adversary, the Protestant Duke Albert, the Prussian Tables, a set of astronomical tables based on Copernicus's work. Astronomers and astrologers quickly adopted it in place of its predecessors. 
Some time before 1514 Copernicus made available to friends his "Commentariolus" ("Little Commentary"), a manuscript describing his ideas about the heliocentric hypothesis.[x] It contained seven basic assumptions (detailed below). Thereafter he continued gathering data for a more detailed work. 
The grave was in poor condition, and not all the remains of the skeleton were found; missing, among other things, was the lower jaw. The DNA from the bones found in the grave matched hair samples taken from a book owned by Copernicus which was kept at the library of the University of Uppsala in Sweden. 
In an early unpublished manuscript of De Revolutionibus (which still survives), Copernicus mentioned the (non-heliocentric) 'moving Earth' theory of Philolaus and the possibility that Aristarchus also had a 'moving Earth' theory (though it is unlikely that he was aware that it was a heliocentric theory). He removed both references from his final published manuscript.[c][e] 
Copernicus was probably aware that Pythagoras's system involved a moving Earth. The Pythagorean system was mentioned by Aristotle. 
Copernicus owned a copy of Giorgio Valla's De expetendis et fugiendis rebus, which included a translation of Plutarch's reference to Aristarchus's heliostaticism. 
 In the 12th century, Nur ad-Din al-Bitruji proposed a complete alternative to the Ptolemaic system (although not heliocentric). He declared the Ptolemaic system as an imaginary model, successful at predicting planetary positions, but not real or physical. Al-Bitruji's alternative system spread through most of Europe during the 13th century, with debates and refutations of his ideas continued up to the 16th century. 
Copernicus' Commentariolus summarized his heliocentric theory. It listed the "assumptions" upon which the theory was based, as follows: 
Georg Joachim Rheticus could have been Copernicus's successor, but did not rise to the occasion. Erasmus Reinhold could have been his successor, but died prematurely. The first of the great successors was Tycho Brahe (though he did not think the Earth orbited the Sun), followed by Johannes Kepler, who had collaborated with Tycho in Prague and benefited from Tycho's decades' worth of detailed observational data. 
Arthur Koestler, in his popular book The Sleepwalkers, asserted that Copernicus's book had not been widely read on its first publication. This claim was trenchantly criticised by Edward Rosen,[ab] and has been decisively disproved by Owen Gingerich, who examined nearly every surviving copy of the first two editions and found copious marginal notes by their owners throughout many of them. Gingerich published his conclusions in 2004 in The Book Nobody Read. 
Another Protestant theologian who disparaged heliocentrism on scriptural grounds was John Owen.  In a passing remark in an essay on the origin of the sabbath, he characterised "the late hypothesis, fixing the sun as in the centre of the world" as being "built on fallible phenomena, and advanced by many arbitrary presumptions against evident testimonies of Scripture." 
On the orders of Pope Paul V, Cardinal Robert Bellarmine gave Galileo prior notice that the decree was about to be issued, and warned him that he could not "hold or defend" the Copernican doctrine.[ad] The corrections to De revolutionibus, which omitted or altered nine sentences, were issued four years later, in 1620. 
In 1633 Galileo Galilei was convicted of grave suspicion of heresy for "following the position of Copernicus, which is contrary to the true sense and authority of Holy Scripture", and was placed under house arrest for the rest of his life. 
At the instance of Roger Boscovich, the Catholic Church's 1758 Index of Prohibited Books omitted the general prohibition of works defending heliocentrism, but retained the specific prohibitions of the original uncensored versions of De revolutionibus and Galileo's Dialogue Concerning the Two Chief World Systems. Those prohibitions were finally dropped from the 1835 Index. 
There has been discussion of Copernicus' nationality and of whether it is meaningful to ascribe to him a nationality in the modern sense. 
Encyclopedia Americana, The Concise Columbia Encyclopedia, The Oxford World Encyclopedia, and World Book Encyclopedia refer to Copernicus as a "Polish astronomer". Sheila Rabin, writing in the Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy, describes Copernicus as a "child of a German family [who] was a subject of the Polish crown", while Manfred Weissenbacher writes that Copernicus's father was a Germanized Pole. 
Historian Michael Burleigh describes the nationality debate as a "totally insignificant battle" between German and Polish scholars during the interwar period. Polish astronomer Konrad Rudnicki calls the discussion a "fierce scholarly quarrel in ... times of nationalism" and describes Copernicus as an inhabitant of a German-speaking territory that belonged to Poland, himself being of mixed Polish-German extraction. 
Copernicia, a genus of palm trees native to South America and the Greater Antilles, was named after Copernicus in 1837. In some of the species, the leaves are coated with a thin layer of wax, known as carnauba wax. 
In July 2014 the International Astronomical Union launched NameExoWorlds, a process for giving proper names to certain exoplanets and their host stars. The process involved public nomination and voting for the new names. In December 2015, the IAU announced the winning name for 55 Cancri A was Copernicus. 
Copernicus is honored, together with Johannes Kepler, in the liturgical calendar of the Episcopal Church (US), with a feast day on 23 May. 
Copernicus is commemorated by the Nicolaus Copernicus Monument in Warsaw, designed by Bertel Thorvaldsen (1822), completed in 1830; and by Jan Matejko's 1873 painting, Astronomer Copernicus, or Conversations with God.  
A Copernicus Award has been established jointly by the Foundation for Polish Science and the German Research Foundation, to promote Polish-German scientific cooperation. 
The American Snuff Company, formerly Conwood Sales Company LLC, is a US tobacco manufacturing company that makes a variety of smokeless tobacco products, including dipping tobacco or moist snuff, chewing tobacco in the forms of loose-leaf, plug, and twist, and dry snuff. 
Originally established as "Conwood LLC" in 1900 in New York City, the company began manufacturing smokeless tobacco products in 1904 in Tennessee. From 1986 to 2006, Conwood was owned by the Pritzker family of Chicago. The company is currently a subsidiary of Reynolds American, after being acquired in mid-2006 for $3.5 billion in cash. When Reynolds American acquired Conwood, Reynolds subsidiary Lane Limited was merged into it. The name "American Snuff Company" was assumed in 2010. 
Nowadays the company has three facilities, two in Tennessee (Memphis and Clarksville) and the other in Winston-Salem, North Carolina. As of 2017, American Snuff generated nearly 7% of Reynolds American's annual revenue. The current President of American Snuff Company is Chris Gemmell. 
The club used to have a tennis department. In 2012 it merged with two other clubs and the organisation that operates the courts to form Elfsborg Tennis. 
The 1906 College Football All-America team is composed of college football players who were selected as All-Americans by various organizations and writers that chose College Football All-America Teams for the 1906 college football season. The organizations that chose the teams included Walter Camp for Collier's Weekly, Caspar Whitney for Outing Magazine, the New York World, the New York Sun, The New York Times, the New York Mail, and Charles Chadwick. 
The only unanimous first-team All-American in 1906 was Yale end Bob Forbes. Other players who were named to the first team by at least five of the eight selectors reflected below were end Caspar Wister of Princeton (6 first-team designations), tackle Lucius Horatio Biglow of Yale (7 selections), guard Francis Burr of Harvard (7 selections), guard Elmer Thompson of Cornell (5 selections), center Clarence Hockenberger of Yale (5 selections), and halfback Hugh Knox of Yale (5 selections). 
 The Washington Post in December 1906 wrote of the difficulty involved in selecting eleven players for an All-American team:
 In announcing his All-American team, Caspar Whitney wrote that he had weighed character as a factor in his selections:
"This eleven is chosen, after a season's observation, with a view to collecting the most resourceful, strongest all-round team under the new rules. No man whose amateur status is a matter of question or whose play has been unsportsmanly is eligible to this national team, which, in keeping with its honorary nature, I endeavor to confine to sportsmen."
After having lived in West Germany and Canada in his early years, he spent his senior year of high school at St. Thomas More School in Oakdale, Connecticut, United States, where he averaged 24 points and 14 rebounds per game. 
He ended his career at St. Johns with 1,349 total points (tied 22nd all-time as of 2018) and 784 total rebounds (10th all-time); he also graduated with honors. 
Minlend retired in 2008 after having played 4 games with the Cherkaski Mavpy in the Ukrainian Basketball SuperLeague. 
The 1982 Pacific Tri-Nations was the first edition of the Pacific Tri-Nations tournament competed for between Fiji, Tonga and Western Samoa with each team playing the other two teams once. Western Samoa were the inaugural winners winning both of their matches. 
Chares may be organized into indexed collections called chare arrays and messages may be sent to individual chares within a chare array or to the entire chare array simultaneously. 
The chares in a program are mapped to physical processors by an adaptive runtime system. The mapping of chares to processors is transparent to the programmer, and this transparency permits the runtime system to dynamically change the assignment of chares to processors during program execution to support capabilities such as measurement-based load balancing, fault tolerance, automatic checkpointing, and the ability to shrink and expand the set of processors used by a parallel program. 
Applications implemented using Charm++ include NAMD (molecular dynamics) and OpenAtom (quantum chemistry), ChaNGa and SpECTRE (astronomy), EpiSimdemics (epidemiology), Cello/Enzo-P (adaptive mesh refinement), and ROSS (parallel discrete event simulation). All of these applications have scaled up to a hundred thousand cores or more on petascale systems. 
Adaptive MPI (AMPI) is an implementation of the Message Passing Interface standard on top of the Charm++ runtime system and provides the capabilities of Charm++ in a more traditional MPI programming model. AMPI encapsulates each MPI process within a user-level migratable thread that is bound within a Charm++ object. By embedding each thread in a chare, AMPI programs can automatically take advantage of the features of the Charm++ runtime system with little or no changes to the MPI program. 
Charm4py allows writing Charm++ applications in Python, supporting migratable Python objects and asynchronous remote method invocation. 
It is also possible to write hybrid Charm4py and MPI programs. An example of a supported scenario is a Charm4py program using mpi4py libraries for specific parts of the computation. 
This biographical article relating to Portuguese football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Gandamia  is a rural commune of the Cercle of Douentza in the Mopti Region of Mali. The commune contains eight villages and in the 2009 census had a population of 7,215. The chef-lieu is the small village of Kikara. 
After his release from Avanhard he began his third spell abroad in the Canadian Soccer League with FC Ukraine United. In his debut season in Toronto he assisted in securing the First Division title. 
The following is a list of awards and nominations received by American DJ/producer duo The Chainsmokers. 
The BMI Awards are annual award ceremonies based in the United States, honoring the industry's top songwriters, publishers and top 50 best-performing songs of the year. .  
Delivered since 1991. The GAFFA Awards (Danish: GAFFA Prisen) are a Danish award that rewards popular music awarded by the magazine of the same name. 
This biographical article related to medicine in Greece is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sankofa is an oogenus of prismatoolithid egg. They are fairly small, smooth-shelled, and asymmetrical. Sankofa may represent the fossilized eggs of a transitional species between non-avian theropods and birds. 
The name Sankofa comes from the Ashante word "sankofa", meaning 'learning from the past', symbolized by a bird with an egg in its bill. The oospecific epiphet pyrenaica refers to the Pyrenees, where the eggs were first discovered. 
Sankofa pyrenaica is known solely from the Aren Formation, in the southern Pyrenees of Catalonia, Spain, dating from the Upper Campanian to Lower Maastrichtian. 
Parataxonomically, Sankofa is classified in the oofamily Prismatoolithidae, because of its microstructure. Cladistic analysis found Sankofa to be in a polytomy with Protoceratopsidovum, Troodon eggs, and birds. The mosaic of avian and non-avian characteristics makes it uncertain whether S. pyrenaica was laid by a bird or a non-avian theropod, and provides further evidence for the theory that birds evolved from dinosaurs. It probably represents a transitional form between the two groups. 
Onda was met with widespread acclaim reviews from critics.  Hans Kim of PopMatters described "Onda as "a project that interweaves diasporic influences just as heterophony interweaves distinct melodies." 
The Selden family has a long history both in the United States and in England. The name originated from the ancient location of Selkeden in Eccleston, Sussex, England.  The first known Selden in this family was John, born about 1210. 
Seldens were numbered among the early settlers of the original American colonies.  Dorothy Selden married Stephen Hosmer; their son settled in Connecticut, another son James lived in Concord, Massachusetts.  The Selden name in America was carried by Thomas Selden (b. 1616/17; d. aft Aug 1655) and by Samuel Selden (b. 1662; d. 1720). The Selden family is among the First Families of Virginia. 
Branden Albert (born November 4, 1984) is a former American football offensive tackle who played nine seasons in the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Virginia and was drafted by the Kansas City Chiefs 15th overall in the 2008 NFL Draft. He also played for the Miami Dolphins and was a member of Jacksonville Jaguars before announcing his retirement in 2017. 
Albert grew up in a single-parent home in Rochester, New York. His mother, Susan Albert, decided to send him to Washington, D.C., where his older brother Ashley Sims, a defensive lineman for the Maryland Terrapins from 1994 to 1997, worked as a probation officer. As a junior at Glen Burnie High School, he started playing football. He was also a part of the basketball team, which made it to the state finals the final two years of Albert's career. 
Considered only a two-star recruit by Rivals.com, Albert was not ranked among the nation's top recruits. Because he had played football for only one season, but also because of Albert's poor grades, the University of Virginia was the only school to recruit Albert, first helping him enroll at Hargrave Military Academy in Chatham, Va to improve his grades, and subsequently offering him a scholarship. 
Still struggling academically, Albert spent the 2004 season at Hargrave Military Academy. He played football and was able to obtain a qualifying grade-point average and standardized test score. Albert would later credit Hargrave and coach Robert Prunty for his later success. 
Albert started all 37 games during his three-year career at Virginia, mostly at the offensive guard position as D'Brickashaw Ferguson and later five-star recruit Eugene Monroe occupied the left tackle spot. He was only the second Virginia freshman since 1972 to start on the offensive line. Albert earned first-team All-Atlantic Coast Conference honors as a junior. 
Albert was the first guard taken in the draft, as well as the second Virginia Cavalier (behind No. 2 pick Chris Long). He was the highest selected guard since Chris Naeole went 10th overall to the New Orleans Saints in the 1997 NFL Draft. 
On July 24, 2008, Albert signed a five-year contract with the Chiefs. It was announced by the Chiefs that he would be moved to the tackle position, though he played guard at Virginia. Despite missing all four preseason games with a foot injury suffered at training camp, Albert still managed to start 15 games at left tackle (only missing Week 5 at Carolina due to an elbow injury). He allowed just 4.5 sacks in 2008, and the only penalty called against him all season was a false start. 
With high expectations, 2009 was a disappointing struggle for Albert. He committed 10 penalties and his 9 sacks allowed were the fifth most in the league. He missed Week 6 and 7 with an ankle injury but started the other 14 games. Despite his struggles, Albert finished the season a little stronger allowing no sacks in the final three games. Head coach Todd Haley later called his 2009 performance an "adjustment period" after losing nearly 40 pounds the last offseason in his request. 
Albert started 15 games in 2010 and has established himself as the Chiefs left tackle. He started 16 games in the 2011 season at left tackle, occasionally covering left guard due to the acquisition of Jared Gaither from the Baltimore Ravens. 
Albert would have his best season in 2013 albeit playing in only 12 games. He was a key component in Kansas City's run scheme led by Jamaal Charles who totaled 1980 all purpose yards. Albert made it to the 2013 Pro Bowl. 
On March 11, 2014, Albert signed a five-year, $47 million contract with the Miami Dolphins. At the conclusion of the 2015 NFL season, Albert was selected to play in his second Pro Bowl. 
Albert was arrested after he punched a large hole in a display cabinet in a jewelry store in Georgia in February 2018. He had entered an area that was only for staff, then asked to leave, after which he punched the cabinet. The police were called and Albert was tased twice. After the arrest he reached a deal where he paid for the damages and pledged 40 hours of community service, while also having to undergo a mental health examination. 
United Nations Security Council resolution 737, adopted without a vote on 29 January 1992, after examining the application of the Republic of Uzbekistan for membership in the United Nations, the Council recommended to the General Assembly that Uzbekistan be admitted. 
A champion seed is indicated in bold text while text in italics indicates the round in which that seed was eliminated. 
Farrar joined the Royal Engineers for National Service after which he took up a course in architecture at the Rochester Technical College and subsequently worked with Bedfordshire County Council.  In 1950, Farrar joined the architectural practice of Sir Albert Richardson where the experience gave him great insight into classical design and proved the foundation of his subsequent work in restoration.  Like Richardson, he was adept at fast sketches which he would later use for Christmas cards. 
In 1978, Farrar was appointed to restore the nave and chancel of St Paul's Church, Bedford.  He also restored the west gallery at the church. St Paul's has been described as being of cathedral proportions. 
Construction of a bridge to replace the level crossing and extend the Port Klang flyover started in 2013 and was completed in 2015. 
The school district includes all of Rutland, Salem, Salisbury, Scipio as well as most of Bedford Township, and a very small portion of Chester Township. 
Three incorporated villages are served by Meigs Local Schools: Pomeroy, Middleport, and Rutland. Notable unincorporated communities in the district include Darwin and Langsville. 
In 1999, the Board of Education approved of a school bond measure that would allow for the construction of a new elementary school divided into two wings - a primary school and an intermediate school, a new middle school and renovations to the existing high school. In 2002, renovations to Meigs High School were complete and in 2003, Meigs Elementary and Meigs Middle School opened, which consolidated the seven preexisting elementary buildings and junior high school. 
After closure of the District's former schools, Bradbury, Middleport and Pomeroy elementary schools began serving the communities in other capacities. Salisbury Elementary was renovated and converted to serve as the District's administrative office building. Harrisonville Elementary and Meigs Junior High were sold. Lastly, both Rutland and Salem Center Elementary schools were abated and demolished. 
The current structure was built by Jean du Faou. According to some historians, it was a former hunting lodge of the Dukes of Brittany, in the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries. Its position, at the entrance of large woods that covers the entire parish of Nizon, and which abounds in game, can make this opinion very plausible. 
It is believed that the manor-house once consisted of a rectangular corps de logis and had turrets at each of the corners, as well as the large central staircase tower. 
The castle has been listed as a Monument historique (historical monument) by the French Ministry of Culture since 1926. 
 Yeshivat Torat HaChaim is an educational yeshiva network founded by Rabbi Shmuel Tal in 1996, originally situated in the Gush Katif (Gaza Strip) settlement of Neve Dekalim. After the 2005 disengagement from Gaza, Torat HaChaim was re-established in the religious settlement, Yad Binyamin, between Jerusalem and Ashdod.  
Rav Tal believes in inclusiveness in the student body, with students representing most types of orthodoxy, Haredi and Religious Zionist, and stresses the need to become more involved in every aspect of Israeli society. He encourages his students to serve in the Nahal Haredi or to do standard National Service.  
Future plans include a music academy for men and women, and high schools for sons and daughters of baalei teshuva. 
Rosedale is an unincorporated community in central Pike Township, Madison County, Ohio, United States, and roughly thirty miles (48 kilometers) west of the city of Columbus. The ZIP code is 43029 and mail is currently delivered by the Irwin post office.[citation needed] 
In 1964 Conservative Mennonite Bible School, a Bible college owned by the Conservative Mennonite Conference, purchased the former high school building and moved to Rosedale from Berlin, Ohio. The school was later renamed Rosedale Bible College. Also in the mid 1960s Conservative Mennonite Conference moved its headquarters to the community. 
The elevation is 997 feet (303 meters) above sea level. The community is located between the Spring Fork and main channel of the Little Darby Creek to the northwest of their confluence. This puts the community on the western edge of the Scioto Watershed. The area was originally a wetland of prairie grass and moisture tolerant trees, and now boasts rich and productive farmland of primarily soy beans, corn and wheat.[citation needed] 
The 1995 FIVB Men's World Cup was held from 18 November to 2 December 1991 in Japan. Twelve men's national teams played in cities all over Japan for the right to a fast lane ticket into the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta. The first three qualified. 
The twelve competing teams played a single-round robin format, in two parallel groups (site A and site B). The men played in Tokyo, Sendai, Fukushima, Chiba, Hiroshima, Kumamoto, and Kagoshima. 
Hupeia is an extinct genus from a well-known class of fossil marine arthropods, the trilobites. It lived during the Botomian stage, which lasted from approximately 524 to 518.5 million years ago. This faunal stage was part of the Cambrian Period. 
Washburn was born in Jone 1842, sources have differed on the exact date. During the American Civil War, he served with the 28th Wisconsin Volunteer Infantry Regiment of the Union Army. He was a travelling salesman by trade. 
Washburn was a member of the Assembly in 1879. Previously, he was a Supervisor of Pewaukee, Wisconsin in 1868. He was a Republican. 
This article about a Republican Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly born in the 1840s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sonpur is a Tehsil/Block in the Saran district of Bihar. The Sub-district code of Sonpur block is 01267. There are about 91 villages in Sonpur block. 
Khin Maung Swe was born in July 1942 in Ngathaingchaung, Pathein District. He graduated in 1966 with a degree in Geology. From 1966 to 1988, he worked as a geologist at the Myanmar Petroleum Corporation. 
He served as secretary of the Petroleum Workers' Union during the 8888 Uprising. At the invitation of Aung San Suu Kyi, he became a member of the National League for Democracy (NLD) in October 1988. In July 1989, he became a member of the Executive Committee. 
In the 1990 elections, he was elected as the Pyithu Hluttaw MP for Constituency of Sanchaung Township but was not allowed to assume his seat. In October 1990, Khin Maung Swe was convicted of sedition and sentenced to 17 years in prison. 
Sigmund Groven (born 16 March 1946 in Heddal, Telemark) is a Norwegian classical harmonica player, today considered one of the world's leading classical harmonica players. He plays with a large number of the world's leading musicians and orchestras, and he has made 23 recordings yet in his own name (compilations not counted). His repertoire ranges from popular and folk music to his own compositions, from Bach to contemporary music. 
For more than 30 years Groven has been teaching at the annual summer courses organized by the Norwegian Harmonica Association. He has also been teaching at the Trondheim Conservatory of Music and has given master-classes both in Europe, North America, and several Asian countries. 
2004: Here, There and Everywhere (with The Norwegian Radio Orchestra under the direction of John Wilson) 
"HarmOrgan" together with organist Iver Kleive is an album of baroque works by Bach and Handel, plus original pieces by Groven and Kleive recorded in Surround Sound on Blu-ray format by Lindberg Lyd and released on the prestigious 2L label. 
The Crinn is an American mathcore band from St. Paul, Minnesota, United States, formed in 2005.  On April 20, 2010, they released their debut album Dreaming Saturn through Nuclear Blast records. 
This article on a United States band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The park's establishment was included as part of the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2015, which was signed into law by President Barack Obama on December 19, 2014. 
It is closely related to the Blackstone River Valley National Heritage Corridor, which is not a unit of the National Park System, but the National Historical Park contains only a subset of the sites associated with that  National Heritage Area. The Blackstone River Valley National Heritage Corridor continues to exist independently of the National Historical Park. 
There are 18 Important Bird and Biodiversity Areas (IBAs) designated for Armenia. The following is a list of Important Bird Areas in the country: 
"Sponsus" is the Latin word for groom/husband and is a cognate of the English "spouse". The feminine form is "sponsa" (bride/wife). 
The music of Sponsus has been praised by Rafaello Monteross for "redeem[ing] the anonymous poet's colourless paraphrase of the gospel text from its generic inexpressiveness." The melodic phrasing is varied, but only four different melodies are used for the entire play, though none of them is liturgical, and none form motifs. The entire score is original and is recorded in Aquitainian neumes. 
The strophic structure of the play is consistent throughout. The two principal metres are fifteen-syllable lines (for the Latin), with antecedents in classical trochaic septenarii, and ten-syllable lines (used for both Latin and Occitan), with predecessors in late antique and Merovingian hymns. The late antique hymn Apparebit repentina dies magna domini may have been an inspiration. 
The combination of original music, unique theme, and implicit questioning of traditional theodicies have led to the suggestion that the play may stand at the very beginning of non-liturgical and vernacular drama in Europe. 
Parliamentary elections was held in Mauritania in September 2018; the first round took place on 1 September, with a second round held on 15 September. At the national level, elections were held in 157 constituencies, each electing one member to the National Assembly. Elections were also held in 13 regional councils and 219 municipalities. 
As a result of the election, Union for Republic (UPR) remained the single largest party at the national level both in terms of popular vote and seats. 
The other 40 seats are elected from a single nationwide constituency, also using closed list proportional representation, with half elected on separate lists reserved for women. A further four members are elected by the diaspora. 
Opened in 1925, Meeth Halt was a small railway station on the North Devon and Cornwall Junction Light Railway, a private line until it became part of the Southern Region of British Railways in 1948. The line was built in part over a narrow gauge line that was used from 1881 to take ball clay from claypits at Marland and Meeth to Torrington, which was until 1925 the terminus of a branch from Barnstaple. 
The line was closed to passenger traffic in 1965 as part of the Beeching proposals, but remained open for freight from the Meeth clay workings north of Meeth Halt through Torrington to Barnstaple until 1982. The station consisted of a simple short concrete platform and a stone shelter and remains as a recognisable landmark on the Tarka Trail, a very popular destination for long-distance walkers and cyclists. As a result it is in the process of a major renovation. 
This article about a railway station in South West England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Wolfhound is a 2002 American erotic thriller film directed by Donovan Kelly and Jim Wynorski. It was shot in Ireland. 
Block is an Australian term for a small agricultural landholding. Block settlement has been used by Governments to encourage decentralization and during financial depressions to give families of unemployed workers an opportunity (frequently illusory) to become primary producers.[citation needed] It may also refer to a lifestyle choice or "hobby farm" for those with an independent source of income. 
Gross national product (GNP) is the market value of all the goods and services produced in one year by labor and property supplied by the citizens of a country. Unlike gross domestic product (GDP), which defines production based on the geographical location of production, GNP indicates allocated production based on location of ownership. In fact it calculates income by the location of ownership and residence, and so its name is also the less ambiguous gross national income. 
GNP is an economic statistic that is equal to GDP plus any income earned by residents from overseas investments minus income earned within the domestic economy by overseas residents. 
GNP does not distinguish between qualitative improvements in the state of the technical arts (e.g., increasing computer processing speeds), and quantitative increases in goods (e.g., number of computers produced), and considers both to be forms of "economic growth". 
When a country's capital or labour resources are employed outside its borders, or when a foreign firm is operating in its territory, GDP and GNP can produce different measures of total output. In 2009 for instance, the United States estimated its GDP at $14.119 trillion, and its GNP at $14.265 trillion. 
The term gross national income (GNI) has gradually replaced the Gross national product (GNP) in international statistics. While being conceptually identical, the precise calculation method has evolved at the same time as the name change. 
Miloco was formed out of the merging of three former London recording studios: Milo Music, The Garden and Orinoco Studios. 
The Garden studio, located in the Shoreditch area of East London, was built in 1981 by John Foxx and studio designer Andy Munro. It became a regular choice of studios for the likes of Siouxsie and the Banshees, The Cure and Depeche Mode, as well as Matt Johnson of The The who ended up buying the studio for himself. Milo Music became the studio's representative from the mid-1990s, when for the first time The Garden was run as a commercial enterprise. 
In 2007 Miloco set up a sister company, Interface, a studio engineer and producer management company. The Interface roster currently manages the following UK-based engineers and producers: Pete Hofmann, Finn Eiles, Matt Hyde, Matt Foster, Ferg Peterkin, Joe Hirst and Ben Thackeray. 
The Engine Room studio was rebranded as The Red Room London in 2015. Shortly after, in early 2016, Miloco's first studio The Square located in Hoxton Square closed permanently. 
In any case, thus it came about that Richard was brought up as a Catholic, although he was not baptized a Roman Catholic until he was about thirteen years old. This was at Warkworth, Northamptonshire, seat of a recusant Roman Catholic family, that of George Holman, whose wife, Lady Anastasia Holman, was a daughter of Blessed William Howard, 1st Viscount Stafford, a Catholic unjustly condemned and beheaded in the Titus Oates hysteria of 1678. 
In 1705 young Richard was sent to the English College at Douai (France) on a sort of scholarship, entering the English College on 29 July. He was to spend the next twenty-five years there, first as student, then as professor, and as vice-president of the university of Douai. At the age of twenty-one he was chosen to teach the classes of rhetoric and poetry, which were the two senior classes in the humanities. 
Recent scholarship notes, however, that the English Catholic community was not as marginalized as might be thought today, especially for those recusant Catholics whose social position gave them access to the courtly centers of power and patronage. Challoner avoided the houses of the rich, preferred to live and work among the poor of London, and in his spare hours gave himself to study and writing, which ultimately enabled him to produce several works of instruction and controversy. 
As one of the Protestant criticisms of Roman Catholics was that many of the practices of the Catholic Church were departures from the practice of the early Church, he sought to demonstrate continuity of Catholicism with the primitive Church. Britannia Sancta was published in 1745. With this book Challoner hoped to promote among Catholics a pride in their ancestry, and to show them that their present sufferings were not as hard as those endured by the martyrs and saints of the past. 
Besides the works mentioned above, and a good number of tracts, other writings, whose titles convey the atmosphere of an era, include: 
The aged Challoner never fully recovered from the shock of the riots. Six months later he was seized with paralysis, and died on 12 January 1781, aged 89. He was buried at Milton, Berkshire (present-day Oxfordshire) in the family vault of his friend Bryant Barrett in the Church of England parish church. In 1946 the body was reinterred in Westminster Cathedral. 
The Bishop Challoner Catholic Collegiate School in Stepney was founded by the Sisters of Mercy for him. 
BT Broadband is a broadband service offered by BT Consumer; a division of BT Group in the United Kingdom. It was formerly known as BT Total Broadband, BT Yahoo! Broadband and BT Openworld. With the introduction of BT Infinity, the Broadband package now refers to the legacy ADSL broadband products, such as ADSL Max and ADSL2+. 
"Jump" is a song by French-Israeli singer Nadav Guedj. It was released on 1 December 2015 through Unicell as the third single from his debut studio album, Nadav Guedj (2016). 
Northern West Riding of Yorkshire was a parliamentary constituency covering part of the historic West Riding of Yorkshire.  It returned two Members of Parliament (MPs) to the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom, elected by the bloc vote system. 
The constituency was created when the two-member West Riding of Yorkshire constituency was divided for the 1865 general election into two new constituencies, each returning two members: Northern West Riding of Yorkshire and Southern West Riding of Yorkshire. The extra seats were taken from parliamentary boroughs which had been disenfranchised for corruption. 
In the redistribution which took effect for the 1868 general election the two divisions were redistributed into three. Eastern West Riding of Yorkshire was created and the Northern and Southern divisions modified. Each of the three divisions returned two members. 
All three were abolished by the Redistribution of Seats Act 1885 for the 1885 general election.  The Northern division was replaced by five new single-member constituencies: Elland, Keighley, Shipley, Skipton and Sowerby. 
From 1865 to 1868 the constituency comprised the north half of the West Riding of Yorkshire. The Birkenhead Enfranchisement Act 1861 provided that it was to contain the wapentakes of Staincliffe and Ewecross, Claro, Skyrack, and Morley. 
The Reform Act 1867 re-defined the constituency as the wapentake of Staincliffe and Ewcross, Claro, Skyrack, Barkston Ash, and Osgoldcross. 
The Boundary Act 1868 again re-defined the constituency as the wapentake of Staincliffe and Ewcross with part of the wapentake of Morley (the parishes of Bradford and Halifax and the townships of Boston and Idle). 
Cavendish was appointed Chief Secretary to the Lord Lieutenant of Ireland, causing a by-election. However on 6 May 1882, just hours after taking the oath for the position, Cavendish was assassinated in Dublin in the Phoenix Park Murders. 
Russell was created a Baronet 18 January 1916, appointed a Knight Commander of the Royal Victorian Order (KCVO) in the 1921 New Year Honours and appointed a Knight of Grace of the Order of St John of Jerusalem (KStJ) in March 1921. 
During his lifetime, Christian missionaries moved into disaster struck rural parts of Bengal and started conversion of Muslims with the promise of hospitals, food and education. The salvation that the missionaries provided, improved lives but at the cost of having to give up on one's beliefs. 
According to Kenneth W. Jones, no other Muslim preacher contributed to polemical literature in that period. It should be noted, while debating Christian missionaries, Meherullah did not vilify them. He called for intra- communal harmony. 
Also, among his other major contributions, he strived to teach the Muslim population not to adopt primitive ideas from their neighboring Hindu society, which was opposed to the remarriage of widows. 
He did not strive for fame, he worked to spread truth to a hungry, devastated population that was being blinded by missionaries. 
Dead Sea products refers to cosmetic products based on materials extracted from the Dead Sea, such as salt, mud, and potash. 
Ziva Gilad, a spa technician, came up with the idea of marketing Dead Sea mud after watching women tourists scooping up the mud to take home. In 1988, a single stand selling bottles of Ahava body scrub to tourists earned $1 million. The Dead Sea Works is the world's fourth largest producer and supplier of potash products. The company also produces magnesium chloride, industrial salts, de-icers, bath salts, table salt, and raw materials for the cosmetic industry. 
A 2007 study was published that tested the effectiveness of Dead Sea mouthwash and moisturizing cream on cancer patients who were experiencing dermatitis and mucositis while receiving a mixture of chemotherapy and radiotherapy. The study showed that the patients receiving the Dead Sea products saw an improvement in their condition, although further randomized studies were warranted. 
Rhinosinusitis patients receiving Dead Sea saline nasal irrigation exhibited significantly better symptom relief compared to standard hypertonic saline spray. 
Dead Sea mud pack therapy is believed to temporarily relieve pain in patients with osteoarthritis of the knees. According to researchers of the Ben Gurion University of the Negev, treatment with mineral-rich mud compresses can be used to augment conventional medical therapy. 
While some dermatologists claim that the minerals found in Dead Sea products can be helpful for ailments such as skin rashes, others have expressed skepticism due to a lack of long term scientific research backing up the claims. 
Some consumers and human rights groups have endorsed boycotts of Dead Sea products and other materials made in or along the West Bank of the Dead Sea,  citing concerns such as blatant violation of human rights in Israel or of certain companies being "economically linked to Israel's illegal occupation of the Palestinian territories." 
In mathematics, the packing dimension is one of a number of concepts that can be used to define the dimension of a subset of a metric space.  Packing dimension is in some sense dual to Hausdorff dimension, since packing dimension is constructed by "packing" small open balls inside the given subset, whereas Hausdorff dimension is constructed by covering the given subset by such small open balls. The packing dimension was introduced by C. Tricot Jr. in 1982. 
Unfortunately, this is just a pre-measure and not a true measure on subsets of X, as can be seen by considering dense, countable subsets.  However, the pre-measure leads to a bona fide measure: the s-dimensional packing measure of S is defined to be 
Having done this, the packing dimension dimP(S) of S is defined analogously to the Hausdorff dimension: 
It is possible to show that the Hausdorff and the packing dimensions of the set     K   {\displaystyle K}   are given respectively by: 
The function h is said to be an exact (packing) dimension function for S if Ph(S) is both finite and strictly positive. 
Note, however, that the packing dimension is not equal to the box dimension.  For example, the set of rationals Q has box dimension one and packing dimension zero. 
The Alabama Warrior Railway (reporting mark ABWR) is a terminal railroad in Birmingham, Alabama. The railroad operates within the confines of Walter Industries in North Birmingham. It began operations on August 7, 2009, and is owned and operated by Watco. 
This United States railway company-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1607 the mansion was bought by Elizabeth's successor James I. His wife Anne of Denmark stayed in August 1608. 
In February 1647, after the First English Civil War, Charles I was brought to Holdenby by the Scots and handed over to the English Long Parliament. He remained a prisoner there until June 1647 when Cornet George Joyce seized him and took him to Newmarket in the name of the New Model Army. Parliament later sold the estate to Captain Adam Baynes, who demolished the house almost entirely except for a small domestic wing. 
A door salvaged from the demolition of Holdenby palace is believed to be inside Morningside Cottage, a grade II listed building in the nearby village of Creaton. 
The estate is a private residence which is available as a corporate and wedding venue and is opened to the public on a limited and paid basis. Other activities include a falconry centre. 
On 20 May 2016 (two weeks before Tenrec v. USCIS), the American Immigration Lawyers Association, with help from the American Immigration Council, filed a Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) lawsuit against USCIS, seeking more transparency into the H-1B lottery process. USCIS responded on 1 August 2016, with three affirmative defenses. 
On 2 June 2016, a lawsuit was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Oregon against the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS), challenging the H-1B lottery process. The plaintiffs were two pairs of petitioner (prospective employer) and beneficiary (prospective employee), where the beneficiary had not been selected in the H-1B lottery process: 
The plaintiffs were represented by the law firm Parrilli Renison, with attorney Brent Renison the point of contact. 
On 29 June, the complaint was amended to add claim for failure under the Administrative Procedure Act. On 7 July, a class certification was filed, seeking to represent all employers and employees hurt by the H-1B lottery. A motion for summary judgment was also filed, asking the court to rule in favor of the plaintiffs and have an orderly lottery. 
On 8 August 2016, USCIS filed a motion to dismiss the lawsuit. On 22 September 2016, Michael Simon, a judge at the United States District Court for the District of Oregon, denied the USCIS motion to dismiss the lawsuit. 
Between October 2016 and March 2017, there were several iterations of amended complaints, motions to dismiss, and answers. During this time, one of the original plaintiffs, Tenrec, Inc. and employee Sergii Sinienok, withdrew from the lawsuit, so that Walker Mary LLC and Xiaoyang Zhu were now the lead plaintiffs. 
On 17 March 2017, judge Michael Simon made the Oregon District Court's final decision against the plaintiffs, so that the fiscal year 2018 lottery (that would be held in April 2017) could proceed as planned. The plaintiffs timely appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit on 4 April, but on 23 June, the case was dismissed after the plaintiffs withdrew as the lead plaintiffs won the lottery in fiscal year 2018 and no other willing lead plaintiff was found. 
This biographical article related to a Sri Lankan cricket person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Totally Spies! 2: Undercover is a 2006 video game developed by Canadian studio Mistic Software based on the French anime-influenced animated television series Totally Spies!. This game was published by Atari, and was released for the Game Boy Advance and the Nintendo DS. 
Totally Spies! 2: Undercover is broken up into five episodic missions. Each one has the three girls, Clover, Alex and Sam, hunting down and capturing one of their main enemies. Along the way, Jerry will give the player various tools and he will run into friends like Arnold. 
Totally Spies! 2: Undercover received mixed reviews from critics. On GameRankings, the game holds a 60% rating for the Nintendo DS version and a 40% rating for the Game Boy Advance version respectively. 
IGN rated the game an 4 of 10 saying The Totally Spies license is one that could be adapted into a fun and focused video game experience. It's got the potential to be interpreted into an action design, or a fresh take on the stealth genre. But it definitely doesn't work as a tossed-together mash-up of mini-games. 
Game Vortex rated the game an 8 of 10 saying Overall, Totally Spies! 2: Undercover feels more like a series of mini-games with a story tying them all together, especially when you see how different the controls are from chapter to chapter . 
The Tralee-Fenit Greenway is a partially completed greenway and rail trail, in Ireland, which will form part of EuroVelo EV1 and the Great Southern Trail, the 14km route was planned to be completed by 2021. 
As the Tralee - Fenit  and Tralee - Limerick railways shared the same rail-bed out of Tralee, the first 3km of the Tralee Fenit Greenway also forms part of the Great Southern Trail and EuroVelo EV1. 
The Council of Catholic Patriarchs of the Orient (French: Conseil des Patriarches Catholiques d'Orient, CCPO) is an agency of the Catholic Church that meets the patriarchs of Eastern Catholic Churches and the Latin Patriarch of Jerusalem. Permanent seat of the organisation is the Maronite Catholic Patriarchate of Antioch in Bkerke, Lebanon. 
The nature of the Conference has to be a sign and instrument of patriarchal collegiality and communion between the Eastern Catholic Churches and the universal Church. It aims to: 
19-24 September 1994: Fourth Annual Conference at the Melkite patriarchal residence in Raboueh, Lebanon 
4-11 September 1995: Fifth Annual Conference on Armenian Catholic Patriarchate in Bzoummar near Beirut 
13-18 October 1996: Sixth Annual Conference at the patriarchal residence in Syriac Convent of Our Lady of Deliverance in Sharfeh, Lebanon 
23-27 September 2001: Eleventh Annual Conference at the patriarchal residence in Syriac Convent of Our Lady of Deliverance in Sharfeh, Lebanon 
16-20 October 2006: XVI Annual Conference at the Armenian Catholic Patriarchate in Bzoummar, Lebanon 
15-19 October 2007: XVII Annual Conference at the summer Melkite patriarchal residence in Ain Traz, near Beirut 
25-29 November 2019: Cairo, Egypt, where they met the President of Egypt Abdel Fattah el-Sisi and Coptic Orthodox Pope Tawadros II of Alexandria. 
Huseynov was born in Baku, Azerbaijan. He graduated from the Azerbaijan State University of Culture and Arts in 1982. He started his career in Shaki State Drama Theater. Since 1988 he is an actor of Baku Puppet Theatre. Since 2006 he was a head director of this theater. In 2007 he was awarded with Order of the Smile. 
"Magdalen Sky" is a song written by Mark Gardener and Kaye Denham.  The song was released as Gardener's debut solo single in June 1997 by Shifty Disco Records, following the 1996 break-up of Gardener's previous band Ride.  The single was part of Shifty Disco's "Single of the Month" club and had a limited run of 1,000 copies only.  The single features the rare B-side "Can't Let It Die", which was also written by Gardener and Denham. 
As well as appearing on the Shifty Disco Records' year-end singles compilation It's A Shifty Disco Thing Vol. 1, "Magdalen Sky" was also included on Gardener's debut solo album, These Beautiful Ghosts. 
The projects involving the cooperation of iRobot and NASA allowed the creation of high-tech machines. The much needed physical structure of the robots was designed by iRobot while the instruments and science equipment onboard was provided by NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory. 
PackBot 510 is the current base model. It uses a videogame-style hand controller to make it more familiar to young operators.  
Turzino is located 29 km north of Lipin Bor (the district's administrative centre) by road. Andreyevskaya is the nearest rural locality. 
This article about a Newfoundland and Labrador politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The National House is a hotel located at 102 South Parkview in Marshall, Michigan. It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1978. It is thought to be the first brick building constructed in Calhoun County. As of 2019, the building operated as a bed and breakfast. 
"Mongolarachne" chaoyangensis is a dubious species of crayfish discovered in the Dawangzhangzi Beds of the Yixian Formation in China, known from a single, poorly preserved specimen, that may be one of, if not, the oldest known fossil crayfish to date. If it were to be properly described as a new species, the genus name would have to be changed since it is preoccupied by an extinct spider. 
According to Selden et al. (2019), "M". chaoyangensis is probably the same as Cricoidoscelosus, which is also found in the Yixian Formation, although there is the possibility that "M". chaoyangensis belonged to an entirely new genus. 
It was initially thought to have been a spider until it was determined to have been a hoax. The factors that gave the hoax away is that there were too many segments at the base of the legs, the sternum was absent and the eyes were too large to be those of a spider, but they were large enough to have come from a crayfish. 
Selden et al. (2019) did not classify "M." chaoyangensis within Astacoidea, so for now it is left as a basal crayfish, likely due to the age of the specimen and the unpreparedness of the specimen at the time of publication, although if Selden et al. (2019) is correct, then "Mongolarachne" chaoyangensis is the same animal as the contemporaneous Cricoidoscelosus aethus. 
Tonga and the Soviet Union established formal diplomatic relations in 1976. Tonga was the first Pacific Island country to establish relations with the USSR. 
In 1987, Tonga "played the Soviet card" again (in the words of E. Huffer), when the then crown prince Sia'osi Taufa'ahau Manumata'ogo Tuku'aho Tupou paid a State visit to the Soviet Union, and declared while in Moscow that "Tonga and the Soviet Union are linked, not separated, by the Pacific Ocean", adding that "the USSR [is] a Pacific nation with legitimate interests in the region". 
This geographical article about a location in Bilecik Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dudi Sela was the defending champion, but chose to compete at the 2014 Delray Beach International Tennis Championships. 
Niphona gracilior is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1952. 
Tarence Anthony Kinsey (born March 21, 1984) is an American professional basketball player for Orlandina Basket of the Serie A2 Basket. He played college basketball for University of South Carolina. 
Kinsey attended and played collegiately at the University of South Carolina where he helped lead the Gamecocks to two straight NIT championships; averaging 19.4 points, 4.2 rebounds, 3.2 assists, 2.6 steals and shooting 53% from the field in the NIT Tournament. 
On July 22, 2015, Kinsey signed a one-year deal with the Turkish club Trabzonspor. On December 27, 2015, he parted ways with Trabzonspor after appearing in eleven league games and ten EuroCup games. 
On July 23, 2016, Kinsey signed a two-year deal with Israeli club Hapoel Jerusalem. In his first season with Jerusalem, Kinsey helped the team to win the 2016 Israeli League Cup and 2017 Israeli League Championship, as well as reaching the 2017 EuroCup Semifinals. 
The Changing of Times is the third album by American metalcore band Underoath. The album was released on February 26, 2002, through Solid State Records. It is the first album to include guitarist Timothy McTague and bassist William Nottke, the latter leaving the band afterwards along with vocalist Dallas Taylor and guitarist Octavio Fernandez. The album is the best-selling Solid State debut. 
This article is about a historic property or district  in Barnstable County, Massachusetts, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Hero of Venice (Italian: Il bravo di Venezia) is a 1941 Italian historical adventure film directed by Carlo Campogalliani and starring Gustav Diessl, Paola Barbara, Rossano Brazzi and Valentina Cortese. 
It was shot at the Scalera Studios in Rome. The film's sets were designed by the art directors Gustav Abel and Amleto Bonetti. 
Marco Fuser, an outlaw. returns to Venice after many years. His son who works in the studio of a celebrated painter is unaware of his father's history. Arrested by the Doge's men, Marco agrees to become a bravo in the service of the city's ruler and kill his enemies. He enjoys some success at this, until he finds he has been tasked with killing his son. 
This article related to an Italian film of the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dinesh Manjula de Silva (born 6 September 1984) is a Sri Lankan former cricketer. He played in 49 first-class and 38 List A matches between 2004/05 and 2012/13. He made his Twenty20 debut on 17 August 2004, for Sri Lanka Air Force Sports Club in the 2004 SLC Twenty20 Tournament. 
This biographical article related to a Sri Lankan cricket person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Supercub was a male lion that was adopted as a cub from the Nairobi National Park Orphanage near Nairobi, Kenya. In 1972, Supercub was a pride member with Christian the lion and other lions being cared for by conservationist George Adamson in the Kora National Reserve in Kenya. The lion, whose personality was described as "boisterous" and "extroverted", was dubbed Supercub by Adamson. 
Supercub is briefly seen in the uncut ending of the 1972 documentary film The Lion at World's End. At the time of the scene Supercub was five months old. 
In 1972, Supercub was killed by a wild lion known as "The Killer". The cub is buried in the Kora National Reserve beside  the graves of George Adamson, Terrance Adamson and two lions released after George's death named Mugi and Boy. 
The Pegram Plantation House, perhaps also known as Peagram Plantation House, is located in Lecompte, Louisiana, and was built around 1850.  It was added to the National Register of Historic Places on October 24, 2003. 
This article about a property in Louisiana on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in 1889 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Massachusetts House of Representatives' 4th Essex district in the United States is one of 160 legislative districts included in the lower house of the Massachusetts General Court. It covers part of Essex County. Republican Brad Hill of Ipswich has represented the district since 1999. 
The current district geographic boundary overlaps with those of the Massachusetts Senate's 1st Essex and Middlesex and 2nd Essex districts. 
Sangrampur railway station is a Kolkata Suburban Railway Station on the Diamond Harbour Branch line. It is under the jurisdiction of the Sealdah railway division in the Eastern Railway zone of the Indian Railways. Sangrampur railway station is situated beside Mandirbazar Road at Sangrampur, South 24 Parganas district in the Indian state of West Bengal. 
The platform is very much well sheltered. The station possesses many facilities including water and sanitation. There is a proper approach road to this station. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1954, the team participated in the Liga II promotion playoffs but missed on the promotion, in spite of the fact that, at that time, Gloria had on its team future Romania national team players, the Munteanu brothers. 
After 2007, Gloria changed its objective, from European competitions to avoiding relegation. In 2011, Gloria was relegated in Liga II after failing to achieve a license for the next season. 
On 3 August 2015, the club was relegated to Liga V, due to many financial problems, and went bankrupt. 
It is better known due to being the seat of power of the Indian Nehru-Gandhi political dynasty since 1980. The former prime minister Jawaharlal Nehru, his grandsons Sanjay and Rajiv Gandhi (the sons of Indira Gandhi), Rajiv Gandhi's widow Sonia Gandhi and son Rahul Gandhi, have at one time or the other, represented its constituency. However, this changed in 2019 when Rahul Gandhi was defeated in the Lok Sabha elections by Smriti Irani, a former TV actress.[citation needed] 
Amethi was the 72nd district of Uttar Pradesh which came into existence on 1 July 2010 by merging three tehsils of the erstwhile Sultanpur district namely Amethi, Gauriganj and Musafirkhana and two tehsils of the erstwhile Raebareli district, namely, Salon and Tiloi and was named as Chhatrapati Shahuji Maharaj Nagar.[citation needed] However, its name was changed back to Amethi when the ruling party changed.[citation needed] 
However the name of the district was changed to Amethi after Samajwadi Party came into power in the 2012 state legislative assembly election. 
In Lucknow on 7 October 2013,the State Cabinet revoked the earlier notification regarding renaming of Amethi as Chhatrapati Shahu Ji Maharaj Nagar. Now the Amethi will be known as its previous name, told Chief Secretary Mr. Akhand Pratap Singh in a media. Amethi contains a hospital (Sanjay Gandhi Hospital) at Munshiganj. The NGO, Society for Animal Health Agriculture Science and Humanity is located at Munshiganj. 
In the 2011 Indian census used the old district definitions, and so did not list Amethi district.  The sub-districts (tehsils) that form Amethi district had the following populations: 
In 2013 it was proposed that Salon sub-district be moved from Amethi district back to Rae Bareli district in Lucknow division. 
Amethi is connected to the major cities in Uttar Pradesh and North-Eastern India via Indian Railways and roads. It has direct trains connecting with major cities like Delhi, Lucknow, Kanpur, Dehradun, Haridwar, Allahabad, Varanasi, Kolkata, Puri, Bhopal, Mumbai and Bangalore. The closest airport is Allahabad Airport which is 95 kilometers (59 miles) from Amethi. 
Amethi district contains 1,431 government primary schools, 433 government upper primary schools, 33 government-aided primary schools, 42 madrasas and 15 intermediate schools, including one government inter-college. 
The district comprises 4 tehsils, 13 development blocks, 14 police stations and 401 lekhpal areas. These tehsils are: Gauriganj, Amethi, Musafirkhana and Tiloi. Amethi is the largest city in this district. 
The district comprises four Vidhan Sabha constituencies, namely, Gauriganj, Jagdishpur, Amethi and Tiloi. All of these are part of Amethi Lok Sabha constituency. It is surrounded by the constituency districts of Faizabad, Sultanpur and Barabanki. 
John Shaw Thomson was  a rugby union international who represented Scotland in the first international rugby match in 1871. 
J S (John) Thomson became a pupil at the Glasgow Academy and is recorded as having played for Glasgow Academicals in 1871 and 1872. At that time the club did not have open membership and had only been formed three years previous as a club for old pupils of Glasgow Academy. Some records suggest he also played for St Andrews University and therefore may have attended that university also. 
In 1872 J S Thomson was also part of another historic first rugby encounter when he was selected as part of the representative side of Glasgow District, to face a representative side from Edinburgh District. This was the inaugural inter-city match between Glasgow and Edinburgh, that today is known as the 1872 Cup and has the distinction of being the oldest inter-city rugby competition in the world. 
Arnstein was born Julius Arndstein in Berlin, German Empire. His father, Moses Arndstein, was a German Jew from Berlin who fought in the Franco-Prussian War. His mother, born Thekla van Shaw, was Dutch. The couple raised their children in the Episcopal Church.  First settling in New Jersey, the couple had two other children besides middle-child Nicky; son Louis (born 1877), and daughter Gesina (born 1883). 
In 1915, Arnstein was convicted of swindling, and the following year he entered Sing Sing to serve out his term. Fanny Brice visited him every week while he was there, and in 1918 Arnstein's wife Carrie sued her for alienation of his affection. She subsequently divorced him, leaving him free to marry Brice in October of that year. 
Arnstein and Brice had two children, daughter Frances Arnstein Stark (1919-1992) and son William Arnstein (1921-2008) a graphic artist later known professionally as William Brice. 
On May 16, 1924, having been convicted of conspiracy to carry stolen securities into the District of Columbia, Arnstein entered Leavenworth prison, where he remained for three years. Brice divorced him on September 17, 1927, soon after his release. 
In December 1889, he also succeeded his father in the viscountcy.  This was an Irish peerage and did not entitle him to an automatic seat in the House of Lords.  However, in 1900 he was elected an Irish Representative Peer, replacing the deceased Lord Inchiquin, and was able to take his seat in the upper chamber of parliament.  In 1898, he had been made a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath. 
On  25 April 1866, he married Rachel Mary Lumley Godolphin Michel, daughter of Field Marshal Sir John Michel, at Montreal, Canada.  Their eldest son, the Honourable Raymond de Montmorency was killed in action at the Battle of Stormberg in 1900.  Lord Frankfort de Montmorency died in May 1902, aged 66, and was succeeded in the title by his second son, Willoughby. 
His sons, Kalyan and Gopal are also notable artists of this art form. Kalyan Joshi's phad paintings are now adorning prime minister Narendra Modi's office walls.  
A long association with Komal Kothari, Kapila Vatsyayan and Jyotindra Jain inspired Joshi to experiment and innovate. He earned many international and national awards. He received the Padma Shri award in 2006 and the Shilpaguru award (2007). The Government of India issued a Rs. 5/- postal stamp on his famous creation- Phad of Shri Devnarayan. 
The lowlands between present-day Bolshaya Yakimanka Street and Moskva River were regularly flooded in spring; they were occupied by sloboda settlements of Streltsy, Poles and ordinary farmers. 
After the Russian Revolution, numerous icons and relics from the churches destroyed by the Communists were stored in the Church of St. John. The church itself operated continuously through the entire Soviet period. 
11 teams competed, four teams from the original tournament competed (excluding Tanganyika, which changed names and is currently called Tanzania). 
If two or more teams are equal on points on completion of the group matches, the following criteria are applied to determine the rankings (in descending order): 
Teams are ranked using the same tie-breaking criteria as in the group stage, except for the top four teams. 
Stevie Shears (born 1954/1955) is an English musician known for playing in the rock bands Tiger Lily and Ultravox! (later Ultravox), as well as being part of the bands Faith Global and Cowboys International. 
Working in a paint factory and playing in different bands in Dagenham, Essex, he made contact with John Foxx and formed Tiger Lily in 1973 (together with bassist Chris Cross). Later, Tiger Lily changed its name to Ultravox! (later known simply as Ultravox). Between February and March 1978, after releasing with this band the Ultravox! (early 1977) and Ha! Ha! Ha! (1977) albums Shears was replaced by Robin Simon. 
Shears never having lost contact with Guy, collaborated under the name of Faith Global, and released an EP called Earth Report (1982) and an album called The Same Mistakes (1983) both on Survival Records. Faith Global was short-lived, and these two records remain their only recordings. 
USS Augusta Dinsmore was a steamer acquired by the Union Navy during the American Civil War. She was used by the Union Navy as a gunboat in support of the Union naval blockade of Confederate waterways. Because of her relatively large size, she was also sometimes used as a cargo ship. 
Following the Confederate collapse, she departed Pensacola, Florida, on 5 August and sailed north. She was decommissioned at New York on 28 August 1865 and sold at public auction there on 5 September 1865. Re-documented as Gulf City on 16 September 1865, the steamer remained in merchant service until she ran aground off Cape Lookout, North Carolina, on 11 January 1869. The wreck cost the lives of 23 persons. 
This biographical article relating to a Serbian water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Baz was extremely prolific. In addition to his work for Esquire, he provided story illustrations for mainstream magazines, worked on a number of national advertising campaigns, and was a successful paperback novel cover artist. 
This article about a painter from the United States born in the 1900s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sri Krishnanjaneya Yuddham (transl. War between Krishna and Hanuman) is a 1972 Indian Telugu-language Hindu mythological film, produced by D. N. Raju under the Poornima Pictures banner and directed by C. S. Rao. It stars N. T. Rama Rao, Rajanala, Devika,  Vanisri, and S.V. Ranga Rao  and music composed by T. V. Raju. 
 Archie Weller (born 13 July 1957) is an Australian writer of novels, short stories and screen plays. 
Archie Weller was born in Subiaco, Western Australia, and grew up on a farm, Wonnenup, near Cranbrook in the Great Southern region of the state. He attended Guildford Grammar School in Perth as a boarder. His mother was a journalist and his father was a farmer.  As a young child Weller was encouraged by his grandfather to write. 
The script Confessions of a Headhunter, which Weller co-wrote with Sally Riley, won an award in the 2001 Western Australian Premier's Book Awards, the Cinema Nova Award and the 2000 Australian Film Institute Awards for Best Short Fiction Film, and the 2001 Film Critics Circle of Australia award for Best Short Film. 
David Gray Mulready (born 13 September 1947) is an Australian Anglican bishop and the immediate past incumbent of the diocesan see of North West Australia, the largest diocese in geographical size in the Anglican Church of Australia, covering approximately a quarter of the Australian continent. 
Mulready married Maureen Jane Lawrie in 1972 and is the father of two adult sons and a daughter. He also has 5 grandchildren 
The draw ceremony took place on 7 October 2017 at the Hotel Marigold, Begumpet, Hyderabad (India) at 14:00 (UTC+05:30). 
The ceremony was attended by the Asian Handball Federation's Executive Director Dr. Ahmed Abu Al-Lail, AHF Technical Manager Mr. Jasem M. Al-Theyab, Secretary General of Handball Federation of India Mr. Anandeshwar Pandey and the representatives of the participating clubs. The draw results are as follows: 
Malacosoma incurva, the southwestern tent caterpillar moth, is a species of moth of the family Lasiocampidae. It was first described by Henry Edwards in 1882. It is found in south-western North America, including Arizona, New Mexico, Nevada and Utah. 
This article on a moth of the family Lasiocampidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nicholas John Childs (born 7 October 1961) is a Welsh musician, conductor, composer and brass educator. 
Childs is known for his conducting of brass bands, winning numerous championships, his teaching at the university level, and his recordings of brass music. He is also the founder of two brass bands for children. 
Childs was born on 7 October 1961 in Wales. He playing baritone horn at a young age with guidance from his father John. Childs first performed with the Tredegar Junior Band and later the National Youth Brass Band of Great Britain. 
At age 16, Childs became the Welsh and British Euphonium Champion. In 1985, he was voted Euphonium Player of The Year.[by whom?] 
Childs and his brother Bob toured internationally as the Childs Brothers. They debuted in Royal Albert Hall in 1984, His playing career included being Principal Euphonium at Grimethorpe Colliery Band and later the Foden's Band.  Later performance appointments included euphonium tutor at the Royal Northern College of Music, Salford University and Huddersfield University. 
Currently, Childs is the conductor and music director for the award-winning, Black Dyke Band. Under his baton, the band has won three European Championships. 
Childs is married to Alison Childs, an administrator and brass instrumentalist. Their daughter Rebecca is also a baritone instrumentalist. 
To date Childs has conducted one hundred and sixty commercial CD recordings.[citation needed]  His works have received "CD of The Year" on multiple occasions by the British Bandsman, Brass Band World magazine and 4barsrest. 
Childs was the Founder of the Yorkshire Youth Brass Band. The YYBB is administered by Alison Childs. 
The National Children's Brass Band was the concept of Nicholas Childs, who is the music director since 2006. The band is for brass players from age 8 to 14. 
Basketligaen Norge, better known as BLNO is Norway's premier professional men's basketball league. It was established in 2000. The competition is organised by the Norwegian Basketball Federation (NBBF). 
This article about a location in the Valencian Community, Spain, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Canadian ice hockey winger born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1999 Davis Cup World Group Qualifying Round was held from 24 to 26 September. They were the main play-offs of the 1999 Davis Cup. The winners of the playoffs advanced to the 2000 Davis Cup World Group, and the losers were relegated to their respective Zonal Regions I. 
The eight losing teams in the World Group first round ties and eight winners of the Zonal Group I final round ties competed in the World Group Qualifying Round for spots in the 2000 World Group. 
Moncloa is a multimodal station in Madrid, Spain that serves Madrid Metro Line 3 and Line 6, as well as city buses and intercity and long-distance coaches. It is located underneath Moncloa square and Princesa street near Arco de la Victoria and the headquarters of the Spanish Air Force in fare Zone A. 
The Line 6 platforms were inaugurated on 10 May 1995 when the segment between Laguna and Ciudad Universitaria was opened, converting Line 6 into a circular route. The Line 6 platforms are deeper than the Line 3 platforms, and a new corridor was built to connect them, as well as a new entrance on Princesa street in front of the Junta Municipal de Distrito (district city offices). 
In the space left behind by the old Line 3 platforms, an expansion of the underground bus terminal was built, including an entrance in front of the Junta Municipal de Distrito. The new bus terminal opened on 19 February 2008, and seven bus lines were moved to the station. In February and March of that year, additional lines were moved into the new station. In 2008 and 2009, the bus lines in the old terminal were reorganized to make better use of space. 
On 12 January 2009, a 7000 series train on Line 6 derailed in the station, and from that point on AnsaldoBreda series trains were permanently banned from Line 6. 
Between 28 June and 28 August 2014, the segment of Line 6 between Moncloa and Vicente Aleixandre (then known as Metropolitano) was closed for renovations, making Moncloa a temporary terminal station on Line 6. 
The men's 50 kilometres race walk at the 1954 European Athletics Championships was held in Bern, Switzerland, on 27 August 1954. 
Modern Country is an album by jazz trombonist and arranger Kai Winding featuring jazz adaptations of country music songs recorded with members of The Nashville A-Team in 1964 for the Verve label. 
Cretalamna is a genus of extinct otodontid shark that lived from the Late Cretaceous to Eocene epoch (about 103 to 46 million years ago). It is considered by many to be the ancestor of the largest sharks to have ever lived, Otodus angustidens, and Otodus megalodon. 
Given the size of Cretalamna teeth relative to its body size, it is likely that its caudal fin was not used for stunning prey (as is the case for thresher sharks). Instead, the caudal fin of Cretalamna was more similar to that of the great white shark. 
Cretalamna teeth are distinguished by a broad triangular cusp and two lateral cusplets. The cutting edges of the teeth are razor-like, while the sides have a smooth surface. Teeth symmetry is variable; some have exact bilateral symmetry whereas others have high asymmetry. Adjacent teeth do not overlap. 
In C. hattini, the upper and lower jaws are similar to that of Cretoxyrhina mantelli. The jaws also resemble those of modern alopiids (thresher sharks) and lamnids. Limited fossil evidence suggests that the upper jaws extended over the lower jaws, giving Cretalamna a subterminal mouth. 
Fossil evidence of Cretalamna is found in deposits representing a diverse set of marine environments, indicating that it was able to adapt to a wide range of habitats. This may have attributed to its ability to exist through a long temporal range. The fusiform body of Cretalamna suggests it was a pelagic shark. 
The Cretaceous waters inhabited by Cretalamna were also home to a diverse range of cartilaginous fishes, bony fishes, turtles, squamates, plesiosaurs, pterosaurs, birds, and even some non-avian dinosaurs. 
A possible factor to the extinction of Cretalamna is increased competition with newer generalist sharks during the Cenozoic. It is widely believed that Otodus (and thus Carcharocles) is derived from Cretalamna due to its strong similarity to certain species within the genus. 
Hermanna (Manon) Fokke (born 16 January 1976 in Vriezenveen) is a Dutch politician. As a member of the Labour Party (Partij van de Arbeid) was an MP between 20 September 2012 and 23 March 2017. Previously she was a member of the municipal council of Maastricht from 2006 to 2012. 
Fokke went on maternity leave in September 2015 and was temporarily replaced by first Joyce Vermue and later Harm Brouwer. She returned in the House on 12 January 2016. 
This article about a Dutch Labour Party politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Heinkel He P.1079 was a projected German V-tail all weather jet fighter designed by Heinkel Flugzeugwerke in the closing stages of World War II . The aircraft was only a design; it was not produced. 
Initial design with 35 degree swept wings and a V-tail. Intended to be powered by Heinkel HeS 011 turbojets. 
Second design had a vertical tail and gull wings. This was the single-seat, all weather, heavy fighter with the same intended engines as the P.1079A. 
Last design of the He P.1079 and the tailless version; the wings were swept back sharply. This design could accommodate six fuel tanks in the wings. No evidence was found the design was submitted to the RLM. 
Smithia is a genus of flowering plants in the legume family, Fabaceae. It belongs to the subfamily Faboideae, and was recently assigned to the informal monophyletic Dalbergia clade of the Dalbergieae. 
In the 2009 local elections Caldas was elected to the legislative assembly of Alagoas. In the following year in the 2010 Brazilian general election Caldas was elected to the federal senate. 
Caldas voted in favor of the impeachment motion of then-president Dilma Rousseff. Caldas voted against the 2017 Brazilian labor reform, and would vote in favor of opening a corruption investigation into Rousseff's successor Michel Temer. 
This biographical article relating to Polish football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Boyarsky was born in Moscow on November 7, 1917 to Yacov Boyarsky and Anna Arluck. He graduated from the Economy Faculty of Gerasimov Institute of Cinematography, which is abbreviated as VGIK. 
He first began working at Soyuzmultfilm in 1960. He worked as a director at the studio. He then became the director general of the Model Animation Association. Boyarsky later served as Soyuzmultfilm's Dean of Animation Faculty of the Higher Courses for Scriptwriters and Film Directors from 1979 until 2000. Under Boyarsky's guidance and direction, some of the Soviet Union's most well known animated works, such as 38 Parrots and Cheburashka, were created at Soyuzmultfilm. 
Russian animation film director Yuri Norstein spoke of Boyarsky's work at Soyuzmultfilm in an interview, "The flourishing of model animation in Soyuzmultfilm was undoubtedly related to the name of Iosif Yakovlevich. Boyarsky was an extremely jolly and optimistic person, and a very well educated one. He was not a Communist Party member, and thus, was not engaged in all those things. It was thanks to him that most bold and fresh ideas could be implemented in the model animation studio." 
Mackall holds a number of patents relating to peptides and antigen receptors. She has served on the editorial boards of several cancer journals, including Cancer Today. 
She identifies as LGBT and is married to Catherine L. Salem MD.  The two have two sons, Theo Salem-Mackall and Zachary Salem-Mackall. 
This biographical article relating to Latvian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a college football coach first appointed in the 1890s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This page is a list of all the matches that Portugal national football team has played between 2020 and 2039. 
Key: GS, Group stage; Euro 2020, UEFA Euro 2020; UEFA NL, UEFA Nations League; FWC Q, FIFA World Cup qualification. 
Bengtssenbukta is a bay at the northern side of Nordaustlandet, Svalbard. It is a western branch of Rijpfjorden. The glacier Rijpbreen debouches into the bay. The bay is named after trapper Karl J. Bengtssen. 
Fraser Island, and some satellite islands off the southern west coast and thus in the Great Sandy Strait, form the County of Fraser, which is subdivided into six parishes. Among the islands are Slain Island, Tooth Island, Roundbush Island, Moonboom Island, Gardner Island, Dream Island, Stewart Island, and the Reef Islands, all part of the southernmost parish of Talboor.[citation needed] 
Fraser Island has been inhabited by humans for as long as 5,000 years. Explorer James Cook sailed by the island in May 1770. Matthew Flinders landed near the most northern point of the island in 1802. For a short period the island was known as Great Sandy Island. The island became known as Fraser Island due to the stories of a shipwreck survivor named Eliza Fraser. 
In 1992 it became a UNESCO World Heritage Site, under the name "Fraser Island"; this name was altered to the traditional Aboriginal name of K'gari in 2021. In 2009, as part of the Q150 celebrations, Fraser Island was announced as one of the Q150 Icons of Queensland for its role as a "Natural attraction". 
After European colonisation it was called Great Sandy Island, then Fraser Island due to the stories disseminated by Eliza Fraser about her 1836 shipwreck on the island. 
In 2011 the Indigenous names of K'gari and Gari were entered as an alternative names for the island in the Queensland Place Names register. 
In 2017 the island portion of Great Sandy National Park was renamed to K'gari (Fraser Island) National Park, in recognition of Butchulla people who had been campaigning for the island to regain the name officially. 
The island was part of the traditional lands of the Butchulla (Badjala) people before European settlement. 
Butchulla (also known as Batjala, Badtjala, Badjela and Badjala) is the language of the Fraser Coast region, including Fraser Island. Butchulla language region includes the landscape within the local government boundaries of the Fraser Coast Regional Council, particularly the towns of Maryborough and Hervey Bay extending south towards Noosa. 
In October 2014, Native title rights were granted to the Butchulla people by the Federal Court. This essentially enables Butchulla people to hunt, fish and take water for domestic purposes; and opens the island up to economic opportunities for current and future generations of Butchulla people through ecotourism and related business development. 
Despite this, British commissioners stationed in Maryborough reported non-Indigenous occupants felt threatened by Butchulla people. In 1857, a Native Police barracks under the command of Lieutenant John O'Connell Bligh was established at Coopers Plains, now Owanyilla, not far from Maryborough. The close proximity of this force eliminated most Butchulla resistance by 1860 with Bligh conducting further bloody forays into Fraser Island, Cooloola and in the town of Maryborough itself. 
During World War II the wreck served as target bombing practice for the RAAF and was used as an explosives demolition target by special forces from the Fraser Commando School. The remains of the ship are now severely rusted, with almost three and a half storeys buried under the sand. Because of the danger it poses, climbing on the wreck is not permitted. 
Visitors to the site of the Fraser Commando School today can still see various relics of its military past including armour plates used to test armour piercing explosive charges and weapons and a concrete relief map of Singapore Harbour used as an aid in operations planning. 
On 14 October 2020, a large bushfire was started on the island by an illegal campfire. It impacted multiple communities and caused residents to flee their homes as it burned out of control. 
The island reopened to tourists on 15 December. The fire was still burning, but the island was declared safe for visitors, though some walking trails and burner areas were still restricted for safety. It is expected that the burned areas will successfully regenerate. 
The island is divided into two localities: the eponymous Fraser Island locality consisting of most of the land on the island and the locality of Eurong on the east coast of the island. 
The coloured sands found at Rainbow Gorge, The Cathedrals, The Pinnacles and Red Canyon are examples of the sand being stained over thousands of years due to it conglomerating with clay. Hematite, the mineral pigment responsible for the staining, acts like cement. That allows the steeper cliffs of coloured sand to form. Coffee rock, so-called because when it is dissolved in water it turns the colour of coffee, is found in outcrops along the beaches on both sides of the island. 
Some of the lakes on Fraser Island are window lakes, which form when the water table has risen to a point higher than the surrounding land. Most of the valleys on the island have creeks which are fed by springs. Motor boats and jet skis are banned from the lakes on the island. 
Estimates of the number of mammal species present on Fraser Island range from 25 to 50. Mammals include swamp wallabies, echidnas, ringtail and brushtail possums, sugar gliders, squirrel gliders, phascogales, bandicoots, potoroos, flying foxes and dingoes. The swamp wallaby finds protection from dingos in the swampy areas which have dense undergrowth. There are 19 species of bats which live on or visit the island. 
Until 2003, when they were removed by the Environmental Protection Agency, there were a few brumbies (horses) on the island, descendants of Arab stock turned loose for breeding purposes, and joined in 1879 by horses brought over for the logging industry. 
Dingoes were once common on Fraser Island, but are now decreasing. The island dingoes are reputedly some of the last remaining 'pure' dingoes in Eastern Australia and to prevent cross-breeding, dogs are not allowed on the island. According to DNA-examinations from the year 2004, the island dingoes are "pure". However, skull measurements from the 1990s detected crossbreeds between dingoes and domestic dogs among the population. 
In March 2010, three separate reports of dingos biting tourists were made. Tourists have been criticised for ignoring advice from park rangers as they try to provoke reactions from dingoes while taking photographs. 
Cetaceans, such as humpback whales and some species of dolphins are frequent visitors to the area. Dugongs and sea turtles can also be found in surrounding waters. Great white, bull and tiger sharks can be found, with the latter species sometimes approaching fishermen wading in the surf. Mud crabs are found on the western side of the island near mangrove-lined estuaries. 24 freshwater fish species are found in the island's lakes. 
There has been 300 species of ants recorded on Fraser Island. Long finned eels and giant earthworms are also found on the island. 
Fraser Island is part of the local government area Fraser Coast Region, which was created in March 2008 as a result of the report of the Local Government Reform Commission released in July 2007. Before the local government reorganisation, the island was split up evenly between the City of Hervey Bay (northern part) and the City of Maryborough (southern part). 
In 1971, the northern half of Fraser Island was declared a national park. Now almost all of the island is included in the Great Sandy National Park, which is administered by Queensland's Environmental Protection Agency. This was extended in 1992 when heritage listing was granted. Except for a few small urban areas the island is protected by a Wild Rivers declaration. 
Domestic dogs are not permitted on Fraser Island and fines can be given for non-compliance. The ban, first applied in 1981, is imposed so that the island's dingo population is not exposed to diseases. 
In 2010, the management of the park, particularly the treatment of dingoes by the Department of Environment and Resource Management was called into question by Glen Elmes in the Queensland Parliament. Camp grounds are sometimes closed so as to reduce human contact with dingo populations. 
Fraser Island is one of Queensland's most popular islands for tourists, who can reach the island by ferry from Hervey Bay or Rainbow Beach, which takes approximately 50-minutes. Estimates of the number of visitors to the island each year range from 350,000 to 500,000. The chance of seeing a dingo in its natural setting is one of the main reasons people visit the island. The use of boardwalks and marked tracks by visitors is encouraged to reduce erosion. 
Urinating tourists have created environmental problems in Fraser Island lakes and on coastal dunes. The foredunes are used as a toilet by bush campers, who are estimated to number 90,000 each year. Many of the perched lakes have no outflow or inflow which exacerbates the problem. Water quality in some lakes is being affected by storm water run-off from dune roads, and by swimmers' use of sunscreen. 
"Central Station", which was formerly the hub of the forestry industry when there was logging on Fraser Island, is now a popular tourist destination. Some of the rarest ferns grow in the rainforest near the location. 
The island can be reached by a ferry from River Heads (South of Hervey Bay) to Kingfisher Bay and Wanggoolba Creek or Inskip Point to north of Rainbow Beach to Hook Point, or by chartered flight from Maroochydore Airport. 
A four-wheel drive is required for all landings (except Kingfisher Bay), and travel on the island (except within the Kingfisher Bay Resort). A permit is required for vehicles and is obtainable on-line from DERM and several outlets at Rainbow Beach. Several firms provide four-wheel drive vehicles for hire. Tour buses travel the island as well as several kinds of self-drive tours departing regularly from Hervey Bay, Rainbow Beach and Noosa. 
There are many campgrounds on Fraser Island with varying amenities and access. The main camping areas are: Dundubara Campground, Cathedrals on Fraser, Waddy Point campground, Central Station Tent Sites, Waddy Beach (tent only campsites), Cornwells Break (large group site), One Tree Rocks camp zone (Eurong-One Tree Rocks), however there are others. Permits are required for camping and also for vehicle access. 
The 1999 Towson Tigers football team was an American football team that represented Towson University during the 1999 NCAA Division I-AA football season. Towson finished third in the Patriot League. 
Buxton Museum and Art Gallery focuses its collection on history, geology and archaeology primarily from the Peak District and Derbyshire. 
The museum is located at Terrace Road, Buxton, England.  The museum opens Tuesday to Saturday all year round and from Easter to the end of September is also open on Sunday and Bank Holiday afternoons. Admission is free. The building was erected in 1880 and originally served as the Peak Hydropathic Hotel. During the First World War, the Red Cross used it to care for wounded Canadian soldiers. The Buxton Free Public Library & Museum moved into the building in 1928, leaving the Town Hall. 
Amongst the minerals are Blue John, carved limestone, local specimens, and cave deposits. In 2006, Buxton Museum purchased a rare collection of decorative Ashford Black Marble wares, together with tools used to work the stone collection left by John Michael Tomlinson.  Other collections relating to Derbyshire, also managed from Buxton Museum and Art Gallery, include a Derbyshire Police Collection. 
Anne Elisabet Jensen (born 17 August 1951, in Kalundborg) is a Danish politician who served as a Member of the European Parliament from 1999 until 2014. She is a member of the Venstre, part of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe. 
In parliament, Jensen served on the European Parliament's Committee on Budgets. She was also a substitute for the Committee on Employment and Social Affairs and the Committee on Transport and Tourism. 
This article about a Member of the European Parliament from Denmark is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
IAPMO was founded on May 17, 1926, with the mandate "to advance the latest and most improved methods of sanitation; to promote the welfare of and harmony between the owner, the builder, and the craftsman; to accomplish a uniformity in the application of the provisions of the ordinances; and to promulgate the mutual benefit of the members." 
The founding members of IAPMO first gathered to begin writing a model code to protect the health of the people they served from inept plumbing practices. There were 39 Southern California plumbing inspectors in the first group, including Charles Collard, the association's first president, and Stephen Smoot, who served as association secretary from 1926 to 1954. 
Syed Sohail Abbas Shah is a Pakistani politician who is Minister Law & Parliamentary Affairs and Board of Revenue Government of Gilgit Baltistan and member of the Gilgit Baltistan Assembly. He is son late Syed Jaffar Shah retired justice of Supereme Appellate Court Gilgit Baltistan. Late Syed Jaffar Shah was President of Pakistan Tehreek E Insaf Gilgit Baltistan chapter, Mr. Jaffar Shah died due to Covid-19 just few days  before general elections of Gilgit Baltistan. 
Shah contested 2020 Gilgit-Baltistan Assembly by-election on 22 November 2020 from constituency GBA-3 (Gilgit-III) on the ticket from Pakistan Tehreek-e-Insaf candidate. He won GBA-3 (Gilgit-III) by the margin of 2,195 votes over the Independent runner up Muhammad Iqbal. He garnered 6,873 votes while Iqbal received 4,678 votes. 
This is a discography of South Indian composer and lyricist Hamsalekha. As of 2013, he has scored music for about 324 Kannada films and few Telugu and Tamil films. 
Luxembourg competed at the 1973 World Aquatics Championships in Belgrade, Yugoslavia from August 31 to September 9. 
The core of Hunters & Collectors was expanded by a brass section, later dubbed Horns of Contempt, including Michael Waters on trombone; Jack Howard on trumpet; and Jeremy Smith on French horn. By July 1982 Tosti-Gueira was replaced by Martin Lubran (ex-Spiny Norman) on guitar. In early 1988 Barry Palmer (Harem Scarem, ex-Stephen Cummings Band) joined the group on guitar. 
To support the album's appearance the group undertook a national Collected Works Tour for two months into January the following year. Seymour told Bevan Hannan of The Canberra Times, that the tour was "an interruption in a manner of speaking. We're actually in the process of writing an album which we are meant to be recording in April or May. But it's been really good, much better than anything we've done before as far as crowd sizes". 
Penelope Layland of The Canberra Times felt the album was an "excellent compilation ... a double album of well-chosen, quality tracks ... must rate as one of the best-value Christmas present in the record stores this summer". Allmusic's Mike DeGagne described the United States version on I.R.S. Records, which "takes the best tracks from the first ten years of the band's existence and lays them out in chronological order, resulting in a wonderful compilation". 
Following the formation of Gulti, another small developer formed by veterans of the shooter genre, G.rev proposed a collaborative effort, as Gulti didn't have the capital needed for a full-scale shooter of their own.[citation needed] The two companies created Mamoru-kun wa Norowarete Shimatta, an overhead-view, multi-directional shooter with a Japanese fantasy theme, initially released on the NAOMI. The title was ported to Xbox 360 and a widescreen version made it to PlayStation 3 much later. 
The company's next title was Senko no Ronde DUO: Dis-United Order, a sequel to their earlier crossover title. This time, G.rev chose to develop for the more powerful Taito X2 hardware, allowing the graphical quality of the arcade version to match the later Xbox 360 port. Unlike its predecessor, the title was not released outside Japan. 
The Manhattan Prong of the New England Uplands is a smaller belt of ancient rock in southern New York (including Manhattan, the Bronx, and segments of Brooklyn and Staten Island), parts of Westchester County, and upland portions of southwestern Connecticut. 
This article about a Scottish association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Radiumhemmet is a non-surgical cancer treatment and radiotherapy research institution in Solna, Sweden. Since 1938, it has been a division of what is now the Karolinska University Hospital. It was founded in 1910 in central Stockholm as the first oncological clinic in Sweden, succeeding a radium research and treatment institution at the Serafimerlasarett founded in 1906, and played a major role in the development of radiotherapy, especially in gynaecological cancers. 
Beginning in the 1980s, Radiumhemmet was affected by shortages of government funds for medical services. Equipment could not be obtained or repaired. Radiotherapy patients had to wait for six weeks for an appointment. Layoffs were still occurring in 2015. 
However, on 13 January 2009, NME.COM announced that Doherty's solo album, entitled Grace/Wastelands would be released on 16 March, preceded by a single, "Last of the English Roses", on 9 March. The website also revealed the track listing of the album and credits. 
Though critics were a lot more fond of the record than Doherty's last two efforts, the album did not sell as well as was expected, particularly in the UK - peaking only at 17 in the UK Top 40. 
Afipia birgiae is a species in the Afipia bacterial genus. It is a gram-negative, oxidase-positive rod in the alpha-2 subgroup of the class Proteobacteria. It is motile by means of a single flagellum. Its type strain is 34632T (=CIP 106344T =CCUG 43108T). 
Afipia birgiae is a fastidious bacteria isolated from a hospital water supply in co-culture with amoebae. It is hypothesized that this group of bacteria are a potential cause of nosocomial infections. 
He was chosen seven times for the "Ideal Team of America", thus being the one that has been nominated the most times in history. It is a historical of the Paraguayan team, of which he was coach on two occasions. 
Arce was appointed coach of the Paraguay national football team in July 2011, but due to poor results on the 2014 FIFA World Cup qualification, he was sacked in June 2012. 
It was said by Polish writer Christien Ostrowski to have inspired Emilia Plater, a military heroine of the November 1830 Uprising. 
The Raven is a 2012 American crime thriller film directed by James McTeigue, produced by Marc D. Evans, Trevor Macy and Aaron Ryder and written by Ben Livingston and Hannah Shakespeare. It stars John Cusack, Alice Eve, Brendan Gleeson and Luke Evans. The title derives from Poe's 1845 poem "The Raven", in the similar manner of the earlier unrelated 1935 and 1963 films. 
Set in 1849, it is a fictionalized account of the last days of Edgar Allan Poe's life, in which the poet and author pursues a serial killer whose murders mirror those in Poe's stories. While the plot of the film is fictional, the writers based it on some accounts of real situations surrounding Edgar Allan Poe's mysterious death. Poe is said to have repeatedly called out the name "Reynolds" on the night before his death, though it is unclear to whom he was referring. 
The film was released in the United Kingdom on March 9, 2012 and in the United States on April 27. The film garnered mixed reviews from critics, with the visual effects and score by Lucas Vidal bring praised, but the performances and plot twists criticized. 
Poe writes one last newspaper column, offering his life for Emily's, suggesting that he could take poison. In the morning, the maid gives Poe a letter from the killer, accepting his terms, but the note was delivered long before the paper was distributed. Realizing that the killer must work at the paper, Poe races to confront his editor, Henry (Kevin McNally), but Henry is already dead, another note lying next to him. 
Ivan disembarks from a train in Paris. As a porter carries his luggage, Ivan climbs into a carriage and is confronted by Fields. He lunges for the detective, and Fields shoots him at point blank range. 
The filming began on November 9, 2010 in Belgrade and Budapest. The first images from the set were revealed on November 15, 2010. A trailer for the film was released online October 7, 2011. This date is significant because it also marks the anniversary of Poe's death at age 40 in 1849. In 2011 Relativity acquired U.S. rights for only $4 million. 
James Berardinelli gave the film two and a half stars out of four, writing: "The Raven looks great and is well-paced, but a lack of a compelling resolution makes it an anemic effort." Mick LaSalle of the San Francisco Chronicle wrote, "The story has its moments, and yet there is something about this tale ... that doesn't completely satisfy." Richard Roeper, however, was more positive towards the film, awarding it a B+. 
The Raven grossed $16 million in the United States and Canada, and $13.7 million in other territories, for a worldwide total of $29.7 million. 
In August 2017, an Egyptian judge sentenced Serageldin to three and a half years in prison, for alleged management decisions he made prior to 2011.  Over 300 eminent persons, including 90 Nobel Prize winners and 20 current and former heads of state, signed a letter supporting Serageldin and objecting to the verdict, and the  case was  appealed. 
On the 26th of December, 2017, the Appeals Court delivered its verdict and dismissed all the charges against Ismail Serageldin. The Court found that all the accusations were baseless. Ismail Serageldin is now declared innocent of all the allegations made against him during the previous seven years. 
Serageldin was graduated with First class honors in 1964 from Cairo University from which he holds a Bachelor of Science Degree in Engineering. In 1968, he earned his master's degree with distinction from Harvard University followed by a PhD from the same university four years later. Prior to joining the World Bank, he worked as a consultant in city and regional planning, and taught at Cairo University and Harvard University. 
Serageldin joined the World Bank through the Young Professionals Program after completing his Ph.D. at Harvard University. 
After a career of 28 years at the World Bank, Ismail Serageldin resigned on 10 July 2000 to return to his home country, Egypt. 
Ismail Serageldin was married to the late Mrs. Nevine Madkour with one son. He is tri-lingual: Arabic, French and English. 
Over 100 books and monographs (edited or authored), in addition to 500 articles, book chapters, and technical papers on various topics, some of which are: 
Marine mammal training is the training and caring for marine life such as, dolphins, killer whales, sea lions, walruses, and other marine mammals. It is also a duty of the trainer to do mental and physical exercises to keep the animal healthy and happy.[according to whom?] 
There are five steps needed to become a marine mammal trainer: earn a high school diploma, volunteer at a marine mammal facility, earn a college degree, obtain an internship, and become SCUBA certified. Most marine mammal trainers earn their degree in marine biology, psychology, and/or animal behavior. Even though a formal education is very important, it is even more important to get a hands-on experience with an experienced trainer to learn and become familiar with marine mammal behaviors. 
California, Florida, and New York are the three highest states with available animal trainer job positions. Since there are few marine parks and aquariums that open each year, the demand for marine mammal trainers is very competitive. Marine mammal trainers can work in aquariums, zoos, non-profit environmental advocacy organizations, eco-tourism companies, university research laboratories, industrial research centers, private companies, and government research laboratories or marine stations. 
The Kashif & Shanghai Knockout Tournament was a knockout tournament of the Guyana football. It was created in 1990. 
It was the most important cup tournament drawing large crowds, played in December and January every season. The first two editions were restricted to teams from Linden (4 participants 1990/91; in 1991/92 all seven clubs from Linden entered); since 1992/93 teams from outside Linden (or indeed Guyana) could also enter. 
This article about a CONCACAF/North, Central American and Caribbean association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Daniel Auteuil was born on 24 January 1950 in Algiers, French Algeria, the son of opera singers. He grew up in Avignon and Nancy, France. He began his acting career in musical comedy and made his film debut in 1972. 
In 2013, Auteuil was selected as a member of the main competition jury at the 2013 Cannes Film Festival. 
Nightmare in Blood is a 1978 American horror film directed by professional late night television horror movie host, and writer, John Stanley. 
Attendees at a horror-film convention in San Francisco keep disappearing. It turns out that the guest of honor is a real vampire, and his henchmen are kidnapping the convention guests. A horror writer, a Sherlock Holmes fan and an Israeli Nazi-hunter set out to stop him. 
Primary filming occurred at the Fox Oakland Theatre in Oakland, California. The Fox was renamed the "Palace" in the film. 
The film ran in the drive-in theater circuit for nearly a decade and had a wide VHS release in the 1980s. 
Elfi Schlegel (born 17 May 1964) is a sportscaster for NBC Sports and a former college and national champion gymnast from Canada.   She is generally regarded as a top 50 Canadian gymnast of all time, and maybe even the 3rd best of the late 70s behind Monica Goermann and the late Sherry Hawco. 
Schlegel graduated from Florida with a bachelor's degree in telecommunications production in 1986, and was inducted into the University of Florida Athletic Hall of Fame as a "Gator Great" in 1997. 
Schlegel is married to Marc Dunn, a former Olympian who represented Canada in beach volleyball at the 1996 Summer Olympics.  They have three children and live in Toronto. 
Smart & Final is a chain of warehouse-style food and supply stores based in Commerce, California, which developed through a series of mergers and expansions. The oldest of the combined companies, Hellman-Haas Grocery, was founded in 1871 in Los Angeles. The company operates over 250 stores in the Western United States and 15 in northwestern Mexico. 
While Smart & Final stores target both the food-service and household markets, the company also operates Smart Foodservice Warehouse Stores (formerly known as Cash & Carry), which market to foodservice professionals. 
In 1998, it acquired Portland, Oregon-based United Grocers Cash & Carry, which was renamed Cash & Carry. These stores are concentrated in the Pacific Northwest. 
In 2007, Smart & Final acquired 35 Henry's Farmers Markets in California and Sun Harvest Markets in Texas for about $166 million. 
In 2012, Apollo sold its stake in Smart & Final to Ares Management for $975 million. Smart & Final went public in 2014. 
In 2019, Apollo once again acquired the chain, for $1.1 billion. Deutsche Bank had financed the previous buyout and took a loss. 
On October 30, 2019, Smart & Final introduced two redesigned shopping portals for consumers and business clients. Shoppers can see weekly specials, create grocery lists, shop by recipes, and create profiles that reflect dietary allergies or preferences. Business clients can complete online orders and apply for tax exemptions. 
On May 24, 2021, Mexican supermarket operator Chedraui (via its California-based Bodega Latina subsidiary) announced it intent to acquire Smart and Final from Apollo. 
The Pittsburgh Mercantile Company Building in the South Side Flats neighborhood of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, United States,  was built in 1907 to 1908 and functioned as the company store for the nearby Jones and Laughlin Steel Company. It is currently used as an apartment building.  The structure was listed in the National Register of Historic Places in 2014. 
Pittsburgh Mercantile Company ran a general purpose store at its South Side Flats flagship location, including groceries, dry goods, hardware, and home furnishings. At least seven other locations were established, including Aliquippa and  California, Pennsylvania. 
While hearings, investigations and legislation to end the scrip/company store system continued through the Great Depression and beyond, the scrip system didn't end until 1950.  The Pittsburgh Mercantile Company remained profitable for another decade after that. 
Thalia Pellegrini (born 16 August 1975, in London) is a British television presenter and registered Nutritional Therapist (FdSc DipION BANT CNHC). 
She continues to do both broadcast and corporate work. She was the featured nutritional therapist on two series of Channel 5's Secrets of Your Supermarket Foods in 2019 and 2020. 
This biographical article related to BBC Television is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to television journalism in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ethiopian Airlines Flight 409 was an international commercial flight scheduled from Beirut to Addis Ababa that crashed into the Mediterranean Sea shortly after takeoff from Rafic Hariri International Airport on 25 January 2010, killing all 90 people on board. This was the first fatal crash for Ethiopian Airlines since the hijack of Ethiopian Airlines Flight 961 in 1996. 
All the deceased were recovered from the sea by 23 February. The recovered bodies were sent to the Rafik Hariri University Hospital in Beirut for DNA testing and identification. They were all identified by the end of February. 
The Lebanese Civil Aviation Authority investigated the accident, with the assistance of the BEA, Boeing, and the National Transportation Safety Board of the United States. 
Lebanese President Michel Suleiman stated before the flight data recorders were found that the crash was not due to terrorism. Lebanese Information Minister Tarek Mitri rejected the notion that the aircraft should not have been allowed to take off under the current weather conditions, stating that "many" other aircraft had taken off during the time period. 
The final investigation report released by the Lebanese Ministry of Public Works and Transport, presented on 17 January 2012, stated that "the probable causes of the accident were the flight crew's mismanagement of the aircraft's speed, altitude, headings and attitude through inconsistent flight control inputs resulting in a loss of control and their failure to abide by CRM [Crew Resource Management] principles of mutual support and calling deviations". 
The crash was dramatized in the twelfth series of the Canadian documentary Mayday (also known as Air Emergency or Air Crash Investigation). It is titled "Heading to Disaster". The episode re-creates the crash based on the Lebanese investigators' final report. 
He became a deacon in 1935 and a priest in 1936, beginning his ministry as a curate at St Bartholomew's, Clyde Road, Dublin under Canon W.C.Simpson. 
In 1937 he took a position in Lincoln Theological College but returned to Dublin in 1939 to become Dean of Residence in Trinity College Dublin and Chaplain Secretary of the Church of Ireland College of Education. He was appointed Dean of Cork in 1952; consecrated a bishop, he served as Bishop of Cork, Cloyne and Ross, between 1952 and 1956. At forty-two, he was the youngest Church of Ireland clergyman appointed to a Bishopric since John Gregg in 1915. 
He served as Archbishop of Dublin, from 1956 to 1969. During this time, he maintained a courteous relationship with John Charles McQuaid, his Roman Catholic counterpart as Archbishop of Dublin. 
From 1969 to 1980, he served as Archbishop of Armagh. He was a scholar, and published research on the history of the Church of Ireland and on the Book of Kells. He was also a fluent speaker of the Irish language. 
Alongside Cardinal William Conway, Simms chaired the first official ecumenical meeting between the leaders of Ireland's Protestant Churches and the Catholic Church in Ballymascanlon Hotel, Dundalk, Co. Louth on 26 September 1973, an important meeting amidst the increasing violence in Northern Ireland. The meeting was protested by Ian Paisley. 
Polyzosteria cuprea is a species of bush cockroach found in south western Australia. It is a diurnal species and its typical habitat is arid regions and eucalyptus woodland. 
Polyzosteria cuprea is a wingless, dorsally-flattened, charcoal-grey insect. There is a large, cream-coloured patch at the front of the tergum (dorsal plate) of the prothorax, smaller cream markings on the sides of the next two terga, and cream bands on the legs. 
Most Pure Heart Of Mary Church is a historic church at West Street and Raymond Avenue in Shelby, Ohio. 
This article about a property in Richland County, Ohio on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a church or other Christian place of worship in Ohio is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Liverpool Wavertree by-election, 1931 was a parliamentary by-election held in England for the House of Commons constituency of Liverpool Wavertree on 23 June 1931.  It was won by the Conservative Party candidate Ronald Nall-Cain. 
The seat had become vacant when the sitting Conservative Member of Parliament (MP), John Tinne had resigned his seat on 3 June 1931. Tinne had held the seat since the 1924 general election. 
The Conservative candidate was Ronald Nall-Cain, a wealthy barrister and a Hertfordshire County Councillor, while the Labour Party selected S.L. Treleaven. Neither candidate had previously stood for Parliament. 
The Liberal candidate had won nearly 30% of the vote at the 1929 general election, but the party did not contest the by-election. Most of the Liberal vote went to the Conservatives, and on a reduced turnout Nall-Cain held the seat with a massively increased majority. 
Nall-Cain was re-elected at the general election in October 1931, and  held the seat until the death in late 1934 of his father Charles, whom he succeeded as Baron Brocket, triggering another by-election. 
The FHASA was known for the construction of the power plant in Engordany and the CG-1, as well as the FHASA strikes of 1933 which won universal male suffrage for Andorrans, until then limited to heads of household. The only three general strikes in the history of Andorra were all staged by the FHASA. 
Salerno served as a general assignment reporter and as the weekend morning news anchor from 1994 till 1999.  
Before working at WGN, Salerno was a reporter and weekend anchor at WNYT in Albany, New York. Prior to that, he worked at WMBD-TV and WHOI-TV in Peoria, Illinois. He began his broadcasting career at WIFR-TV in Rockford, Illinois as a general assignment reporter. 
Salerno received his B.S. in Communication from Illinois State University in 1985, where he was an anchor/reporter for the campus TV station. He lived in Crystal Lake, Illinois, where he attended Crystal Lake South High School and played basketball. 
Salerno died in a snowmobile accident on the night of January 24, 2008, on Plum Lake near Sayner/Eagle River, Wisconsin. Salerno was a passenger on a snowmobile when the snowmobile struck a tree. 
Randy Salerno won a local Emmy Award for his work on CBS 2's 2004 broadcast of the LaSalle Bank Chicago Marathon. 
Elections to the United States House of Representatives in Pennsylvania were held on October 9, 1804 for the 9th Congress. 
In the previous election, a delegation of all Democratic-Republicans had been elected to Congress.  At this time, a moderate wing of the Democratic-Republican party, known as the Constitutional Republicans or tertium quids ("quids" for short) had broken off from the majority and ran candidates in several districts.  The Quids were generally allied with the Federalists. 
Pennsylvania was divided into 11 districts, of which four were plural districts with 11 Representatives between them.  Several new counties were created between the 1802 elections and the 1804 elections. The districts were: 
The borders between the 4th, 5th, and 8th districts were altered slightly in the erection of new counties from parts of several counties 
Note: Many of these counties covered much larger areas than they do today, having since been divided into smaller counties 
Fifteen incumbents ran for re-election, of whom 14 won.  The incumbents Isaac Van Horne (DR) of the 2nd district, Joseph Hiester (DR) of the 3rd district and William Hoge (DR) of the 10th district did not run for re-election.  One seat changed from Democratic-Republican to Federalist. 
William Hoge (DR) of the 10th district resigned October 15, 1804.  A special election was held November 2, 1804 to fill his seat for the remainder of the 8th Congress 
Two special elections were held on October 8, 1805.  In the 4th district, John A. Hanna (DR) died on July 23, 1805, while in the 11th district, John Lucas (DR) resigned prior to the first meeting of the 9th Congress. 
Michael Leib (DR) of the 1st district resigned February 14, 1806.  A special election was held November 27, 1806 
A collection of Fitzpatrick's cartoons from The Lepracaun was published in book form in 1913.  He was also a master illuminator and with his daughter, artist Mary Fitzpatrick O'Brien, he produced many illuminated and richly decorated scrolls and paintings, many reflecting the influence of the early Celtic Revival.  He was the grandfather of the Irish fantasy artist Jim Fitzpatrick. 
It was named for George Washington Lingo, an early settler.  George Washington Lingo was a native of Randolph County, Missouri, where he was born on March 25, 1833, a son of Samuel Lingo, a Carolinian who came to Missouri by way of Tennessee. 
This San Luis Obispo County, California-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The RIBA President's Medals are international awards presented annually by the Royal Institute of British Architects (RIBA) to architecture students or recent graduates. In 2019, the RIBA invited 408 schools of architecture located in 80 countries to nominate up to two entries for the Bronze Medal, up to two entries for the Silver Medal, and one entry for the Dissertation Medal. 
As the RIBA's oldest awards (preceding the Royal Gold Medal, formally established in 1848), the RIBA President's Medals embody the RIBA's commitment to architecture and the education of individuals into understanding architecture's wider social benefits. 
The winners receive their awards from the RIBA President at a ceremony held at the RIBA in early December of each year. Guest speakers have included Norman Foster, Richard Rogers, Mark Lawson, Richard MacCormac, Paul Smith, Martha Schwartz, and Alex James.[citation needed] 
The Blancheville Monster was released in Italy on June 6, 1963 through Titanus. It was released in Italy under the title Horror as chosen by producer Italo Zingarelli. The film grossed 87 million Italian lira on its initial theatrical run in Italy. 
A Whisper to a Roar is a 2012 American documentary film made by Ben Moses and inspired by the work of Larry Diamond.  The film chronicles the fight for democracy in Egypt, Malaysia, Ukraine, Venezuela, and Zimbabwe, and includes animated segments narrated by British actor Alfred Molina. 
Editing of the film completed in August 2012, and A Whisper to a Roar world premiered at the Directors Guild of America in Los Angeles, on October 3, 2012, to an audience of over 600 people. The premiere was hosted by the Museum of Tolerance, the Human Rights Foundation, Burt Sugarman and Mary Hart, and Los Angeles Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa. 
The film was widely reviewed including by The New York Times, The Village Voice, the Los Angeles Times and Variety. 
The film was released on DVD and digital download on April 16, 2013 and is available in eight languages. 
The final stretch of the Comet Line escape route crosses the French/Spanish border at the Bidasoa river near Endarlatsa...It is an intricate crossing winding along hidden stream valleys and mountain shoulders; through tunnels and past isolated mountain farms...they crossed at night, in the fear of being shot either by the Nazis on the French side or Franco's henchmen on the Spanish side. 
[Elvire De Greef] was involved in numerous black market operations...and by these activities lulled suspicion of her real work....on more than one occasion she blackmailed Germans by threatening to reveal their possession of black market goods and thus escaped arrest. 
The most dangerous part of the walk across the mountains was the crossing of the Bidassoa river near Endarlatsa. The Bidassoa River was the border of France and Spain. Border guards were on both sides of the river and high water often made the crossing of the river difficult or impossible. In December 1943, Comet Line leader Antoine d'Ursel and American pilot James F. Burch were drowned while attempting to cross the river. 
As the demand for expatriation of flyers increased in 1943, the Comet Line added additional routes to Spain in addition to the one supervised by Elvire De Greef. On June 6, 1944 with the German Gestapo closing in on the de Greef's and their organization, Elvire and her son and daughter crossed the border into Spain. The children were evacuated to England. Elvire returned to France shortly. 
Since the 1960s, she was also in radio in a variety of roles, such as Horst Tappert in a radio adaptation of Bertolt Brecht's The Threepenny Opera, the multi-part thriller, La Boutique by Francis Durbridge and the children's radio drama The daisies'. 
After Casimir I's death, Henry I the Bearded assumed the regency and formal guardianship of his minor sons, while his widow Viola took over direct tutelage of them. 
This article about a Democratic Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sally Pechinsky (born March 4, 1950) is an American fencer. She competed in the women's team foil event at the 1968 Summer Olympics. She is married to fellow American fencer Edward Ballinger. 
This biographical article related to fencing in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gweru-Thornhill Air Base (IATA: GWE, ICAO: FVTL) is one of the two main air bases of the Air Force of Zimbabwe located near the central city of Gweru, 
Thornhill Air Base is home to air force fighter squadrons and the Pilot Training School. According to Janes Defence Weekly of 6 September 2006 a US$41.5m simulation center was being established. A full range of amenities and services, which include workshops, transport fleets, equipment depots, and accommodation, sporting and entertainment facilities, support the base. The Gweru Thornhill VOR-DME (Ident: VTL) and non-directional beacons (Idents: TL and TI) are located on the field. 
A total of 13 bonus songs can also be unlocked through the game's Career mode. The bonus setlist consists of bands formed by Harmonix employees as well as local bands from near Harmonix's headquarters in Cambridge, Massachusetts, or from Boston. The exceptions are Flyleaf, Crooked X, and Mother Hips.  "Timmy and the Lords of the Underworld" comes from the titular fictional band featured in the comedy show South Park. 
The Wii version of Rock Band features 5 additional songs originally released as downloadable content on the PlayStation 3 and Xbox 360 versions of the game. 
The European version of Rock Band features nine additional songs not available on the North American disc. These bonus songs include English, German, and French vocals. These songs were released as downloadable content in the North American market on May 20, 2008. 
WMTY-FM (98.3 FM) is a radio station broadcasting an oldies music format. Licensed to Sweetwater, Tennessee, United States, the station is currently owned by Horne Radio, LLC and features The True Oldies Channel from Citadel Media. 
On September 1, 2010 WLOD-FM changed its format from classic rock to oldies, branded as "True Oldies". On September 15, 2010 WLOD-FM changed its call letters to WMTY-FM. 
The Central Park Historic District (also known as Estates of South Palm Beach) is a U.S. historic district (designated as such on July 28, 1999) located in West Palm Beach, Florida. The district runs roughly along SR 805 and South Olive Avenue, from Monroe Drive to Southern Boulevard. It contains 155 historic buildings. 
This article about a property in Palm Beach County, Florida on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mandurah Magic is an NBL1 West club based in Mandurah, Western Australia. The club fields a team in both the Men's and Women's NBL1 West. The club is a division of Mandurah Basketball Association (MBA), the major administrative basketball organisation in the region. The Magic play their home games at Mandurah Aquatic & Recreation Centre. 
In 2021, the SBL was rebranded as NBL1 West. In the inaugural NBL1 West season, the Magic men advanced out of the first round of the playoffs for the first time in club history. 
Construction began in 2013 and was completed in early 2016 for the first tower. Construction of the second tower began in late 2016. 
The 306th Infantry Division (German: 306. Infanterie-Division) was an infantry division of the German Wehrmacht during World War II. 
The 306th Infantry Division was formed on 15 November 1940 as a static division of the 13th Aufstellungswelle in the Hamm area in Wehrkreis VI. The division's initial recruitment pool came from a third each of the 86th and the 291st Infantry Divisions, as well as the Field Recruit Battalion 129. The initial commander of the 306th Infantry Division was Hans von Sommerfeld. 
Over the year of 1943, divisional commanders of the 306th Infantry Division included, among others, Georg Pfeiffer, Theo-Helmut Lieb, and Carl-Erik Koehler. 
On 4 July 1944, the fourth detachment of Artillery Regiment 306 (officially designated the fourth detachment of Artillery Regiment 328) was replaced by the third detachment of Artillery Regiment 117 from the 111th Infantry Division. 
In August 1944, the division was destroyed while serving under Army Group South Ukraine. It was formally dissolved on 9 October 1944. 
At the point of formation in late 1940, the 306th Infantry Division consisted of the following parts: 
In late 1943, the division was restructured into a Type 1944 Infantry Division (German: Division neuer Art 44). After this restructuring, it consisted of the following parts: 
Marrony da Silva Liberato (born 5 February 1999), known simply as Marrony, is a Brazilian footballer who plays as a forward for Danish Superliga club Midtjylland. 
On 18 February 2019, after establishing himself as a starter, Marrony renewed his contract until 2023. 
The 1997 Australian Super Touring Championship was contested over eight rounds with two races held at each round. 
Drivers Championship points were awarded on a 15-12-10-8-6-5-4-3-2-1 basis for the first ten places in each race. One point was awarded to the driver setting the fastest qualifying time for each races. 
Manufacturers Championship points were awarded on a 15-12-10 basis for relative positions attained in each race by the best placed car of each of the three manufacturers that had nominated cars to compete on their behalf. 
The TOCA Challenge Cup was open to drivers of teams which did not receive major support from a manufacturer. 
Karyer Izvestnyak is located 9 km northwest of Alexandrovsk (the district's administrative centre) by road. Vsevolodo-Vilva is the nearest rural locality. 
This article related to a Japanese film of the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cepheus was a member of the Arcadian royal family, the descendants of Pelasgos, the first king of Arcadia. He was usually said to be the son of Aleus, the king of Tegea in Arcadia. According to Apollodorus, Aleus had, by Neaera the daughter of Pereus, a daughter Auge and two sons Cepheus and Lycurgus. While according to the mythographer Hyginus, Cepheus (the Argonaut) was the son of Aleus and Cleobule. A different tradition perhaps made Cepheus a son of Lycurgus rather than Aleus. 
In addition, the Argonaut Amphidamas was said to be another brother of Chepheus and son of Aleus, while according to the geographer Pausanias, Aleus had three sons, Lycurgus, Amphidamas and Cepheus, however Apollodorus has Amphidamas as the son of Lycurgus. According to the historian Diodorus Siculus, Aleus also had a daughter named Alcidice. 
Cepheus had twenty sons, one of whom was named Aeropus. He also had a daughter Sterope, who figured in the story of Cepheus' participation in the war against Hippocoon. Pausanias also mentions two other daughters of Cepheus, Aerope, who died giving birth to a son of the god Ares, and Antinoe. 
In his youth, Cepheus joined Jason and the Argonauts in their quest for the Golden Fleece. He was joined by his brother Amphidamas, and their nephew Ancaeus, the son of their brother  Lycurgus. He was also perhaps, along with Ancaeus, one of the many heroes who joined Meleager in hunting the Calydonian boar, since according to Apollodorus, "Ancaeus and Cepheus, sons of Lycurgus, from Arcadia" were among those who participated in the hunt. 
The city of Caphyae was believed to have received its name from Cepheus. A Cepheus was said to be have brought colonists to the town of Kyrenia in Cyprus. 
The album was re-released in 1989 in CD format along with the band's debut EP Peace thru Vandalism as Peace Thru Vandalism / When in Rome Do as The Vandals. The CD version was released by Restless Records (later reissued by Time Bomb Recordings) and correctly lists the song titles as described above. 
In apocryphal, kabbalistic, and occult works, Uriel/Auriel has been equated (or confused) with Urial, Nuriel, Uryan, Jeremiel, Vretil, Sariel, Suriel, Puruel, Phanuel, Jacob, Azrael, and Raphael. 
Raphael features prominently in the deuterocanonical Book of Tobit. The Book of Tobit is accepted as canonical by the Roman Catholic Church, the Anglican Communion, the Eastern Orthodox Church, and the Oriental Orthodox Church. 
Where a fourth archangel is added to the named three, to represent the four cardinal points, Uriel is generally the fourth. Uriel is listed as the fourth angel in Christian Gnostics (under the name Phanuel). However, the Book of Enoch clearly distinguishes the two angels. Uriel means "God is my Light", whereas Phanuel means "Turn to God". Uriel is the third angel listed in the Testament of Solomon, the fourth being Sabrael. 
Uriel appears in the Second Book of Esdras found in the Biblical apocrypha (called Esdras IV in the Vulgate) in which the prophet Ezra asks God a series of questions and Uriel is sent by God to instruct him. According to the Revelation of Esdras, the angels that will rule at the end of the world are Michael, Gabriel, Uriel, Raphael, Gabuthelon, Beburos, Zebuleon, Aker, and Arphugitonos. The last five listed only appear in this book and nowhere else in apocryphal or apocalyptic works. 
In Christian apocryphal gospels Uriel plays a role, differing between the sources, in the rescue of Jesus' cousin John the Baptist from the Massacre of the Innocents ordered by King Herod. He carries John and his mother Saint Elizabeth to join the Holy Family after their Flight into Egypt. Their reunion is depicted in Leonardo da Vinci's Virgin of the Rocks. 
Stemming from medieval Jewish mystical traditions, Uriel has also become the angel of Sunday (Jewish Encyclopedia[full citation needed]), the angel of poetry, and one of the holy sephiroth. Uriel is depicted as the destroyer of the hosts of Sennacherib. 
He checked the doors of Egypt for lamb's blood during the plague. He also holds the key to the Pit during the End Times, and led Abraham to the west. 
In modern angelology, Uriel is identified variously as a seraph, cherub, regent of the sun, flame of God, angel of the divine presence, presider over Tartarus (hell), archangel of salvation, and, in later scriptures, identified with Phanuel ("face of God"). He is often depicted carrying a book or a papyrus scroll representing wisdom. Uriel is a patron of the arts. 
In Henry Wadsworth Longfellow's Golden Legend, Uriel is one of the angels of the seven planets. Uriel is the angel of Mars. He is also listed as such in Benjamin Camfield's A Theological Discourse of Angels (1678). 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old.
The Book of the Watchers as a whole tells us that Uriel, Raphael, and Gabriel were present before God to testify on behalf of humankind. They wish to ask for divine intervention during the reign of the fallen grigori (fallen watchers). These fallen take human wives and produced half-angel, half-human offspring called the nephilim. Uriel is responsible for warning Noah about the upcoming great flood. 
Then said the Most High, the Holy and Great One spoke, and sent Uriel to the son of Lamech, and said to him: "<Go to Noah> and tell him in my name 'Hide thyself!' and reveal to him the end that is approaching: that the whole earth will be destroyed, and a deluge is about to come upon the whole earth, and will destroy all that is on it."
After judgment has been brought upon the nephilim and the fallen ones (see The Book of Giants), including the two main leaders Samyaza and Azazel, Uriel discusses their fates: 
Uriel then acts as a guide for Enoch for the rest of the Book of Watchers. He fulfills this capacity in many of the other books that make up Enoch. 
Oh holy Saint Uriel, intercede for us that our hearts may burn with the fire of the Sacred Heart of Jesus. Assist us in co-operating with the graces of our confirmation that the gifts of the Holy Spirit may bear lots o' fruit in our souls. Obtain for us the grace to use the sword of truth to pare away all that is not in conformity to the most adorable Will of God in our lives, that we may fully participate in the army of the Church Militant. Amen. 
The longstanding motto of the University of Oxford, Dominus illuminatio mea ("The Lord is my light") is a translation into Latin of Uriel's name. 
In Hermetic Qabalah, Uriel's name is commonly spelled Auriel. He is regarded as the archangel of the North, and of the element of Earth. 
According to the teaching of the modern Hermetic Order of the Golden Dawn, Uriel is the archangel of North and of Earth, and is thus associated with the vegetation of the Earth. In iconography he is depicted holding stems of ripened wheat and wearing robes of citrine, russet, olive, and black. 
In the modern Essenian esoteric movement, Ouriel is regarded as the archangel of Summer and the element of Fire. 
Archangel Uriel, fresco at the ceiling by Johann Georg Unruhe from Saint Michael parish church, Untergriesbach, 1780 
Mural of archangel Uriel by Henry O. Walker in Thomas Jefferson Building, inspired by Emerson's poem Uriel 
He became a safecracker, and in 1949, at age 20, he was arrested for burglary. He served two years in the Florida Department of Corrections chain gangs. 
In 1965 Scribners published his first novel, Cool Hand Luke, and he went on to write the Academy Award-nominated screenplay for the 1967 film. The film starred Paul Newman, and Pearce made a cameo appearance as a convict named Sailor. 
In 1966, Pearce appeared as himself on the March 21 episode of To Tell the Truth, receiving two of four possible votes. 
His other books include Pier Head Jump (1972) and Dying in the Sun (1974). During the 1970s and early 1980s, he was a freelance journalist, contributing to magazines such as Playboy and Esquire. In 2005 he published a fourth book, Nobody Comes Back, a novel about the Battle of the Bulge, which received an excellent review from Malcolm Jones in the 21 February 2005 edition of Newsweek. In 2011 a dramatization of Cool Hand Luke played on London's West Side, and the novel was reissued in the UK. 
61 Queen Charlotte Street  is an historic house situated on Queen Charlotte Street in Bristol, England. 
It dates from the early eighteenth century and is similar in design to houses of c. 1710 in nearby Queen Square. 6 King Street is a nearby house with a similar frontage. 
This article about a Bristol building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The second season of Canada's Drag Race premiered on October 14, 2021. The season is airing on Crave in Canada and WOW Presents Plus in the United States. 
Casting for the second season started early 2021 and the twelve contestants were announced on September 14, 2021. 
In June 2021, new judges for the second season were announced. Brad Goreski, Amanda Brugel, and Traci Melchor replace Stacey McKenzie and Jeffrey Bowyer-Chapman behind the judging table. The season also included several guest judges. 
Twelve new queens enter the Canadian werkroom. For the first mini-challenge, the queens must pose for a photoshoot shot by guest judge Caitlin Cronenberg while jumping into a foam pit reaching for the crown. Suki Doll wins this mini-challenge. For the main challenge, the queens must create a haute-check couture look that screams premiere party eleganza using left-behind materials from the coat check. 
The queens are told that for this weeks main challenge, they must overact in the new slasher film parody Screech. Adriana plays Blood 'N' Goreski, Eve 6000 plays Nara Hater, Gia Metric plays Blue Scarymore, Icesis Couture plays Jocklyn Straps, Kendall Gender plays Hookin' Hytes, Kimora Amour plays Frontelle Lobe, Pythia plays Fairuzah Chalk, Stephanie Prince plays Clitney Lezcoff, Suki Doll plays Emmy Dumpah, and Synthia Kiss plays A-Martha.  
On the runway, category is Good Girl Gone Bad. Adriana, Eve 6000 and Gia Metric receive positive critiques, with Adriana winning the challenge. Kendall Gender, Stephanie Prince and Synthia Kiss all receive negative critiques, with Kendall Gender being saved from the bottom two. Stephanie Prince and Synthia Kiss lip-sync to "Ghost" by Fefe Dobson. Synthia Kiss wins the lip-sync and Stephanie Prince sashays away. 
For this week's mini-challenge, the queens must read each other for the reading challenge. Icesis Couture wins. It is then announced that the queens will play the Snatch Game with the panel consisting of Brad Goreski and Boman "Bomanizer" Martinez-Reid. The cast consisted of:   
On the runway, Brooke, Brad and Traci are joined by guest judge Connor Jessup with the runway category being Made in Canada. Kimora Amour, Pythia and Synthia Kiss receive positive critiques for their performances, with Synthia Kiss winning the challenge. Adriana, Eve 6000 and Suki Doll are the bottom three, with Adriana being saved. Eve 6000 and Suki Doll then lip-sync to "Happiness" by KAPRI. Eve 6000 wins the lip-sync, and Suki Doll sashays away. 
For this week's mini-challenge, the queens had to pair up and give a lesson on safe sex. Gia Metric and Synthia Kiss won the mini-challenge and became team captains for the main challenge. For the main challenge, the queens had to create a country pop girl group and perform to the song "Bye Flop". Gia Metric chose Adriana, Icesis Couture and Pythia for her team and formed The Giddy Girls. Synthia Kiss chose Eve 6000, Kendall Gender and Kimora Amour for her team and formed The Dosey Hoes. 
On the runway, category is Monochromatica: Drag Pop Princess. The Giddy Girls team is declared the winning team, with Gia Metric winning the overall challenge. The Dosey Hoes are the losing team, with Eve 6000, Kendall Gender and Synthia Kiss receiving negative critiques. Kendall Gender is declared safe, with Eve 6000 and Synthia Kiss in the bottom two. They lip-sync to "I Love Myself Today" by Bif Naked. Synthia Kiss wins the lip-sync, and Eve 6000 sashays away. 
To Every Man a Penny is a 1949 novel by Scottish writer Bruce Marshall.  Two major characters in the novel, Gaston and Bessier, like the author himself, had legs amputated due to wounds suffered in World War I. 
The story of a young French priest, Gaston, who goes off to World War I.  In the trenches he is mutilated, modestly administers the sacraments, hears the confessions of dying men, aids the wounded, and becomes a good friend of a Communist, Louis Philippe Bessier. 
Gaston, who had always sustained himself with the idea that the great evil of the war could lead to good, is forced to change his mind. The world is moving away from the Church and the Church from the world. 
The little girl Armelle, his pupil in catechism class, of whom he is very fond and who had always written to him in the trenches, wants to become a model, and he gives her his permission, even if many of his fellow canons disapprove. 
Marshall masterfully recounts the Catholic Church in France between the two world wars. The more formal people are in approaching her, the more the ecclesiastical hierarchies appear closed in their moralisms, their formalisms, their solipsistic way of thinking. 
In the meantime, the World War II is drawing near: Benito Mussolini and Adolf Hitler have burst onto the European scene. Gaston receives another fierce blow, which is that his beloved Armelle dies giving birth to a baby girl, Michelle. But there is a place where our priest can take refuge: the convent of some nuns who appreciate his simplicity and faith. Michelle will grow up there, among countless economic hardships and countless little economies. 
Dibongia is one of the major clans, into which the Deori tribe of India is divided. The other three major clans of are Tengaponiya, Bo-geenya and Pator-goya. 
This article about an Indian ethnicity or social group is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As the Drummonds made their way back in triumph to Drummond Castle they came upon Duncan Campbell of Dunstaffnage with a party of his clan members. He also had a score to settle with the Murrays, as his father-in-law and two of his sons had been murdered by them some time before. Campbell persuaded the Drummonds to resume their pursuit of the Murrays, and the combined Drummonds and Campbells marched towards Ochtertyre. 
Blood feuds were threatening to create a breakdown of political and social life in parts of Scotland at the time and the authorities felt that an example had to be made. James IV of Scotland ordered the arrest of David Drummond and the other main antagonist, Duncan Campbell of Dunstaffnage. Both men were executed by hanging at Stirling. 
The old Monzievaird parish church was demolished, and nothing remains. On the site the Ochtertyre family built their Mausoleum in 1809; When the foundations of the present mausoleum were being dug a quantity of charred wood was found, and very many calcined bones 
Located near Hosh, by the side of the drive to Ochtertyre house from the A85, the house is about 1.1km to the west. As of 2015 despite the roof being still intact, it is on the Buildings at Risk Register for Scotland. 
The northern bettong (Bettongia tropica) is a small potoroid marsupial which is restricted to some areas of mixed open Eucalyptus woodlands and Allocasuarina forests bordering rainforests in far northeastern Queensland, Australia. They are known as "rat kangaroos" and move about in a slow hopping manner. There are five different species in Australia of this particular animal. It is about the size of a rabbit with a large tail dragging behind. 
The typical bettong lives in the wild for about 4 to 6 years. This is a very short life span, but according to the Smithsonian's National Zoologist, they can, under proper care, live up to the age of 15 years. 
The northern bettong is an endangered animal, and only populates three regions of Queensland, Australia, Davies Creek, Emu Creek and Tinaroo Creek all of which are within 80 miles of each other. 
She began her career in 1993. In January 2017, she was named by President Nana Akufo-Addo as a committee member for the planning of 60th Independent anniversary of Ghana. 
In June 2017, she was among the members of the National Media Commission that were inducted to help in the passage of the Broadcasting and the Right to Information bills into law. 
In June 2017, she spoke at the Maiden Edition of Women in PR Ghana Seminar with Dr. Ayokoe Anim-Wright, Cynthia E. Ofori-Dwumfuo and Gifty Bingley. 
In February 2021, she was among an eight-member committee to select a new name for the Film industry in Ghana. 
She is currently the Dean of School of Information and Communication Studies at the University of Ghana. 
She has a daughter called Nubuke who is a fellow of the third class of the Africa Leadership Initiative-West Africa and a member of the Aspen Global Leadership Network. 
She was a visiting scholar at Northwestern University in Chicago in USA at the Program of African Studies from September to December 2005. 
In March 2020, she received an award in the 5th Ghana Women of Excellence Awards for her leadership role. 
She was paid homage by Anas Aremeyaw Anas for her role in his rise through the undercover journalism in Ghana. 
Being Incorporated, d.b.a. Being Giza Group, is a Japanese private entertainment conglomerate based in Tokyo's Roppongi district, founded on November 1, 1978 by musician Daiko Nagato. Being Inc. and its subsidiaries are the main supplier of theme music for the anime series Detective Conan. As of May 2011, 77 theme tunes have been supplie